 
Table of Contents    
 
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
☒  ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 
1934
For the Fiscal Year Ended August 31, 2023
or
☐  TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT 
OF 1934
For the Transition Period from ________ to ________
Commission File Number 000-22496
 
SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as speciﬁed in its charter)
 
OREGON   93-0341923
(State or other jurisdiction of incorporation or organization)  (I.R.S. Employer Identiﬁcation No.)
     
299 SW Clay Street, Suite 400, Portland, 
Oregon  97201
(Address of principal executive oﬃces)   (Zip Code)
(503) 224-9900
(Registrant’s telephone number, including area code)
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class  Trading Symbol(s) Name of each exchange on which 
registered
Class A Common Stock, $1.00 par value RDUS  The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as deﬁned in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. 
Yes ☒   No ☐
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to ﬁle reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the 
Act. Yes ☐   No ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has ﬁled all reports required to be ﬁled by Section 13 or 15(d) of 
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant 
was required to ﬁle such reports), and (2) has been subject to such ﬁling requirements for the past 90 days. Yes ☒  
No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be 
submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for 
such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit such ﬁles). Yes ☒   No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated ﬁler, an accelerated ﬁler, a non-accelerated 
ﬁler, a smaller reporting company, or an emerging growth company. See the deﬁnitions of “large accelerated ﬁler,” 
“accelerated ﬁler,” “smaller reporting company,” and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange 
Act.
Large accelerated 
ﬁler ☒Accelerated ﬁler ☐Non-accelerated 
ﬁler ☐
 
Smaller reporting 
company ☐Emerging growth 
company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended 
transition period for complying with any new or revised ﬁnancial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 
13(a) of the Exchange Act.  ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has ﬁled a report on and attestation to its management’s assessment 
of the eﬀectiveness of its internal control over ﬁnancial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 
U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public accounting ﬁrm that prepared or issued its audit report.  ☒
If securities are registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act, indicate by check mark whether the ﬁnancial 
statements of the registrant included in the ﬁling reﬂect the correction of an error to previously issued ﬁnancial 
statements.  ☐
Indicate by check mark whether any of those error corrections are restatements that required a recovery analysis of 
incentive-based compensation received by any of the registrant’s executive oﬃcers during the relevant recovery 
period pursuant to §240.10D-1(b).  ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as deﬁned in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act). 
Yes ☐   No ☒
The aggregate market value of the registrant’s outstanding common stock held by non-aﬃliates on February 28, 
2023 was $854,343,899.
The registrant had 27,312,233 shares of Class A common stock, par value of $1.00 per share, and 200,000 shares of 
Class B common stock, par value of $1.00 per share, outstanding as of October 23, 2023.
DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
Portions of the registrant’s deﬁnitive Proxy Statement for the January 2024 Annual Meeting of Shareholders are 
incorporated by reference into Part III of this report.
 
 
Table of Contents    
 
SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
FORM 10-K
TABLE OF CONTENTS
 
    PAGE
        
FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS   1
     
PART I      
        
Item 1 Business   2
        
Item 1A Risk Factors   14
        
Item 1B Unresolved Staﬀ Comments   27
        
Item 1C Cybersecurity   27
        
Item 2 Properties   28
        
Item 3 Legal Proceedings   29
        
Item 4 Mine Safety Disclosures   31
     
PART II     
        
Item 5
 Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters, and Issuer 
Purchases of
Equity Securities 
32
        
Item 6 [Reserved]   33
        
Item 7
 Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of 
Operations 
34
        
Item 7A Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk   52
        
Item 8 Financial Statements and Supplementary Data   53
        
Item 9
 Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial 
Disclosure 
98
        
Item 9A Controls and Procedures   98
        
Item 9B Other Information   98
       
Item 9C Disclosure Regarding Foreign Jurisdictions that Prevent Inspections  98
    
PART III     
        
Item 10 Directors, Executive Oﬃcers, and Corporate Governance   99
        
Item 11 Executive Compensation   99
        
Item 12
 Security Ownership of Certain Beneﬁcial Owners and Management and Related 
Stockholder Matters 
99
        
Item 13 Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence   99
        
Item 14 Principal Accountant Fees and Services   99
     
PART IV     
        
Item 15 Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules  100
        
Item 16 Form 10-K Summary  103
    
SIGNATURES  104
 
 
 
Table of Contents    
 
FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS
Statements and information included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K by Schnitzer Steel 
Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling that are not purely historical are forward-looking 
statements within the meaning of Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and are 
made pursuant to the “safe harbor” provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 
1995. Except as noted herein or as the context may otherwise require, all references to “we,” 
“our,” “us,” “the Company,” “Radius Recycling,” and “Radius” refer to Schnitzer Steel 
Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling and its consolidated subsidiaries.
Forward-looking statements in this Annual Report on Form 10-K include statements regarding 
future events or our expectations, intentions, beliefs, and strategies regarding the future, which 
may include statements regarding the impact of equipment upgrades, equipment failures, and 
facility damage on production, including timing of repairs and resumption of operations; the 
realization of insurance recoveries; the Company’s outlook, growth initiatives, or expected 
results or objectives, including pricing, margins, volumes, and proﬁtability; completion of 
acquisitions and integration of acquired businesses; the progression and impact of investments 
in processing and manufacturing technology improvements and information technology 
systems; the impacts of supply chain disruptions, inﬂation, and rising interest rates; liquidity 
positions; our ability to generate cash from continuing operations; trends, cyclicality, and 
changes in the markets we sell into; strategic direction or goals; targets; changes to 
manufacturing and production processes; the realization of deferred tax assets; planned capital 
expenditures; the cost of and the status of any agreements or actions related to our 
compliance with environmental and other laws; expected tax rates, deductions, and credits; the 
impact of sanctions and tariﬀs, quotas, and other trade actions and import restrictions; the 
impact of pandemics, epidemics, or other public health emergencies, such as the coronavirus 
disease 2019 (“COVID-19”) pandemic; the impact of labor shortages or increased labor costs; 
obligations under our retirement plans; beneﬁts, savings, or additional costs from business 
realignment, cost containment, and productivity improvement programs; the potential impact of 
adopting new accounting pronouncements; and the adequacy of accruals.
Forward-looking statements by their nature address matters that are, to diﬀerent degrees, 
uncertain, and often contain words such as “outlook,” “target,” “aim,” “believes,” “expects,” 
“anticipates,” “intends,” “assumes,” “estimates,” “evaluates,” “may,” “will,” “should,” 
“could,” “opinions,” “forecasts,” “projects,” “plans,” “future,” “forward,” “potential,” 
“probable,” and similar expressions. However, the absence of these words or similar 
expressions does not mean that a statement is not forward-looking.
We may make other forward-looking statements from time to time, including in reports ﬁled 
with the Securities and Exchange Commission, press releases, presentations and on public 
conference calls. All forward-looking statements we make are based on information available to 
us at the time the statements are made, and we assume no obligation to update any forward-
looking statements, except as may be required by law. Our business is subject to the eﬀects of 
changes in domestic and global economic conditions and a number of other risks and 
uncertainties that could cause actual results to diﬀer materially from those included in, or 
implied by, such forward-looking statements. Some of these risks and uncertainties are 
discussed in Part I, Item 1A. Risk Factors of this Form 10-K. Examples of these risks include: 
potential environmental cleanup costs related to the Portland Harbor Superfund site or other 
locations; the impact of goodwill impairment charges; the impact of equipment upgrades, 
equipment failures, and facility damage on production; failure to realize or delays in realizing 
expected beneﬁts from capital and other projects, including investments in processing and 
manufacturing technology improvements and information technology systems; the cyclicality 
and impact of general economic conditions; the impact of inﬂation, rising interest rates, and 
foreign currency ﬂuctuations; changing conditions in global markets including the impact of 
sanctions and tariﬀs, quotas, and other trade actions and import restrictions; increases in the 
relative value of the U.S. dollar; economic and geopolitical instability including as a result of 
military conﬂict; volatile supply and demand conditions aﬀecting prices and volumes in the 
markets for raw materials and other inputs we purchase; signiﬁcant decreases in recycled 
metal prices; imbalances in supply and demand conditions in the global steel industry; 
diﬃculties associated with acquisitions and integration of acquired businesses; supply chain 
disruptions; reliance on third-party shipping companies, including with respect to freight rates 
and the availability of transportation; the impact of impairment of assets other than goodwill; 
the impact of pandemics, epidemics, or other public health emergencies, such as the COVID-19 
pandemic; inability to achieve or sustain the beneﬁts from productivity, cost savings, and 
restructuring initiatives; inability to renew facility leases; customer fulﬁllment of their 
contractual obligations; potential limitations on our ability to access capital resources and 
existing credit facilities; restrictions on our business and ﬁnancial covenants under the 
agreement governing our bank credit facilities; the impact of consolidation in the steel industry; 
product liability claims; the impact of legal proceedings and legal compliance; the impact of 
climate change; the impact of not realizing deferred tax assets; the impact of tax increases and 
changes in tax rules; the impact of one or more cybersecurity incidents; the impact of 
increasing attention to environmental, social, and governance matters; translation risks 
associated with ﬂuctuation in foreign exchange rates; the impact of hedging transactions; 
inability to obtain or renew business licenses and permits; environmental compliance costs and 
potential environmental liabilities; increased environmental regulations and enforcement; 
compliance with climate change and greenhouse gas emission laws and regulations; the impact 
of labor shortages or increased labor costs; reliance on employees subject to collective 
bargaining agreements; and the impact of the underfunded status of multiemployer plans in 
which we participate.
1 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
General
On July 26, 2023, Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. announced its new brand and assumed name, Radius 
Recycling, reﬂecting its position within and connection to the circular economy. The Company will seek 
approval from its shareholders to change its legal name to Radius Recycling, Inc. at its January 2024 Annual 
Meeting of Shareholders.
Founded in 1906, Radius Recycling is one of North America’s largest recyclers of ferrous and nonferrous 
metal, including end-of-life vehicles, and a manufacturer of ﬁnished steel products. As a vertically integrated 
organization, we oﬀer a range of products and services to meet global demand through our network that 
includes 50 retail self-service auto parts stores, 54 metals recycling facilities, and an electric arc furnace 
(“EAF”) steel mill. Our internal organizational and reporting structure includes a single operating and 
reportable segment.
Worldwide demand for recycled ferrous and nonferrous metal is driven primarily by production levels for 
ﬁnished steel and for products using nonferrous metal. Recycled ferrous metal is the primary feedstock for 
steel mill production using EAF technology and one of the raw materials utilized for steel manufacturing 
using blast furnace technology. Steel mills around the world, including those in the North American domestic 
market in which our own steel mill operates, are the primary end markets for our recycled ferrous metal 
products. Specialty steelmakers, foundries, reﬁneries, smelters, wholesalers, and other recycled metal 
processors globally are the primary end markets for our recycled nonferrous metal products. Our steel mill 
produces ﬁnished steel products using internally sourced recycled ferrous metal as the primary raw material 
and sells to customers located primarily in the Western United States and Western Canada.
We believe long-term demand for recycled metals will continue to be driven by factors including global 
economic growth and an increased focus on environmental policies promoting natural resource 
conservation, decarbonization, and lower energy usage. We believe the signiﬁcant environmental beneﬁts 
and production eﬃciencies associated with steelmaking that maximizes the use of recycled metal as a raw 
material, compared to iron ore mined from natural resources, will positively contribute to worldwide long-
term demand for recycled ferrous metal. Further, we believe decarbonization eﬀorts by companies, 
industries, and governments around the world, including investments in low carbon technologies such as 
renewable energies, electric vehicles, and energy eﬃciency solutions that are more metal intensive and 
minimize carbon dioxide emissions from the use of fossil fuels, among other factors, support global long-
term demand for recycled nonferrous metal such as aluminum and copper.
Business Acquisitions
Recycling Services
On November 18, 2022, we acquired the operating assets of ScrapSource, a recycling services company that 
provides solutions for industrial companies that generate scrap metal from their manufacturing process. The 
acquired business expands our national recycling services operations and utilizes primarily long-term 
contracts through which ScrapSource charges a fee to suppliers of scrap material in exchange for its 
services. The total purchase consideration was approximately $25 million.
Expansion of Southeast Recycling Operations
On April 29, 2022, we acquired two recycling facilities in the greater Atlanta, Georgia metropolitan area, 
including a metal shredding operation and recycled auto-parts center, from the previous owners of Encore 
Recycling. The total purchase consideration was approximately $64 million. On October 1, 2021, we acquired 
eight metals recycling facilities across Mississippi, Tennessee, and Kentucky from Columbus Recycling, a 
provider of recycled ferrous and nonferrous metal products and recycling services. The total purchase 
consideration was approximately $117 million. The acquired Encore Recycling and Columbus Recycling 
operations purchase and process scrap metal from industrial manufacturers, local recycling companies, and 
individuals, and sell the recycled products to regional foundries and steel mills. The acquired Encore 
Recycling operations also purchase and recycle end-of-life vehicles, including through use of its shredding, 
nonferrous processing, and separation systems. Combined with our other regional metals recycling facilities 
and recycled auto-parts centers, the acquired operations oﬀer additional recycling products, services, and 
logistics solutions to customers and suppliers across the Southeastern United States and nearly doubled our 
metals recycling facility count in the region.
See Note 7 - Business Acquisitions in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8 of 
this report.
2 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
Revenue-Generating Activities
We acquire, process, and recycle end-of-life (salvaged) vehicles, rail cars, home appliances, industrial 
machinery, manufacturing scrap, and construction and demolition scrap through our facilities. Our retail self-
service auto parts stores located across the United States (“U.S.”) and Western Canada, which operate under 
the commercial brand-name Pick-n-Pull, procure the signiﬁcant majority of our salvaged vehicles and sell 
serviceable used auto parts from these vehicles. Upon acquiring a salvaged vehicle, we remove catalytic 
converters, aluminum wheels, and batteries for separate processing and sale prior to placing the vehicle in 
our retail lot. After retail customers have removed desired parts from a vehicle, we may remove remaining 
major component parts containing ferrous and nonferrous metals, which are primarily sold to wholesalers. 
The remaining auto bodies are crushed and shipped to our metals recycling facilities where geographically 
practical, or sold to third parties, for shredding. At our metals recycling facilities, we process mixed and 
large pieces of scrap metal into smaller pieces by crushing, torching, shearing, shredding, separating, and 
sorting, resulting in recycled ferrous, nonferrous, and mixed metal pieces of a size, density, and metal 
content required by customers to meet their production needs. Each of our shredding, nonferrous processing, 
and separation systems is designed to optimize the recovery of valuable recycled metal.
We operate seven deepwater port locations, six of which are equipped with large-scale shredders. Our 
largest port facilities in Everett, Massachusetts; Portland, Oregon; Oakland, California; and Tacoma, 
Washington each operate a mega-shredder with 7,000 to 9,000 horsepower. Our port facilities in Salinas, 
Puerto Rico, and Kapolei, Hawaii operate shredders with 1,500 and 4,000 horsepower, respectively. Our port 
facility in Providence, Rhode Island does not operate a shredder, but exports recycled ferrous metal acquired 
in the regional market. In addition, we operate a 2,500-horsepower shredder at our non-port facility in 
Lithonia, Georgia, which we acquired as part of the purchase of the Encore Recycling business in April 2022. 
Our shredders are designed to provide a denser product and, in conjunction with advanced separation 
equipment, a more reﬁned form of recycled ferrous metal which can be used eﬃciently by steel mills in the 
production of new steel. The shredding process reduces auto bodies and other scrap metal into ﬁst-size 
pieces of shredded recycled metal. The shredded material is then carried by conveyor under magnetized 
drums that attract the ferrous metal and separate it from the mixed nonferrous metal and other residue, 
resulting in a consistent and high-quality shredded ferrous product. The mixed nonferrous metal and residue 
then pass through a series of additional mechanical systems designed to recover and separate the 
nonferrous metal from the residue. The remaining mixed nonferrous metal is then further sorted by product 
and size grade before being sold as joint products, which include mainly zorba (primarily aluminum), zurik 
(primarily stainless steel), and shredded insulated wire (primarily copper and aluminum). We sell further 
separated products with higher metal content such as twitch (light gauge recycled aluminum) and shredded 
copper and brass. We also purchase nonferrous metal directly from industrial vendors and other suppliers 
and aggregate and prepare this metal for shipment to customers by ship, rail, or truck.
We invest in nonferrous metal extraction and separation technologies to optimize the recovery of valuable 
nonferrous metal and to meet the metal purity requirements of customers. We have a major strategic 
initiative currently in progress and partially completed to replace, upgrade, and add to our existing 
nonferrous metal recovery technologies in order to increase metal recovery and the volume of nonferrous 
material from shredding operations, provide additional product optionality, create higher quality furnace-
ready products, and reduce the metallic portion of shredder residue disposed in landﬁlls. Our program 
comprises seven primary nonferrous recovery systems at our major shredder facilities. Of these systems, 
three are major aluminum and four are major copper recovery systems. Our initiative also includes two 
aluminum separation systems, one on each coast, and four copper separation systems. The construction, 
commissioning, and ramp up of these new technologies, including commencement of permitting approvals, 
began substantially in ﬁscal 2021 and are anticipated to be completed during ﬁscal 2024, with total capital 
expenditures estimated to be approximately $133 million, of which approximately $130 million has been 
incurred, including $21 million during ﬁscal 2023.
In addition to the sale of recycled metal processed at our facilities, we provide a variety of recycling and 
related services including brokering the sale of ferrous and nonferrous scrap metal generated by retail and 
industrial entities and demolition projects to customers in the domestic market, among other services. We 
also lease machinery assets to customers primarily to facilitate the provision of reverse logistics and other 
recycling services. Contract consideration for our recycling services is generally less sensitive to changes in 
market prices for scrap metal compared to sales of recycled metal from our recycling operations.
Our steel mill melt shop includes an EAF, a ladle reﬁning furnace with enhanced steel chemistry reﬁning 
capabilities, and a ﬁve-strand continuous billet caster, permitting the mill to produce special alloy grades of 
steel not currently produced by other mills on the West Coast of the U.S. The substantial majority of billets 
produced are reheated in a natural gas-fueled furnace and are then hot-rolled through the rolling mill to 
produce ﬁnished steel long products. The rolling mill has an eﬀective annual production capacity under 
current conditions of approximately 580 thousand tons of ﬁnished steel products.
3 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
Products and Services
Recycled ferrous metal is a key feedstock used in the production of ﬁnished steel and is largely categorized 
into heavy melting steel (“HMS”), plate and structural (“bonus”), and shredded scrap metal (“shred”), 
although there are various grades of each category depending on metal content and the size and 
consistency of individual pieces. These attributes aﬀect the product’s relative value.
Our nonferrous products include mixed metal joint products recovered from the shredding process, as well 
as aluminum, copper, stainless steel, nickel, brass, titanium, lead, and high temperature alloys. We also sell 
catalytic converters to specialty processors that extract the nonferrous precious metals including platinum, 
palladium, and rhodium.
We provide recycling and related services involving scrap metal and other recyclable materials to a range of 
customers, including large retailers, industrial manufacturers, original equipment manufacturers, and owners 
of end-of-life railcars. These services include primarily scrap brokerage, certiﬁed destruction, automotive 
parts recycling, railcar dismantling, and reverse logistics. During ﬁscal 2023, we expanded our recycling 
services operations through our acquisition of ScrapSource. Also in ﬁscal 2023, we launched our integrated 
recycling services activities under our trademarked 3PRTM brand which stands for third-party recycling and 
encompasses all our recycling services oﬀerings.
Each retail self-service auto parts store oﬀers an extensive selection of vehicles (including domestic and 
foreign cars, vans, and light trucks) from which customers can remove and purchase parts. We employ 
proprietary information technology systems to centrally manage and operate the geographically diverse 
network of auto parts stores, and we regularly rotate the inventory to provide customers with greater access 
to parts. Our used auto parts inventory is also searchable on our Pick-n-Pull public website. We enter into 
limited duration contracts with public entities and other third parties for vehicle dismantling and asset 
recovery services, which provide a source of low-cost salvage vehicles.
Our steel mill produces semi-ﬁnished goods (billets) and ﬁnished goods, consisting of rebar, coiled rebar, 
wire rod, merchant bar, and other specialty products, using recycled ferrous metal sourced internally from 
our recycling and joint venture operations and other raw materials. Semi-ﬁnished goods are predominantly 
used for the manufacturing of ﬁnished products. Rebar is produced in either straight length steel bars or coils 
and used to increase the strength of poured concrete. Coiled rebar is preferred by some manufacturers 
because it reduces the waste generated by cutting individual lengths to meet customer speciﬁcations and, 
therefore, improves yield. Wire rod is steel rod, delivered in coiled form, used by manufacturers to produce a 
variety of products such as chain link fencing, nails, wire, stucco netting, and pre-stressed concrete strand. 
Merchant bar consists of rounds and square steel bars used by manufacturers to produce a wide variety of 
products, including bolts, threaded bars, and dowel bars. Our steel mill is also an approved supplier of high-
quality rebar to support nuclear power plant construction and has a license to produce certain patented high-
strength specialty steels.
Active Facilities 
Tabular presentation of our active facilities by geographic region is as follows:
   Auto Parts
Stores Metals 
Recycling
Facilities Total 
Recycling
Facilities Large-
Scale
Shredders Deepwater
Ports  Steel
Facilities
Northwest
(WA, OR, MT)   7   8   15   2   2   1
Southwest and 
Hawaii
(CA, NV, UT, HI)   22   7   29   2   2   1
Midwest and South
(AR, IL, IN, OH, MO, KS, TX)  12   —   12   —   —   —
Northeast
(MA, ME, NH, RI)   2   9   11   1   2   —
Southeast and Puerto 
Rico
(GA, AL, TN, FL, VA, KY, MS, PR)  3   26   29   2   1   —
Western Canada
(BC, AB)   4   4   8   —   —   —
Total   50   54   104   7   7   2
 
(1)Excludes joint venture facilities.
(2)Excludes one dedicated recycling services oﬃce in Texas.
(3)All large-scale shredding operations employ nonferrous extraction and separation equipment.
(4)Includes one steel mill in Oregon and one distribution center in California.(1) (2)(
3) (4)
4 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
Pricing
Domestic and foreign prices for recycled ferrous and nonferrous metal are generally based on prevailing 
market rates, which diﬀer by region, and are subject to market cycles that are inﬂuenced by worldwide 
demand from steel and other metal producers, the availability of materials that can be processed into 
saleable recycled metal, and regulatory policies, among other factors. Sanctions, trade actions, and licensing 
and inspection requirements can also impact pricing for the aﬀected products. Recycled ferrous and 
nonferrous metal sales contracts generally provide for shipment within 30 to 60 days after the price is 
agreed to which, in most cases, includes freight.
We respond to changes in selling prices for processed metal by seeking to adjust purchase prices for 
unprocessed scrap metal in order to manage the impact on our operating income. The spread between 
selling prices for processed metal and the cost of purchased scrap metal (metal spread) is subject to a 
number of factors, including diﬀerences in the market conditions between the domestic regions where scrap 
metal is acquired and the areas in the world to which the processed metals are sold, market volatility from 
the time the selling price is agreed upon with the customer until the time the scrap metal is purchased, 
changes in the availability of scrap metal including the volume generated by source and grade, and changes 
in transportation costs. We generally beneﬁt from sustained periods of stable or rising recycled metal selling 
prices, which allow us to better maintain or increase both operating income and unprocessed scrap metal 
ﬂow into our facilities. When recycled metal selling prices decline, either sharply or for a sustained period, 
our operating margins typically compress.
The sales prices for auto parts from salvaged vehicles are deeply discounted from prevailing national new 
and refurbished sales prices oﬀered at full-service auto dismantlers, retail auto parts stores, and car 
dealerships. Our stores provide a list price, available at each location and online. Prices for auto bodies sold 
to third parties and for major component parts, such as engines, transmissions, and alternators sold to 
wholesalers, are based on prevailing recycled metal market rates which diﬀer by region and are subject to 
market cycles. Prices for catalytic converters sold to third-party processors are based on prevailing market 
rates for the extracted precious metals including platinum, palladium, and rhodium. By consolidating 
shipments of auto bodies and component parts, we are able to optimize prices by focusing on larger 
wholesale customers that pay a premium for volume and consistency of shipments.
Our ﬁnished steel product prices diﬀer by product size and grade. Selling prices are inﬂuenced by the price of 
raw materials, including the cost of recycled ferrous metal and required consumables including graphite 
electrodes and alloys, as well as regional demand in the West Coast and Western Canadian markets. Selling 
prices for our ﬁnished steel products may also be aﬀected by the price and availability of steel imports.
Customers and Markets 
Approximately 95% of our consolidated revenues are derived from sales of recycled ferrous and nonferrous 
metal products and ﬁnished steel products. We sell our recycled ferrous and nonferrous metal products 
globally to steel mills, foundries, reﬁneries, smelters, wholesalers, and other recycled metal processors. Our 
ﬁnished steel customers are primarily steel service centers, construction industry subcontractors, steel 
fabricators, wire drawers, and major farm and wood products suppliers. We had no external customers that 
accounted for 10% or more of our consolidated revenues in ﬁscal 2023, 2022, or 2021.
Recycled Ferrous Metal
The table below sets forth, on a revenue and volume basis, the amount of recycled ferrous metal sold to 
foreign and domestic customers, during the last three ﬁscal years ended August 31:
  For the Year Ended August 31,  % Increase (Decrease) 
($ in thousands)  2023   2022   2021   2023 vs. 
2022  2022 vs. 
2021 
Ferrous revenues                    
Domestic  $408,441  $438,026  $289,742    (7)%   51%
Foreign   1,031,54
2   1,476,22
9   1,268,14
9    (30)%   16%
Total ferrous revenues  $1,439,98
3  $1,914,25
5  $1,557,89
1    (25)%   23%
Ferrous volumes (LT, in thousands)                  
Domestic    1,952    1,806    1,500    8%   20%
Foreign    2,424    2,810    2,908    (14)%   (3)%
Total ferrous volumes (LT, in thousands)   4,376    4,616    4,408    (5)%   5%
 
LT = Long Ton, which is equivalent to 2,240 pounds. 
(1)Ferrous volumes sold externally and delivered to our steel mill for ﬁnished steel production.(1)
(2)
(3)
(2)Domestic includes volumes delivered to our steel mill for ﬁnished steel production.
(3)May not foot due to rounding.
5 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
We export recycled ferrous metal primarily to countries in Asia, the Mediterranean region, and North, 
Central, and South America. Ferrous exports made up 55%, 61%, and 66% of our total ferrous volumes in 
ﬁscal 2023, 2022, and 2021, respectively. In ﬁscal 2023, the three countries from which we derived our 
largest ferrous export revenues from external customers were Bangladesh, Turkey, and India, which 
collectively accounted for 72% of our total ferrous export revenues. In ﬁscal 2022 and 2021, the three 
countries from which we derived our largest ferrous export revenues from external customers accounted for 
71% and 63%, respectively, of our total ferrous export revenues. We generally attribute revenues from 
external customers to individual countries based on the country in which the customer is located. Our three 
largest external recycled ferrous metal customers accounted for 23% of total ferrous revenues in ﬁscal 2023, 
compared to 22% and 25% in ﬁscal 2022 and 2021, respectively.
Recycled Nonferrous Metal
The table below sets forth, on a revenue and volume basis, the amount of recycled nonferrous metal sold to 
foreign and domestic customers during the last three ﬁscal years ended August 31:
  For the Year Ended August 31,   % Increase (Decrease) 
($ in thousands)  2023   2022   2021   2023 vs. 
2022  2022 vs. 
2021 
Nonferrous revenues                    
Domestic  $378,972  $480,919  $367,744    (21)%   31%
Foreign   402,130   411,525   317,118    (2)%   30%
Total nonferrous revenues  $781,102  $892,444  $684,862    (12)%   30%
Nonferrous volumes (pounds, in 
thousands)                 
Domestic   316,490   298,279   219,126    6%   36%
Foreign   422,447   389,140   374,252    9%   4%
Total nonferrous volumes (pounds, in 
thousands)  738,937   687,419   593,378    7%   16%
 
(1)All nonferrous volumes sold externally.
(2)May not foot due to rounding.
Nonferrous exports made up 57%, 57%, and 63% of our total nonferrous sales volumes in ﬁscal 2023, 2022, 
and 2021, respectively. The substantial majority of our nonferrous joint products recovered from the 
shredding process are sold to the export market currently and made up 44%, 45%, and 44% of our total 
nonferrous sales volumes in ﬁscal 2023, 2022, and 2021, respectively. In ﬁscal 2023, the three countries 
from which we derived our largest nonferrous export revenues from external customers were Malaysia, 
China, and India, which collectively accounted for 72% of our total nonferrous export revenues. In ﬁscal 2022 
and 2021, the three countries from which we derived our largest nonferrous export revenues from external 
customers accounted for 68% and 69%, respectively, of our total nonferrous export revenues.
Finished Steel Products
The table below sets forth, on a revenue and volume basis, the amount of ﬁnished steel products sold during 
the last three ﬁscal years ended August 31:
  For the Year Ended August 31,  % Increase (Decrease) 
($ in thousands)  2023   2022   2021   2023 vs. 
2022  2022 vs. 
2021 
Steel revenues  $507,550  $531,731  $379,203    (5)%   40%
Finished steel sales volumes (ST, in 
thousands)   521    465    488    12%   (5)%
 
ST = Short Ton, which is equivalent to 2,000 pounds.
(1)Steel revenues include predominantly sales of ﬁnished steel products, in addition to sales of semi-ﬁnished goods (billets) 
and steel manufacturing scrap.
We sell ﬁnished steel products to customers located primarily in the Western United States and Western 
Canada. Customers in California accounted for 53%, 55%, and 52% of our steel revenues in ﬁscal 2023, 2022, 
and 2021, respectively.
6 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023(1)
(2)
(1)
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
Distribution
We deliver recycled ferrous and nonferrous metal to foreign customers by ship and to domestic customers 
by barge, rail, and road transportation networks. Cost eﬃciencies are achieved by operating deepwater 
terminal facilities in Everett, Massachusetts; Portland, Oregon; Oakland, California; Tacoma, Washington; and 
Providence, Rhode Island, all of which are owned, except for the Providence, Rhode Island facility which is 
operated under a long-term lease. We also have access to deepwater terminal facilities at Kapolei, Hawaii 
and Salinas, Puerto Rico through public docks. The use of deepwater terminals enables us to load ferrous 
material in large vessels capable of holding up to 50,000 tons for trans-oceanic shipments. We believe the 
use of our owned and leased terminal facilities is advantageous because it allows us to more eﬀectively 
manage loading costs and minimize the berthing delays often experienced by users of unaﬃliated 
terminals. From time to time, we may enter into contracts of aﬀreightment, which guarantee the availability 
of ocean-going vessels, in order to manage the risks associated with ship availability and freight costs.
Our nonferrous products are shipped in 20- to 30-ton capacity containers from ports and rail ramps located in 
close proximity to our recycling facilities. Containerized shipments are exported by marine vessels to 
customers globally, and domestic shipments are typically shipped to customers by rail or by truck.
We sell used auto parts from our self-service retail stores. Both before and after retail customers have 
removed desired parts from acquired salvaged vehicles, we extract and consolidate certain valuable ferrous 
and nonferrous components from auto bodies for shipment by truck primarily to wholesale customers. We 
also remove and collect catalytic converters from salvaged vehicles for shipment by truck to specialty 
processers which extract the nonferrous precious metals. The salvaged auto bodies are crushed and shipped 
by truck to our metals recycling facilities where geographically practical, or to third-party recyclers, for 
shredding.
We sell ﬁnished steel products directly from our steel mill in McMinnville, Oregon and our distribution center 
in City of Industry, California (Los Angeles area). Finished steel products are shipped from the mill to the 
distribution center primarily by rail. The distribution center facilitates sales by maintaining an inventory of 
products close to major customers for just-in-time delivery. We communicate regularly with major customers 
to determine their anticipated needs and plan our rolling mill production schedule accordingly. Finished steel 
shipments to customers are made by common carrier, primarily truck or rail.
Sources of Unprocessed Metal
The most common forms of purchased unprocessed metal are obsolete machinery and equipment, such as 
automobiles, railroad cars, railroad tracks, home appliances and other consumer goods, scrap metal from 
manufacturing operations and retailers, and demolition metal from buildings and other infrastructure. 
Unprocessed metal is acquired from a diverse base of suppliers who unload at our facilities, from drop boxes 
at suppliers’ industrial sites, and through negotiated purchases from other large suppliers, including 
railroads, manufacturers, automobile salvage facilities, metal dealers, various government entities, and 
individuals. We typically seek to locate our retail auto parts stores in major population centers with 
convenient road access. Our auto parts store network spans 16 states in the U.S. and two provinces in 
Western Canada, with a majority of the stores concentrated in regions where our large-scale shredders are 
located. Through our network of auto parts stores, we seek to obtain salvaged vehicles from four primary 
sources: private parties, tow companies, auto auctions, and municipal and other contracts. We have a 
program to purchase vehicles from private parties called “Cash for Junk Cars” which is advertised in local 
markets. Private parties either call a toll-free number and receive a quote for their vehicle or obtain an 
instant online quote. The private party can either deliver the vehicle to one of our retail locations or arrange 
for the vehicle to be picked up. We also employ car buyers who travel to vendors and bid on vehicles. 
Further, we enter into limited duration contracts with public entities and other third parties for vehicle 
dismantling and asset recovery services, which provide a source of low-cost salvage vehicles. The 
expiration of such contracts may lead us to seek alternative sources of vehicles, potentially at a higher cost. 
We also source scrap metal and other recyclable materials through our recycling services from a range of 
customers including large retailers, industrial manufacturers, original equipment manufacturers, and railcar 
owners.
The majority of our metal collection and processing facilities receive unprocessed metal via major railroad 
routes, waterways, or highways. Metals recycling facilities situated near industrial manufacturing and major 
transportation routes have the competitive advantage of reduced freight costs because of the signiﬁcant 
cost of freight relative to the cost of metal. The locations of our West Coast facilities provide access to 
sources of unprocessed metal in the Northern California region, northward to Western Canada and Alaska, 
and to the East, including Idaho, Montana, Utah, Colorado, and Nevada. The locations of our East Coast 
facilities provide access to sources of unprocessed metal in New York, Connecticut, Maine, Massachusetts, 
New Hampshire, Rhode Island, Vermont, Eastern Canada, and, from time to time, the Midwest. The locations 
of our facilities in Hawaii and Puerto Rico provide access to sources of unprocessed metal in the respective 
local markets. In the Southeastern U.S., approximately half of our ferrous and nonferrous unprocessed metal 
volume is purchased from industrial companies, including auto manufacturers, with the remaining volume 
being purchased from smaller dealers and individuals. These industrial companies provide us with metals 
that are by-products of their manufacturing processes.
7 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
The supply of scrap metal from these various sources can ﬂuctuate with the level of economic activity in the 
U.S. and can be sensitive to variability in recycled metal prices, particularly in the short term, as well as in 
costs such as labor and energy incurred by suppliers to generate scrap metal at economically viable levels. 
The eﬀects of competition for supply of scrap metal, including of speciﬁc grades, can signiﬁcantly impact the 
ﬂow of scrap volumes into our facilities, our metal spreads, and our operating margins. The supply of scrap 
metal can also ﬂuctuate, to a lesser degree, due to seasonal factors, such as severe weather conditions, 
which can inhibit scrap metal collections at our facilities and production levels in our facilities. Severe 
weather conditions can also adversely impact the timing of shipments of our products, the level of 
manufacturing activity utilizing our products, and retail admissions at our auto parts stores.
We operate an EAF steel mill in the Western U.S. that sources substantially all its recycled metal 
requirements from integrated metals recycling and joint venture operations. These operations provide our 
steel mill a mix of recycled metal grades, which allow the mill to achieve optimum eﬃciency in its melting 
operations.
Energy Supply
We require electricity to run our steel manufacturing operations, primarily its EAF. We purchase electricity 
under a long-term contract with McMinnville Water & Light (“MW&L”), which in turn relies on the Bonneville 
Power Administration. We entered into our current contract with MW&L in October 2011 that expires in 
September 2028. Our steel manufacturing operation also needs natural gas to operate its reheat furnace, 
which is used to reheat billets prior to moving them through the rolling mill. We address this demand 
through a natural gas agreement that obligates us at each month-end to purchase a volume of gas based on 
our projected needs for the immediately subsequent month on a take-or-pay basis priced using published 
natural gas indices. We periodically enter third-party contracts that mitigate the eﬀect of changes in index 
prices on our natural gas cost for a portion of our consumption. The combined electricity and natural gas 
costs for our steel mill represented approximately 1% of our consolidated cost of goods sold in each of ﬁscal 
2023, 2022, and 2021.
Competition
We compete in the U.S. and in Western Canada for the purchase of scrap metal with large, well-ﬁnanced 
recyclers of scrap metal, steel mills that own metal recycling facilities, and with smaller metals facilities 
and dealers. We also compete with brokers that buy scrap or recycled metal on behalf of domestic and 
foreign steel mills. Our auto stores compete for the purchase of end-of-life vehicles with other auto 
dismantlers, used car dealers, auto auctions, and metals recyclers. In general, the competitive factors 
impacting the purchase of scrap metal and end-of-life vehicles are the price oﬀered by the purchaser, the 
proximity of the purchaser to the source of scrap metal and end-of-life vehicles, and the purchaser’s ability 
to eﬃciently collect the scrap metal and end-of-life vehicles from certain suppliers’ locations. 
Demand for our products is cyclical in nature and sensitive to general economic conditions, structural and 
cyclical changes in markets, and other factors. For example, in ﬁscal 2023, an environment of slower 
economic growth and activity contributed to weaker market conditions for recycled metals globally, leading 
to signiﬁcantly lower average net selling prices for our ferrous and nonferrous products year-over-year. We 
compete globally for the sale of processed recycled metal to ﬁnished steel and other metal product 
producers. The predominant competitive factors that impact recycled metal sales are price (including duties 
and shipping cost), reliability of service, product quality, the relative value of the U.S. dollar, and the 
availability and price of raw material alternatives, including recycled metal substitutes, such as pig iron, 
direct reduced iron, and hot briquetted iron (all three derived from iron ore), and semi-ﬁnished products, such 
as steel billets. Our ability to compete in certain export markets may be impacted by sanctions and trade 
actions, such as tariﬀs, quotas, and other import restrictions, and by licensing and inspection requirements. 
Further, our ability to sell into certain countries may be subject to product quality requirements. Such 
restrictions may require us to perform additional processing and packaging of certain recycled nonferrous 
metal products, as well as engage in increased inspection and certiﬁcation activities, in order to continue 
selling into the aﬀected markets. 
We also compete for the sale of used auto parts to retail customers with other self-service and full-service 
auto dismantlers. The auto parts industry is characterized by diverse and fragmented competition and 
comprises a large number of aftermarket and used auto parts suppliers of all sizes, ranging from large, 
multinational corporations which serve both original equipment manufacturers and the aftermarket on a 
worldwide basis to small, local entities which have more limited supply. The main competitive factors 
impacting the retail sale of auto parts are price, availability and visibility of product, quality, and 
convenience of the retail stores to customers.
Our ability to process substantial volumes of recycled metal products, our use of advanced processing and 
separation equipment, the number and geographic dispersion of our locations, our access to a variety of 
diﬀerent modes of transportation, and the operating synergies of our integrated platform provide our 
business with the ability to compete successfully in varying market conditions.
Our primary domestic competitors for the sale of ﬁnished steel products include Nucor Corporation’s 
manufacturing facilities in Arizona, Utah, and Washington, and Commercial Metals Company’s 
manufacturing facilities in Arizona. In addition to domestic 
8 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
competition, we compete with foreign steel producers, principally located in Asia, Canada, Mexico, and 
Central and South America, primarily in shorter length rebar and certain wire rod grades. The principal 
competitive factors in the steel market currently are price, quality, service, product availability, and the 
relative value of the U.S. dollar.
For more than a decade, our steel manufacturing operation, as part of a U.S. industry coalition, petitioned 
the U.S. Government under our international trade laws for relief in the form of antidumping and 
countervailing duties against wire rod and rebar products from a number of foreign countries. Many of those 
cases were successful, and the resulting antidumping and countervailing duty orders led to a decrease in 
ﬁnished steel imports into our domestic markets from the peak reached in ﬁscal 2016. Those antidumping 
and countervailing duty orders remained in eﬀect during ﬁscal 2022. The duties imposed as part of these 
orders are periodically reassessed through the administrative review process. In addition, the U.S. 
Government conducts sunset reviews every ﬁve years to determine whether revocation of the orders would 
likely lead to resumption of dumping and subsidization and negatively impact the U.S. domestic industry. 
Aﬃrmative decisions allow the orders to continue for an additional ﬁve years. During ﬁscal 2023, sunset 
reviews of the antidumping duty orders covering rebar from Japan and Taiwan, the countervailing duty order 
covering rebar from Turkey, the antidumping duty orders covering wire rod from Belarus, Italy, Russia, South 
Africa, South Korea, Spain, Turkey, Ukraine, the United Arab Emirates, and the United Kingdom, and the 
countervailing duty orders covering wire rod from Italy and Turkey were completed. All reviews resulted in 
aﬃrmative determinations such that the orders will remain in eﬀect for an additional ﬁve years. During ﬁscal 
2024, an additional sunset review covering rebar is likely to be initiated. If the ﬁnal determination in any of 
these reviews is to revoke one or more of the orders, imports from those countries could increase which 
would negatively aﬀect our results of operations, cash ﬂows, and ﬁnancial position.
There are also a number of antidumping and countervailing duty orders in eﬀect in Canada covering rebar 
from many countries that we expect will continue to lead to a reduction in the volume of imports into 
Canada from these countries.
The long-term eﬀectiveness of existing antidumping and countervailing duty orders related to imports of 
wire rod and rebar products is largely uncertain and is impacted by the level and pricing of imports and the 
U.S. Government’s assessment of antidumping and countervailing duty margins as well as its assessment of 
continued injury to the U.S. industry as part of the sunset review process.
In March 2018, the United States imposed tariﬀs in the amount of 25 percent and 10 percent on imports of 
certain steel and aluminum products, respectively. The imposition of the tariﬀs was the conclusion of an 
investigation started in April 2017 under Section 232 of the Trade Expansion Act of 1962 that allows for an 
exemption from normal international trade rules if imports of a product are harming national security. 
Currently, imports from certain countries are exempt from these duties pursuant to various agreements, 
including quotas. The Department of Commerce also implemented an exclusion process whereby U.S. 
entities can request that certain products be excluded from the Section 232 tariﬀs. We review any exclusion 
requests relevant to our product line to determine whether an objection might be appropriate. To date, the 
Biden Administration has allowed most Section 232 duties and procedures to remain in place.
Coronavirus Disease 2019 (“COVID-19”)
We are a company operating in a critical infrastructure industry, as deﬁned by the U.S. Department of 
Homeland Security. Consistent with federal guidelines and with state and local orders, we operated across 
our footprint throughout the COVID-19 pandemic. Following the onset of COVID-19 and its negative eﬀects 
on our business, most prominently reﬂected in our ﬁscal 2020 results, global economic conditions improved 
beginning in ﬁscal 2021 and continued to improve through most of ﬁscal 2022. However, there are ongoing 
global impacts resulting directly or indirectly from the pandemic, including labor shortages, logistical 
challenges, and increases in costs for certain goods and services including due to the impact of inﬂation, 
which have negatively impacted our sales volumes, operating costs, and ﬁnancial results to varying 
degrees.
Regulatory Matters
Impact of Legislation and Regulation
Compliance with environmental laws and regulations is a signiﬁcant factor in our operations. Our businesses 
are subject to extensive and rapidly evolving local, state, and federal environmental protection, health, 
safety, and transportation laws and regulations relating to, among others:
•Remediation under the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act 
(“CERCLA”);
•The discharge of materials and emissions into the air;
•The prevention and remediation of soil and groundwater contamination;
•The management, treatment, and discharge of wastewater and storm water;
9 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
•The generation, discharge, storage, handling, transportation, and disposal of hazardous materials and 
secondary materials;
•The protection of our employees’ health and safety; and
•Climate change generally.
Environmental legislation and regulations have changed rapidly in recent years, and it is likely that we will 
be subject to more stringent environmental standards in the future. Legislation has been proposed in the 
U.S. Congress on multiple occasions to address greenhouse gas (“GHG”) emissions and global climate 
change. In August 2022, President Biden signed the Inﬂation Reduction Act (“IRA”), a bill that, among other 
things, creates ﬁnancial incentives intended to combat climate change, including by directly or indirectly 
discouraging use of oil and natural gas in favor of alternative sources of energy, among other measures. We 
cannot predict with any certainty at this time how the climate-related measures in the IRA may aﬀect our 
operations. A number of states, including states in which we have operations and facilities, have considered, 
are considering, or have already enacted legislation or executive action to develop information on or 
address climate change and GHG emissions, including state-level “cap and trade” programs and climate risk 
and carbon emissions disclosure requirements. For example, new laws in California (i) will require 
companies doing business in the state with more than $1 billion in total annual revenues to annually 
disclose Scope 1 and 2 greenhouse gas emissions data starting in 2026 (for the prior ﬁnancial year, starting 
on or after January 1, 2025) and Scope 3 emissions starting in 2027 (covering ﬁnancial years starting on or 
after January 1, 2026); and/or (ii) will require companies doing business in the state with annual revenues 
over $500 million to biannually disclose their climate-related ﬁnancial risks and the measures they have 
adopted to reduce and adapt to these risks. These actions may potentially inform and/or surpass the 
climate-related disclosure requirements proposed by the Securities and Exchange Commission (“SEC”).
Currently, we are required to annually report GHG emissions from our steel mill to the State of Oregon 
Department of Environmental Quality (“ODEQ”) and the EPA, and our operations in Oregon are subject to or 
may be impacted by ODEQ regulations, standards, and programs aimed at limiting GHG emissions and toxic 
air emissions in the state including from large stationary sources such as our steel mill and Portland metals 
recycling facility. The implementation of such regulations, standards, and programs and any associated 
costs, including any operating or capital expenditures, are uncertain, but may be material to our results of 
operations, cash ﬂows, and ﬁnancial position. In addition, we have and continue to incur material capital 
expenditures to enclose and install additional emission controls for our shredders to meet air emission 
standards or other regulatory requirements. See “Compliance with existing and future climate change, 
greenhouse gas, and other air emission laws and regulations may adversely impact our operating results” in 
Part I, Item 1A. Risk Factors. Our steel mill has an operating permit issued under Title V of the Clean Air Act 
Amendments of 1990, which governs certain air quality standards. The permit is based on an annual 
production capacity of approximately 950 thousand tons. The permit was ﬁrst issued in 1998 and has since 
been renewed multiple times, most recently in April 2020 extending the permit through April 1, 2025. By 
letter dated June 22, 2023, ODEQ notiﬁed us that it intended to reopen our Title V permit for the steel mill for 
the purpose of incorporating the emissions of a third-party contractor that has operated on a portion of the 
site for decades. We have objected to such action and are engaged in discussions with ODEQ.
Federal, state, and local regulators have increased their focus on metals recycling and auto dismantling 
facilities that has or could lead to new or expanding regulatory requirements. For example, the California 
Department of Toxic Substances Control (“DTSC”) has increased its enforcement actions and sought to 
impose additional permitting and regulatory requirements on the metals recycling industry in the state that 
has resulted in increased, and could in the future further increase, operating and compliance costs and 
require additional capital expenditures. In addition, in July 2021, the EPA issued an enforcement alert 
reﬂecting a national enforcement initiative in conjunction with state regulators focused on Clean Air Act 
compliance at metal recycling facilities that operate auto and scrap metal shredders. While we believe we 
are an industry leader in air emission controls and have been working with state and local regulators on 
compliance and permitting matters, we have in the past and may in the future be subject to enforcement 
actions or litigation by regulators or private parties that could result in additional penalties, compliance 
requirements, or capital investments. See Part I, Item 3. Legal Proceedings of this report.
The U.S. Federal Government and state and local regulators are also emphasizing eﬀorts to strengthen 
environmental compliance and enforcement, including with respect to clean-up actions under superfund and 
hazardous waste laws, in overburdened communities that may be disproportionately impacted by adverse 
health and environmental eﬀects. On September 10, 2021, U.S. EPA Region 9 and the California 
Environmental Protection Agency announced a joint eﬀort to expand environmental enforcement in 
overburdened California communities. These initiatives could result in increased enforcement, compliance, 
and clean-up costs, including increased capital expenditures, at our facilities located at or near such 
communities.
10 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
Although our objective is to maintain compliance with applicable environmental laws and regulations, we 
have, in the past, incurred liabilities, expenditures, ﬁnes, and penalties associated with violations of certain 
of these laws and regulations. In December 2000, for example, we were notiﬁed by the EPA that we are one 
of the potentially responsible parties that owns or operates, or formerly owned or operated, sites which are 
part of or adjacent to the Portland Harbor Superfund site (“Portland Harbor”). Further, we have been notiﬁed 
that we are or may be a potentially responsible party at sites other than Portland Harbor currently or 
formerly owned or operated by us or at other sites where we may have responsibility for such costs due to 
past disposal or other activities. Storm water regulation and compliance is also the subject of regulatory 
oversight and has resulted and is expected in the future to result in increased operating costs and capital 
expenditures.
See further discussion of Portland Harbor and other environmental-related matters in Part I, Item 1A. Risk 
Factors and Note 10 - Commitments and Contingencies in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial 
Statements in Part II, Item 8 of this report.
We incurred capital expenditures related to environmental projects of $33 million, $35 million, and $21 
million in ﬁscal 2023, 2022, and 2021, respectively, and we expect to spend approximately $35 million on 
capital expenditures related to environmental projects in ﬁscal 2024.
Indirect Consequences of Recent or Future Legislation and Regulation
Recent or future legislation or increased regulation regarding climate change and GHG emissions could 
impose signiﬁcant costs on our business and our customers and suppliers, including increased energy, 
capital equipment, emissions controls, environmental monitoring and reporting, information technology 
systems, and other costs in order to comply with laws and regulations concerning and limitations imposed 
on climate change and GHG emissions. The potential costs of allowances, taxes, fees, oﬀsets, or credits that 
may be part of “cap and trade” programs or similar future legislative or regulatory measures are still 
uncertain, and the future of these programs or measures is unknown. Any adopted future climate change 
and GHG laws or regulations could negatively impact our ability (and that of our customers and suppliers) to 
compete with companies situated in areas not subject to or complying with such requirements. Furthermore, 
even without such laws or regulations, increased awareness and any adverse publicity in the global 
marketplace about the GHGs emitted by companies in the metals recycling and steel manufacturing 
industries could harm our reputation and reduce customer demand for our products.
GHG legislation and regulation are expected to have an eﬀect on the future price of transportation fuels, 
natural gas used in the manufacturing process including at our steel mill, and electricity, especially 
electricity generated using carbon-based fuels. Since the electricity supply for our steel mill includes a 
signiﬁcant element of hydro-generated production which is not subject to GHG legislation and regulation, its 
energy costs are less likely to be impacted than those of competitors using electricity generated by carbon-
based fuels. In addition, demand for recycled metal may increase from mills with blast furnaces as they 
seek to maximize the recycled metal component of raw material infeed, which requires less energy than 
melting iron ore.
Because the use of recycled iron and steel instead of iron ore to make new steel results in savings in the 
consumption of energy, virgin materials, and water and reduces mining wastes and other harmful 
environmental impacts, we believe our recycled metal products and recycling services position us to be 
more competitive in the future for business from companies wishing to reduce their carbon footprint and 
impact on the environment. In addition, the EAF at our steel mill generates signiﬁcantly less GHG emissions 
than traditional blast furnaces.
Physical Impacts of Climate Change on Our Costs and Operations
There has been public discussion that climate change may be associated with higher temperatures, lower 
snowpack, drier forests, rising sea levels as well as extreme weather events and conditions such as more 
intense hurricanes, thunderstorms, tornadoes, wildﬁres, and snow or ice storms. For instance, although the 
impact on our operations was not signiﬁcant, certain of our facilities in Puerto Rico have experienced 
damage due to hurricanes, including as a result of Hurricane Fiona in September 2022, and certain of our 
facilities in California, Oregon, and Washington were brieﬂy closed in September 2020 due to poor air quality 
as a result of wildﬁres. Extreme weather conditions may increase our costs or cause damage to our 
facilities, and any damage resulting from extreme weather may not be fully insured. As many of our 
recycling facilities are located near deepwater ports, rising sea levels may disrupt our ability to receive 
scrap metal, process the scrap metal through our shredders, and ship products to our customers. Periods of 
extended adverse weather conditions may inhibit construction activity utilizing our products, scrap metal 
inﬂows to our recycling facilities, retail admissions and parts sales at our auto parts stores, and provision of 
our recycling services. Potential adverse impacts from climate change, including rising temperatures and 
extreme weather events and conditions, may create health and safety issues for employees operating at our 
facilities and may lead to an inability to maintain standard operating hours.
11 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
Human Capital Resources
Employees
We hire employees from across the United States, Puerto Rico, and Canada and have employees residing in 
all states, territories, and provinces in which we operate. We aim to oﬀer a competitive compensation 
package and suite of beneﬁts that align our employees with the interests of our strategic long-term growth 
and our customers, communities, and shareholders. As of August 31, 2023, we had 3,353 full-time 
employees, 763 of whom were covered by collective bargaining agreements. Of our full-time employees as 
of August 31, 2023, approximately 95% resided in the United States.
Engagement
We believe employee engagement contributes signiﬁcantly to our operational performance, achievement of 
our strategic goals, and the growth and development of our employees. Our leaders sponsor and, in many 
cases, lead employee engagement initiatives focusing on diversity, equity, inclusion, volunteering, 
community involvement, and job satisfaction. For example, our numerous Employee Resource Groups aim to 
broaden awareness of the diverse characteristics of our workforce and others, and we often survey our 
employees to gain feedback about our culture, employee experience, and leadership behaviors. In July 2023, 
for the third consecutive year, we were recognized as a certiﬁed Great Place to Work®. Achieving this 
prominent designation followed an all-employee Trust Index Survey process which had requested the views 
and beliefs of our employees.
Health & Safety
Safety is one of our core values. Our approach to safety is proactive and focuses on active leadership, 
fostering care and engagement, risk and hazard identiﬁcation, training, frequent veriﬁcation of the controls 
associated with higher-risk processes, applying what we learn from incidents, and using data to analyze and 
obtain insights to help reduce injuries and incidents. Creating a positive health and safety culture takes time 
and visible leadership that demonstrates care and concern for the health and safety of our employees.
We regularly track and evaluate numerous leading indicators, which are proactive, preventive, and 
predictive measures that provide information about the eﬀective performance of our health and safety 
systems, processes, and critical controls, and which allow us to take preventive action to address lapses or 
hazards before they turn into an incident. Leading indicators that we use in connection with our health and 
safety programs include employee training and attendance, workplace inspections, corrective action closure 
rates, hazard response time analysis, and frequency and quality of layered safety observations conducted at 
all levels of the organization.
We also track health and safety performance using industry-standard metrics including but not limited to the 
following:
•Total Case Incident Rate (“TCIR”)
•Days Away, Restricted, or Transferred (“DART”) Rate
•Lost Time Incident Rate (“LTIR”)
We work continuously to improve all aspects of our health and safety performance. Our safety strategy 
emphasizes the prevention of serious injuries and fatalities, works toward achieving zero injuries, and 
empowers employees to cultivate personal safety leadership. With zero injuries as our ultimate aspiration, 
we are working toward a near-term goal of a 1.00 TCIR by the end of ﬁscal 2025 (one recordable injury per 
200,000 working hours). In ﬁscal year 2023, we observed ﬂuctuations in our lagging safety indicators. While 
there was a year-over-year increase in recordable injuries and associated rates in ﬁscal 2023, we also 
observed an overall decrease in the severity and number of signiﬁcant injuries. Enhanced safety 
engagements counterbalanced these ﬂuctuations, increased hourly participation in workplace observations, 
and improved incident learning and communications practices, reﬂecting our commitment to ongoing safety 
improvement.
12 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
Ethics 
Our employees, both union and non-union, participate in annual training on our Company’s Core Values of 
Safety, Sustainability, and Integrity, which includes instruction on our Code of Conduct and ethical behavior. 
The training includes important topics such as reporting misconduct, prohibition against retaliation, 
diversity, equity, and inclusion, and the Company's sustainability program. We also provide training to 
employees regarding unconscious bias. We empower employees to raise issues and concerns regarding 
compliance with our Code of Conduct, Company policies, and the law by oﬀering multiple reporting 
channels, including a third-party, conﬁdential, multi-lingual misconduct reporting system where employees 
may choose to remain anonymous. We investigate all reports received through actionable channels. In 
addition to our Code of Conduct and related training, we have a comprehensive Anticorruption Program, 
inclusive of an overarching Anticorruption Policy available to all employees that details prohibitions against 
bribery, money laundering, and engaging with terrorists or other sanctioned entities, as well as internal 
controls. The broader program includes third-party vetting and monitoring, contract provisions, and 
employee engagement and training.
For the ninth consecutive year, we were named one of the 2023 World’s Most Ethical Companies by the 
Ethisphere Institute. This award is given to companies that foster a culture of ethics and transparency at 
every level of the company by demonstrating leadership across ﬁve key categories: ethics and compliance 
programs; environmental and societal impacts; culture of ethics; governance; and leadership and reputation. 
Through the annual process of applying for this award and analyzing our scores across all categories, we 
gain signiﬁcant insight into current best practices and can plan and implement improvements to our 
Company-wide communications, training programs, and other initiatives to enhance our culture.
Executive Oﬃcers of the Company
The executive oﬃcers of the Company are elected each year at the organizational meeting of the Board of 
Directors, which follows the annual meeting of the shareholders, and at other Board of Directors meetings, 
as appropriate.
At October 25, 2023, the executive oﬃcers of the Company were as follows:
 
Name  Age Oﬃce
Tamara L. Lundgren  66  Chairman, President and Chief Executive Oﬃcer
Richard D. Peach  60  Executive Vice President and Chief Strategy Oﬃcer
Stefano R. Gaggini  52  Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Oﬃcer
Steven G. Heiskell  54  Senior Vice President and President, Recycling Products & Services
Brian Souza  54  Senior Vice President and Chief Operations Management Oﬃcer
James Matthew 
Vaughn 51  Senior Vice President, General Counsel, Chief Compliance Oﬃcer and 
Corporate Secretary
Erich D. Wilson  55  Senior Vice President, Chief Human Resources Oﬃcer and Chief of 
Corporate Operations
Mark Schuessler  44  Vice President and Chief Accounting Oﬃcer
 
(1)Ms. Lundgren was appointed President and Chief Executive Oﬃcer in December 2008 and was appointed Chairman of 
the Board of Directors in March 2020.
(2)Mr. Peach was appointed Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Oﬃcer in December 2007. Mr. Peach also served as 
Chief of Corporate Operations from September 2016 until March 2020 and was appointed Executive Vice President, 
Chief Financial Oﬃcer and Chief Strategy Oﬃcer in March 2020. Mr. Peach was appointed Executive Vice President and 
Chief Strategy Oﬃcer eﬀective September 1, 2022.
(3)Mr. Gaggini served as Vice President, Corporate Controller and Chief Accounting Oﬃcer from December 2013 until 
September 2018. Mr. Gaggini then served as Vice President, Deputy Chief Financial Oﬃcer and Chief Accounting Oﬃcer 
from September 2018 until August 2022. Mr. Gaggini was appointed to Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Oﬃcer 
eﬀective September 1, 2022.
(4)Mr. Heiskell served as Senior Vice President and Co-President of the Auto and Metals Recycling business from April 2015 
until March 2020. Mr. Heiskell was appointed Senior Vice President and President, Recycling Products & Services in 
March 2020.
(5)Mr. Souza served as a Regional Director from August 2013 until May 2015. Mr. Souza then served as Chief Business 
Oﬃcer & Vice President of Ferrous Sales from May 2015 until April 2020. Mr. Souza then served as Vice President and 
Chief of Ferrous Sales & Trading from April 2020 until June 2023. Mr. Souza was appointed Senior Vice President and 
Chief Operations Management Oﬃcer eﬀective June 26, 2023.
(6)Mr. Vaughn was appointed Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Corporate Secretary eﬀective September 1, 2022 
and Chief Compliance Oﬃcer eﬀective January 6, 2023. Prior to joining the Company, Mr. Vaughn served in various 
executive positions at Par Paciﬁc Holdings, Inc., an oil and gas exploration and production company, from July of 2014 
through August of 2022.(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
(6)
(7)
(8)
(7)Mr. Wilson served as Director, Human Resource Operations from August 2015 until March 2020. Mr. Wilson was 
appointed Senior Vice President, Chief Human Resources Oﬃcer and Chief of Corporate Operations in March 2020.
(8)Mr. Schuessler has served in various roles in the Company's SEC Reporting and Technical Accounting department since 
joining the Company in November of 2011. He then served as Vice President, Accounting and Reporting from April 2021 
until August 2022. Mr. Schuessler was appointed Vice President and Chief Accounting Oﬃcer eﬀective September 1, 
2022.
13 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
Available Information
Our Internet website address is www.radiusrecycling.com. We make available on our website, free of 
charge, under the caption “Investors – SEC Filings” our annual report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 
10-Q, current reports on Form 8-K, and amendments to those reports as soon as reasonably practicable after 
electronically ﬁling with or furnishing such materials to the Securities and Exchange Commission (“SEC”) 
pursuant to Sections 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. Also available on our website are 
our deﬁnitive Proxy Statements and ownership reports pursuant to Section 16(a) of the Securities Act of 
1933. Copies of these ﬁlings may also be obtained from the SEC’s website (www.sec.gov).
We may use our website as a channel for distributing material Company information. Financial and other 
material information regarding our Company is routinely posted on and accessible at 
www.radiusrecycling.com/investors.aspx. You may register your e-mail under the caption “Investors – E-
mail Alerts” to receive e-mail notiﬁcations of new company information.
The content of our website is not incorporated by reference into this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
Described below are risks, which are categorized as “Risk Factors Relating to Our Business,” “Risk Factors 
Relating to the Regulatory Environment,” and “Risk Factors Relating to Our Employees,” that could have a 
material adverse eﬀect on our results of operations, ﬁnancial condition, and cash ﬂows or could cause actual 
results to diﬀer materially from the results contemplated by the forward-looking statements contained in 
this Annual Report. See “Forward-Looking Statements” that precedes Part I of this report. Additional risks and 
uncertainties that we are unaware of or that we currently deem immaterial may in the future have a 
material adverse eﬀect on our results of operations, ﬁnancial condition, and cash ﬂows.
Risk Factors Relating to Our Business
Potential costs related to the environmental cleanup of Portland Harbor may be material to our 
ﬁnancial position and liquidity
In December 2000, we were notiﬁed by the United States Environmental Protection Agency (“EPA”) under the 
Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (“CERCLA”) that we are one of the 
potentially responsible parties (“PRPs”) that owns or operates or formerly owned or operated sites which are 
part of or adjacent to Portland Harbor. In January 2017, the EPA issued a Record of Decision (“ROD”) that 
identiﬁed the selected remedy for Portland Harbor. The EPA has estimated the total cost of the selected 
remedy at $1.7 billion with a net present value cost of $1.05 billion (at a 7% discount rate) and an estimated 
construction period of 13 years following completion of the remedial designs. In the ROD, the EPA stated that 
the cost estimate is an order-of-magnitude engineering estimate that is expected to be within +50% to -30% 
of the actual project cost and that changes in the cost elements are likely to occur as a result of new 
information and data collected during the engineering design. Accordingly, the ﬁnal cost may diﬀer 
materially from that set forth in the ROD. The ROD provided only site-wide cost estimates and did not 
provide suﬃcient detail to estimate costs for speciﬁc sediment management areas within Portland Harbor. In 
addition, the ROD did not determine or allocate the responsibility for remediation costs among the PRPs. 
Except for certain early action projects in which we are not involved, remediation activities at Portland 
Harbor are not expected to commence for a number of years. Moreover, those activities are expected to be 
sequenced, and the order and timing of such sequencing has not been determined. We have joined with 
approximately 100 other PRPs in a voluntary process to establish an allocation of costs at Portland Harbor. 
We expect the next major stage of the allocation process to proceed in parallel with the remedial design 
process. In addition to the remedial action process overseen by the EPA, the Portland Harbor Natural 
Resource Trustee Council (“Trustee Council”) is assessing natural resource damages at Portland Harbor. We 
are working with the Trustee Council to ﬁnalize an early settlement of our alleged natural resource damage 
liability at Portland Harbor. Our environmental liabilities as of August 31, 2023 and 2022 included $5 million 
and $6 million, respectively, relating to the Portland Harbor matters described above. Because the ﬁnal 
remedial actions have not yet been designed and there has not been a determination of the allocation 
among the PRPs of costs of the investigations or remedial action costs, we believe it is not possible to 
reasonably estimate the amount or range of costs which we are likely to or which it is reasonably possible 
that we will incur in connection with Portland Harbor, although such costs could be material to our ﬁnancial 
position, results of operations, cash ﬂows, and liquidity. Among the facts being evaluated are detailed 
information on the history of ownership of and the nature of the uses of and activities and operations 
performed on each property within Portland Harbor, which are factors that will play a substantial role in 
determining the allocation of investigation and remedy costs among the PRPs. We have insurance policies 
that we believe will provide reimbursement for costs we incur for defense, remedial design, remedial action, 
and mitigation for or settlement of natural resource damages claims in connection with Portland Harbor. 
Most of these policies jointly insure us and MMGL, LLC (“MMGL”), an unaﬃliated company, as the successor 
to a former subsidiary. We and MMGL have negotiated the settlement with certain insurers of claims against 
us related to Portland Harbor, continue to seek settlements with other insurers, and formed two Qualiﬁed 
Settlement Funds (“QSFs”) which became operative in ﬁscal 2020 and the second quarter of ﬁscal 2023, 
respectively, to hold such settlement amounts until funds are needed to pay or 
14 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
reimburse costs incurred by us and MMGL in connection with Portland Harbor. These insurance policies and 
the funds in the QSFs may not cover all of the costs which we may incur.
The Oregon Department of Environmental Quality is separately providing oversight of our investigations and 
source control activities at various sites adjacent to Portland Harbor that are focused on controlling any 
current “uplands” releases of contaminants into the Willamette River. We have accrued liabilities for source 
control and related work at two sites, reﬂecting estimated costs of primarily investigation and design, which 
costs have not been material in the aggregate to date. No liabilities have been established in connection 
with investigations for any other sites because the extent of contamination, required source control work, 
and our responsibility for the contamination and source control work, in each case if any, have not yet been 
determined. In addition, pursuant to our insurance policies, we are being reimbursed for the costs we incur 
for required source control evaluation and remediation work.
Signiﬁcant cash outﬂows in the future related to Portland Harbor could reduce the amount of our borrowing 
capacity that could otherwise be used for investment in capital expenditures, acquisitions, dividends, and 
share repurchases. Any material liabilities or cash expenditures, net of recoveries, incurred in the future 
related to Portland Harbor could result in our failure to maintain compliance with certain covenants in our 
debt agreements. See “Contingencies – Environmental” in Note 10 - Commitments and Contingencies in the 
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8 of this report for further detail on these 
matters.
Goodwill impairment charges may adversely aﬀect our operating results
Goodwill represents the excess purchase price over the net amount of identiﬁable assets acquired and 
liabilities assumed in a business combination measured at fair value. As of August 31, 2023 and 2022, we 
had $229 million and $255 million, respectively, of goodwill on our balance sheet. We test the goodwill 
balances allocated to our reporting units for impairment on an annual basis and when events occur or 
circumstances change that indicate that the fair value of one or more of our reporting units with allocated 
goodwill may be below its carrying amount. When testing goodwill for impairment, we may be required to 
measure the fair value of the reporting units as of a particular measurement date in order to determine the 
amount of impairment, if any. Market prices of our reporting units are not readily available; therefore, we 
typically estimate the fair value of reporting units with allocated goodwill using an income approach based 
on the present value of expected future cash ﬂows, including terminal value, utilizing a market-based 
weighted average cost of capital (“WACC”) determined separately for each applicable reporting unit. The 
determination of fair value under this income approach involves the use of estimates and assumptions, 
including regarding revenue growth rates driven by future ferrous and nonferrous commodity price and sales 
volume expectations, gross margins, selling, general, and administrative expense relative to total revenues, 
capital expenditures, working capital requirements, discount rate (WACC), tax rate, terminal growth rate, 
beneﬁts associated with a taxable transaction, and synergistic beneﬁts available to market participants. In 
addition, to corroborate a reporting unit’s income approach valuation, as well as to estimate the fair value of 
our other reporting units, including those with no allocated goodwill, we use a market approach based on 
earnings multiple data, and we perform a reconciliation of our estimate of the aggregate fair value of all 
reporting units to our market capitalization, including consideration of a control premium. Fair value 
determinations require considerable judgment and are sensitive to inherent uncertainties and changes in the 
estimates and assumptions described above. Furthermore, we estimate the fair value of our reporting units 
as of a particular measurement date, most recently as of our ﬁscal 2023 annual goodwill impairment test 
date of July 1, 2023, based on information available to management as of the measurement date. Therefore, 
the impact of, for example, changes in market conditions after the measurement date may not be fully 
captured in management’s estimates and assumptions reﬂected in the fair values as of the measurement 
date.
As of our ﬁscal 2023 annual goodwill impairment test date of July 1, 2023, we performed the quantitative 
goodwill impairment test for three of our reporting units with allocated goodwill, and we recorded an 
impairment charge of $39 million, representing a portion of the carrying amount of goodwill allocated to one 
reporting unit. A lack of recovery or further deterioration in market conditions for recycled metals from 
current levels, a sustained trend of weaker than anticipated ﬁnancial performance for the reporting units 
with allocated goodwill, including the pace and extent of operating margin and volume recovery, a lack of 
recovery or further decline in our share price from current levels for a sustained period, or an increase in the 
market-based WACC, among other factors, could signiﬁcantly impact our impairment analysis and may 
result in future goodwill impairment charges that, if incurred, could have a material adverse eﬀect on our 
ﬁnancial condition and results of operations. See Note 8 - Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets, net in the 
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8 of this report.
Equipment upgrades, equipment failures, and facility damage may lead to production 
curtailments or shutdowns
Our business operations and recycling and manufacturing processes depend on critical pieces of equipment, 
including information technology equipment, shredders, nonferrous sorting technology, furnaces, and a 
rolling mill, which may be out of service occasionally for scheduled upgrades or maintenance or as a result 
of unanticipated failures or events. Our facilities are subject to equipment failures and the risk of 
catastrophic loss due to unanticipated events such as mechanical failures, ﬁres, earthquakes, accidents, or 
violent weather conditions. For instance, although the impact on our operations as a result of natural 
disasters has not been signiﬁcant to date, certain of 
15 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
our facilities in Puerto Rico have experienced damage due to hurricanes, including as a result of Hurricane 
Fiona in September 2022, and certain facilities in California, Oregon, and Washington were brieﬂy closed in 
September 2020 due to poor air quality as a result of wildﬁres. Additionally, we experienced a ﬁre at our 
Cascade Steel Rolling Mills in McMinnville, Oregon in May 2021 as well as at our metals recycling facility in 
Everett, Massachusetts in December 2021. Direct physical loss or damage to property from these incidents 
was limited to the mill’s melt shop in the case of the steel mill and to the shredder building and equipment 
in the case of the Everett recycling facility, with no bodily injuries and no physical loss or damage to other 
buildings or equipment. With respect to the Everett facility shredder ﬁre, on January 28, 2022, shredding 
operations at the facility began ramping up following the replacement and repairs to shredder equipment 
that had been damaged. In addition, shredding operations temporarily ceased at the facility on June 18, 
2022, and, following discussions with the Massachusetts Department of Environmental Protection and the 
Massachusetts Attorney General’s oﬃce, we installed a temporary emission capture system and controls 
that allowed for the resumption of shredding operations on November 11, 2022, and for continued operation 
during the repair and replacement of the shredder enclosure building. Non-shredding operations at the 
facility continued during this period. The repair and replacement of most property that experienced physical 
loss or damage, primarily buildings and improvements, was substantially completed by the end of our ﬁscal 
2023. While we carry insurance that we anticipate will cover repair and replacement of property that 
experienced physical loss or damage and business income losses resulting from these ﬁres, as discussed in 
Part II, Item 7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations, our 
insurance coverage is subject to deductibles, and various conditions, exclusions, and limits. Moreover, our 
insurance coverage may be unavailable or insuﬃcient to protect us against losses in the case of future 
events. In addition, insurance may not continue to be available in the future on acceptable terms or at 
acceptable costs. Interruptions in our processing and production capabilities and shutdowns resulting from 
unanticipated events also could disrupt customer and supplier relationships and could have a material 
adverse eﬀect on our ﬁnancial condition, results of operations, and cash ﬂows.
Failure to realize or delays in realizing expected beneﬁts from capital projects, including 
investments in processing and manufacturing technology improvements and information 
technology systems, may impact our ﬁnancial condition, operating results, and cash ﬂows
We may engage in capital projects based on the forecasted project economics, political and regulatory 
environments, and the expected return on the capital to be employed in the project. Large-scale projects 
may take many years to complete, during which time the political and regulatory environment or other 
market conditions may change from our forecast. For example, we make signiﬁcant investments in 
processing and manufacturing technology improvements and other information technology systems aimed 
at increasing the eﬃciency and capabilities of our businesses and to maximize our economies of scale. 
Completion of and realization of the beneﬁts from such improvements may be subject to many factors 
including, but not limited to, permitting, construction, equipment delivery, commissioning and ramp up, 
environmental compliance, and technology performance risks, some of which are outside our control and 
could result in further delays in such projects or require us to incur additional costs. Vendors may be unable 
to deliver on their commitments and permitting agencies may be delayed in issuing necessary permits 
which can cause construction, commissioning, and ramp-up time to take signiﬁcantly longer than expected. 
For example, we have experienced some delays in construction activities and equipment deliveries related 
to our capital projects, and to the time required to obtain permits from government agencies, resulting in the 
deferral of certain capital expenditures and in the timing of realization of the anticipated beneﬁts of the 
technology improvements.  We have also experienced increased commissioning and ramp-up times on 
some projects. Failure to realize or delays in realizing the anticipated beneﬁts and to generate adequate 
returns on such capital projects may have a material adverse eﬀect on our ﬁnancial condition, results of 
operations, and cash ﬂows.
We operate in industries that are cyclical and sensitive to general economic conditions, which 
could have a material adverse eﬀect on our operating results, ﬁnancial condition, and cash 
ﬂows
Demand for most of our products is cyclical in nature and sensitive to general economic conditions. The 
timing and magnitude of the cycles in the industries in which our products are used, including global steel 
manufacturing and nonresidential and infrastructure construction in the U.S., are diﬃcult to predict. The 
cyclical nature of our operations tends to reﬂect and be ampliﬁed by changes in economic conditions, both 
domestically and internationally, the eﬀects of inﬂation, changes in interest rates, and foreign currency 
exchange ﬂuctuations. Increasing interest rates, both domestically and internationally, could lead to 
slowdowns in global investment and production, resulting in reduced generation of scrap and decreased 
demand for our products. For example, export net selling prices for recycled ferrous metal decreased by 
approximately $230 per ton, or approximately 40%, between May and June 2022, reﬂecting weaker demand 
primarily from slower global growth, including due to the impact of COVID-19 lockdowns in China, 
inﬂationary pressure including high energy prices, the strength of the U.S. Dollar, and steel inventory 
destocking. Similarly, market demand for most recycled nonferrous metals softened beginning in May 2022 
resulting in selling prices declining sharply for a period followed by a partial recovery near the end of ﬁscal 
2022. During ﬁscal 2023, we experienced periods of market recovery, but market conditions for recycled 
metals were weaker overall in comparison to ﬁscal 2022. In addition, in ﬁscal 2022 and 2023, increasing 
inﬂation impacted our operating costs, including, but not limited to, employee compensation costs and 
certain costs of production. Economic downturns 
16 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
or a prolonged period of slow growth in the U.S. and foreign markets or any of the industries in which we 
operate could have a material adverse eﬀect on our results of operations, ﬁnancial condition, and cash ﬂows.
Changing conditions in global markets including the impact of sanctions and tariﬀs, quotas, and 
other trade actions and import restrictions may adversely aﬀect our operating results, ﬁnancial 
condition, and cash ﬂows
We generate a substantial portion of our revenues from sales to customers located outside the U.S., 
including countries in Asia, the Mediterranean region, and North, Central, and South America. In each of the 
last three years, exports comprised approximately 55 to 66 percent of our ferrous sales volumes and 57 to 
63 percent of our nonferrous sales volumes. Our ability to sell our products proﬁtably, or at all, into 
international markets is subject to a number of risks including adverse impacts of political, economic, 
military, terrorist, or major pandemic events; labor and social issues; legal and regulatory requirements or 
limitations imposed by foreign governments including quotas, tariﬀs, or other protectionist trade barriers, 
sanctions, adverse tax law changes, nationalization, currency restrictions, or import restrictions for certain 
types of products we export; and disruptions or delays in shipments caused by customs compliance or other 
actions of government agencies. The occurrence of such events and conditions may adversely aﬀect our 
operating results, ﬁnancial condition, and cash ﬂows.
For example, in ﬁscal 2017, regulators in China began implementing the National Sword initiative involving 
inspections of Chinese industrial enterprises, including recyclers, in order to identify rules violations with 
respect to discharge of pollutants or illegally transferred scrap imports. Restrictions resulting from the 
National Sword initiative include a ban on certain imported recycled products, lower contamination limits for 
permitted recycled materials, and more comprehensive pre- and post-shipment inspection requirements. 
Disruptions in pre-inspection certiﬁcations and stringent inspection procedures at certain Chinese destination 
ports have limited access to these destinations and resulted in the renegotiation or cancellation of certain 
nonferrous customer contracts in connection with the redirection of such shipments to alternate 
destinations. Commencing July 1, 2019, China imposed further restrictions in the form of import license 
requirements and quotas on certain scrap products, including certain nonferrous products we sell. Chinese 
import licenses and quotas are issued to Chinese scrap consumers on a quarterly basis for the importation of 
scrap products. Since the implementation of this program, the size of import quotas has been steadily 
reduced on a quarter-over-quarter basis. We have continued to sell our recycled metal products into China; 
however, additional or modiﬁed license requirements and quotas, as well as additional product quality 
requirements, may be issued in the future. We believe that the potential impact on our recycling operations 
of the Chinese regulatory actions described above could include requirements that would necessitate 
additional processing and packaging of certain recycled nonferrous metal products, increased inspection and 
certiﬁcation activities with respect to exports to China, or a change in the use of our sales channels in the 
event of delays in the issuance of licenses, restrictive quotas, or an outright ban on certain or all of our 
recycled metals products by China. As regulatory developments progress, we may need to make further 
investments in nonferrous processing equipment beyond existing planned investments where economically 
justiﬁed, incur additional costs in order to comply with new inspection requirements, or seek alternative 
markets for the impacted products, which may result in lower sales prices or higher costs and may 
adversely impact our business or results of operations.
In March 2018, the U.S. imposed a 25 percent tariﬀ on certain imported steel products and a 10 percent tariﬀ 
on certain imported aluminum products under Section 232 of the Trade Expansion Act of 1962. Currently, 
imports from certain countries are exempt from these duties pursuant to various agreements, including 
quotas. These tariﬀs, along with other U.S. trade actions, have triggered retaliatory actions by certain 
aﬀected countries, and other foreign governments may impose trade measures on other U.S. goods in the 
future. For example, China has imposed a series of retaliatory tariﬀs on certain U.S. products, including a 25 
percent tariﬀ on all grades of U.S. scrap and an additional 25 percent tariﬀ on U.S. aluminum scrap. These 
tariﬀs and other trade actions could result in a decrease in international steel demand and negatively impact 
demand for our products, which would adversely impact our business. Given the uncertainty regarding the 
scope and duration of these trade actions by the U.S. or other countries, the impact of the trade actions on 
our operations or results remains uncertain, but this impact could be material.
Increases in the value of the U.S. dollar relative to other currencies may reduce the demand for 
our products
A signiﬁcant portion of our recycled metal revenues is generated from sales to foreign customers, which are 
denominated in U.S. dollars. At times during our 2022 and 2023 ﬁscal years, the U.S. dollar strengthened 
relative to other world currencies. A strengthening U.S. dollar makes our products more expensive for non-
U.S. customers, which may negatively impact our export sales. A strengthening U.S. dollar also makes 
imported metal products less expensive, which may result in an increase in imports of steel products into 
the U.S. As a result, our ﬁnished steel products, which are made in the U.S., may become more expensive for 
our U.S. customers relative to imported steel products thereby reducing demand for our products.
17 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
Economic and geopolitical instability including as a result of military conﬂict could have a 
material adverse eﬀect on our operating results, ﬁnancial condition, and cash ﬂows
In late February 2022, Russian military forces launched signiﬁcant military action against Ukraine, which has 
continued through the date of this report. We do not have operations in Russia or Ukraine. Nevertheless, the 
war between Russia and Ukraine and the resulting sanctions by U.S. and European governments, together 
with any additional future sanctions by them, could have a larger impact that expands into other 
geographies where we do business, including our supply chain, business partners, and customers in those 
markets, which could result in lost sales, supply shortages, commodity price ﬂuctuations, increased 
manufacturing costs, transportation logistics challenges, customer credit and liquidity issues, and lost 
eﬃciencies. The global energy crisis has been exacerbated by Russia's restrictions on energy exports which 
could similarly impact the geographies where we do business. In addition, the U.S. has taken certain trade 
actions as a result of the Russia-Ukraine conﬂict, which could result in retaliatory measures or actions, 
including tariﬀs, by Russia. While signiﬁcant uncertainty exists with respect to this matter, the Russia-
Ukraine conﬂict and its broader impacts, including any increased trade barriers or restrictions on global trade 
imposed by the U.S. or further retaliatory trade measures taken by Russia or other countries in response, 
could have a material adverse eﬀect on our operating results, ﬁnancial condition, and cash ﬂows.
Changes in the availability or price of inputs such as raw materials and end-of-life vehicles could 
reduce our sales
Our businesses require certain materials that are sourced from third-party suppliers. Although the synergies 
from our integrated operations allow us to be our own source for some raw materials, particularly with 
respect to recycled metal for our steel manufacturing operations, we rely on other suppliers for most of our 
raw material and other input needs, including inputs to steel production such as graphite electrodes, alloys, 
and other required consumables. Industry supply conditions generally involve risks, including the possibility 
of shortages of raw materials, increases in raw material and other input costs, and reduced control over 
delivery schedules. We procure our scrap inventory from numerous sources. These suppliers generally are 
not bound by long-term contracts and have no obligation to sell scrap metal to us. In periods of declining or 
lower recycled metal prices, suppliers may elect to hold scrap metal to wait for higher prices or intentionally 
slow their metal collection activities, tightening supply. The eﬀects of competition for supply of scrap metal, 
including of speciﬁc grades, can signiﬁcantly impact the ﬂow of scrap volumes into our facilities, our metal 
spreads, and our operating margins. If a substantial number of suppliers cease selling scrap metal to us, we 
will be unable to recycle metal at desired levels, and our results of operations and ﬁnancial condition could 
be materially adversely aﬀected. For instance, in ﬁscal 2023, a slowdown in economic growth in the U.S., 
coupled with rising interest rates and inﬂation, led consumers and businesses to hold on to vehicles longer, 
constraining the supply of scrap metal including end-of-life vehicles, which resulted in signiﬁcantly reduced 
processed volumes. A slowdown of industrial production in the U.S. may also reduce the supply of industrial 
grades of metal to the metals recycling industry, resulting in less recyclable metal available to process and 
market. Increased competition for domestic scrap metal, including as a result of overcapacity or 
consolidation in the metal recycling industry in the U.S. and Canada, may also reduce the supply of scrap 
metal available to us. Failure to obtain a steady supply of recyclable material could both adversely impact 
our ability to meet sales commitments and reduce our operating margins. Failure to obtain an adequate 
supply of end-of-life vehicles, including due to increasing trends over time in the proportion of electric 
vehicles sold to total vehicles sold, the pace of and the auto recycling industry response to which are 
uncertain, could adversely impact our ability to attract customers and charge admission fees and reduce 
parts sales at our auto parts stores. For example, cars purchased by our auto parts stores decreased by 8% 
in both ﬁscal 2022 and 2023, in each case compared to the prior ﬁscal year. Failure to obtain raw materials 
and other inputs to steel production, such as graphite electrodes, alloys, and other required consumables, 
could adversely impact our ability to make steel to the speciﬁcations of our customers.
Signiﬁcant decreases in recycled metal prices may adversely impact our operating results
The timing and magnitude of the cycles in the industries in which we operate are diﬃcult to predict and are 
inﬂuenced by diﬀerent economic conditions in the domestic market, where we typically acquire our raw 
materials, and foreign markets, where we typically sell the majority of our products. Purchase prices for 
scrap metal including end-of-life vehicles and selling prices for recycled metal are subject to market forces 
beyond our control. While we attempt to respond to changing recycled metal selling prices through 
adjustments to our metal purchase prices, our ability to do so is limited by competitive and other market 
factors. As a result, we may not be able to reduce our metal purchase prices to fully oﬀset a sharp reduction 
in recycled metal sales prices, which may adversely impact our operating income and cash ﬂows. In 
addition, a rapid decrease in selling prices may compress our operating margins due to the impact of 
average inventory cost accounting, which causes cost of goods sold recognized in the Consolidated 
Statements of Operations to decrease at a slower rate than metal purchase prices. For instance, in ﬁscal 
2022, after rising strongly and reaching a peak in April 2022, market selling prices for recycled ferrous and 
nonferrous metals declined sharply in May through June, reﬂecting weaker demand primarily from slower 
global growth, including due to the impact of China COVID-19 lockdowns, inﬂationary pressure including high 
energy prices, the strength of the U.S. Dollar, and steel inventory destocking. For example, export net selling 
prices for recycled ferrous metal decreased by approximately $230 per ton, or approximately 40%, between 
May and June 2022, causing our operating margins to compress signiﬁcantly in the fourth quarter of ﬁscal 
2022. Ferrous export net selling prices decreased further between the fourth quarter 
18 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
of ﬁscal 2022 and the ﬁrst quarter of ﬁscal 2023, which contributed to the sequential decrease in our 
quarterly results between those periods.
Imbalances in supply and demand conditions in the global steel industry may reduce demand 
for our products
Economic expansions and contractions in global economies can result in supply and demand imbalances in 
the global steel industry that can signiﬁcantly aﬀect the price of commodities used and sold by our business, 
as well as the price of and demand for ﬁnished steel products. In a number of foreign countries, such as 
China, steel producers are generally government-owned and may therefore make production decisions 
based on political or other factors that do not reﬂect free market conditions. In ﬁscal 2023 as well as in the 
past, overcapacity and excess steel production in these foreign countries resulted in the export of 
aggressively priced semi-ﬁnished and ﬁnished steel products. This led to disruptions in steel-making 
operations within other countries, negatively impacting demand for our recycled metal products used by EAF 
mills globally as their primary feedstock. Further, the import of foreign steel products into the U.S. at 
similarly aggressive prices have in the past adversely impacted ﬁnished steel sales prices and sales 
volumes. Existing or new trade laws and regulations may cause or be inadequate to prevent 
disadvantageous trade practices, which could have a material adverse eﬀect on our ﬁnancial condition and 
results of operations. Although trade regulations restrict or impose duties on the importation of certain 
products, if foreign steel production signiﬁcantly exceeds consumption in those countries, global demand for 
our recycled metal products could decline and imports of steel products into the U.S. could increase, 
resulting in lower volumes and selling prices for our recycled metal products and ﬁnished steel products.
Acquisitions and integration of acquired businesses may result in operating diﬃculties and 
other unintended consequences
We have made and may continue to make acquisitions of or expand into complementary businesses to 
enable us to expand our customer and supplier base and grow our revenues. Execution of any past or 
potential future acquisition or expansion involves several risks, including:
•Diﬃculty integrating the acquired businesses’ personnel and operations;
•Challenges in obtaining permits or meeting other regulatory requirements;
•Potential loss of key employees, customers, or suppliers of the acquired business;
•Diﬃculties in realizing anticipated cost savings, eﬃciencies, and synergies;
•Unexpected costs;
•Inaccurate assessment of or undisclosed liabilities;
•Inability to maintain uniform standards, controls, and procedures;
•Disruption to existing businesses; and
•Diﬃculty in managing growth.
If we do not successfully execute on acquisitions or expansions and the acquired or expanded businesses do 
not perform as projected, our ﬁnancial condition and results of operations could be materially adversely 
aﬀected.
Supply chain disruptions aﬀecting our customers, end users of our recycled products, or our 
suppliers could adversely impact the demand for our products or the availability of inputs, 
increase our costs, or otherwise adversely impact our business
Supply chain disruptions and related labor shortages and logistics constraints have and could continue to 
impact our customers, end users of our recycled products, and our suppliers and adversely impact our 
business. Direct and indirect impacts on our business of such supply chain disruptions could include 
reduction in the demand for and price of certain of our products, slowdown in ﬂows of scrap metal from 
certain supply channels, and reduced availability or increases in costs of other inputs, consumables, 
supplies, and capital equipment. Disruptions within our logistics or supply chain network could adversely 
aﬀect our ability to produce or deliver our products in a timely manner, which could impair our ability to 
meet customer demand for products and result in reduced volumes and sales, increased supply chain costs, 
or damage to our reputation. Such disruptions in the future may result from a number of factors beyond our 
control. Supply chain disruptions due to any of those factors could negatively impact our ﬁnancial 
performance or ﬁnancial condition.
Reliance on third-party shipping companies may restrict our ability to ship our products
We signiﬁcantly rely on third parties to handle and transport raw materials to our production facilities and 
products to customers. Despite our practice of utilizing a diversiﬁed group of suppliers of transportation, 
factors beyond our control, including changes in fuel prices, political events, governmental regulation of 
transportation, changes in market rates, carrier availability, carrier bankruptcy, labor 
19 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
shortages, shipping industry consolidation, and disruptions in transportation routes and infrastructure, may 
adversely impact our ability to ship our products and our operating margins. These impacts could include 
delays or other disruptions in shipments in transit, including as a result of congested seaports and travel 
routes, or third-party shipping companies increasing their charges for transportation services or otherwise 
reducing or eliminating the availability of their containers, vehicles, rail cars, barges, or ships. For example, 
during ﬁscal 2022 and 2021, worldwide demand for logistical services increased sharply, which led to a 
global shortage of available shipping containers, congested seaports, and higher freight rates, impacting the 
timing of certain shipments and resulting in reductions in sales volumes of certain products. The delays in 
container shipping for U.S. exports were exacerbated by the backlog of containerized imports at U.S. 
seaports. While we aim to pass on the majority of shipping and related charges to our customers, there can 
be no assurance that we will be able to do so into the future. As a result, we may not be able to transport our 
products in a timely and cost-eﬀective manner, which could have a material adverse eﬀect on our ﬁnancial 
condition and results of operations and may harm our reputation.
Impairment of assets other than goodwill may adversely aﬀect our operating results
Our long-lived asset groups are subject to an impairment assessment when certain triggering events or 
circumstances indicate that their carrying value may be impaired. If the carrying value of an asset group is 
not recoverable because it exceeds our estimate of future undiscounted cash ﬂows from the use and 
eventual disposition of the operations related to the asset group, an impairment loss is recognized by the 
amount the carrying value exceeds its fair value. The results of these tests for potential impairment, as well 
as the number and frequency of identiﬁed triggering events indicating potential impairment, may be 
adversely aﬀected by unfavorable market conditions, our ﬁnancial performance trends, or an increase in 
interest rates, among other factors. If, as a result of the impairment test, we determine that the fair value of 
any of our long-lived asset groups is less than its carrying amount, we may incur an impairment charge that 
could have a material adverse eﬀect on our ﬁnancial condition and results of operations. In addition to 
goodwill and long-lived assets, we carry other assets on our balance sheet that are subject to impairment 
testing and potential loss recognition in accordance with applicable accounting standards. These other 
assets include, but are not limited to, investments in the equity of unconsolidated entities, assets held for 
sale, and assets abandoned either before or after they are placed in service. We recorded impairment 
charges totaling $11 million on assets other than goodwill in ﬁscal 2023, comprising primarily $5 million 
relating to an equity investment and $5 million relating to capitalized implementation costs for an 
abandoned cloud computing arrangement. Impairment of assets other than goodwill, if incurred in the future, 
could have a material adverse eﬀect on our results of operations. See Note 2 - Summary of Signiﬁcant 
Accounting Policies in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8 of this report for 
further detail on long-lived asset impairment charges.
Public health emergencies, such as pandemics or epidemics, could have an adverse eﬀect on 
our business, results of operations, ﬁnancial condition, and cash ﬂows
Our operations expose us to risks associated with pandemics, epidemics, or other public health 
emergencies. Such events could lead to restrictions and mandates, which could be applied diﬀerently across 
jurisdictions, and there could be global impacts resulting directly or indirectly from such an event including 
labor shortages, logistical challenges, and supply chain disruptions such as increased port congestion, and 
increases in costs for certain goods and services. For instance, the onset of the coronavirus disease 2019 
(COVID-19) outbreak, which the World Health Organization characterized as a global public health 
emergency from March 2020 through May 2023, negatively aﬀected our business and ongoing global 
impacts have negatively aﬀected our sales volumes, operating costs, and ﬁnancial results to varying 
degrees and could continue to negatively aﬀect our results of operations, cash ﬂows, and ﬁnancial position 
in the future.
Inability to achieve or sustain the beneﬁts from productivity, cost savings, and restructuring 
initiatives may adversely impact our operating results
During the past several years, we implemented a number of productivity improvement, cost savings, and 
restructuring initiatives designed to reduce operating expenses and improve proﬁtability and to achieve 
further integration and synergistic cost eﬃciencies in our operating platform. These initiatives included 
idling underutilized assets and closing facilities to more closely align our business to market conditions, 
implementing productivity initiatives to increase production eﬃciency and material recovery, and reducing 
certain operating expenses through headcount reductions, reducing organizational layers, consolidating 
shared service functions, savings from procurement activities, streamlining of administrative and supporting 
services functions, and other non-headcount measures. For example, in October 2022, we announced and 
began implementing productivity and cost reduction initiatives with a targeted annual beneﬁt of 
approximately $40 million, and in January 2023, we announced incremental initiatives aiming to reduce 
selling, general, and administrative costs by approximately $20 million annually. These initiatives aim to 
improve proﬁtability through a combination of increased yields, eﬃciencies in processing, procurement, and 
pricing, and reduced costs including from headcount reductions, decreased lease costs, professional and 
outside services, and implementation of operational eﬃciencies. We may undertake similar or additional 
productivity initiatives in the future in the normal course or in response to market conditions. Our ability to 
achieve or sustain the anticipated cost reductions and other beneﬁts from these initiatives within the 
expected time frame is subject to many estimates and 
20 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
assumptions. These estimates and assumptions are subject to signiﬁcant economic, competitive, and other 
uncertainties, some of which are beyond our control. We have incurred, and may incur in the future, 
restructuring charges and other exit-related activities as a result of such initiatives. Failure to achieve or 
sustain the expected cost reductions and other beneﬁts related to these productivity improvements, cost 
savings, and restructuring initiatives could have a material adverse eﬀect on our results of operations and 
cash ﬂows.
We may be unable to renew facility leases, thus restricting our ability to operate
We lease a signiﬁcant portion of our facilities, including the substantial majority of our auto parts facilities. 
The cost to renew such leases may increase signiﬁcantly, and we may not be able to renew such leases on 
commercially reasonable terms or at all. Failure to renew these leases or ﬁnd suitable alternative locations 
for our facilities may impact our ability to continue operations within certain geographic areas, which could 
have a material adverse eﬀect on our ﬁnancial condition, results of operations, and cash ﬂows.
Changing economic conditions may result in customers not fulﬁlling their contractual obligations
We enter into export ferrous sales contracts preceded by negotiations that include ﬁxing price, quantity, 
shipping terms, and other contractual terms. Upon ﬁnalization of these terms and satisfactory completion of 
other contractual contingencies, the customer typically opens a letter of credit to satisfy its payment 
obligation under the contract prior to our shipment of the cargo. In times of changing economic conditions, 
including during periods of sharply falling recycled metal prices and global ﬁnancial instability, there is an 
increased risk that customers may not be willing or able to fulﬁll their contractual obligations or open letters 
of credit. As of August 31, 2023 and 2022, 38% and 24%, respectively, of our accounts receivable balance 
were covered by letters of credit. In addition, in higher or rising commodity price environments and during 
periods of challenging global macroeconomic and steel industry conditions, we have experienced 
proportionately lower credit insurance coverage of applicable customer credit limits, which may increase our 
exposure to customer credit risk.
Potential limitations on our ability to access capital resources may restrict our ability to operate
Our operations are capital intensive. Our business also requires substantial expenditures for routine 
maintenance. While we expect that our cash requirements, including the funding of capital expenditures, 
debt service, dividends, share repurchases, and investments, will be ﬁnanced by internally generated funds 
or from borrowings under our secured committed bank credit facilities, there can be no assurance that this 
will be the case. Additional acquisitions could require ﬁnancing from external sources. Although we believe 
we have adequate access to contractually committed borrowings, we could be adversely aﬀected if we are 
not able to meet the conditions required to incur such borrowing or if our banks ceased lending or were 
unable to honor their contractual commitments. Failure to access our credit facilities could restrict our ability 
to fund operations, make capital expenditures, or execute acquisitions.
The agreement governing our bank credit facilities imposes certain restrictions on our business 
and contains ﬁnancial covenants
Our secured bank credit facilities contain certain restrictions on our business which limit (subject to certain 
exceptions) our ability to, among other things, incur or suﬀer to exist certain liens, make investments, incur 
or guaranty additional indebtedness, enter into consolidations, mergers, acquisitions, and sales of assets, 
make distributions and other restricted payments, change the nature of our business, engage in transactions 
with aﬃliates and enter into restrictive agreements, including agreements that restrict the ability of our 
subsidiaries to make distributions. These restrictions may aﬀect our ability to operate our business or 
execute our strategy and may limit our ability to take advantage of potential business opportunities as they 
arise. Our bank credit agreement also requires that we maintain certain ﬁnancial and other covenants, 
including a consolidated ﬁxed charge coverage ratio and a consolidated leverage ratio. Our ability to comply 
with these covenants may also be aﬀected by events beyond our control, including prevailing economic, 
ﬁnancial, and industry conditions. Our failure to comply with any of these restrictions or ﬁnancial covenants 
could result in an event of default under the bank credit agreement and permit our lenders to cease lending 
to us and declare all amounts borrowed from them to be due and payable, together with accrued and unpaid 
interest. This could require us to reﬁnance our bank facilities, which we may not be able to do at terms 
acceptable to us, or at all.
Consolidation in the steel industry may reduce demand for our products
There has been consolidation in the steel industry that has included steel mills acquiring steel fabricators to 
ensure demand for their products. If any of our steel mill’s signiﬁcant remaining customers were to be 
acquired by competing steel mills, this could reduce the demand for our products and force us to lower our 
prices, reducing our revenues, or to reduce production, which could increase our unit costs and have a 
material adverse eﬀect on our ﬁnancial condition and results of operations.
21 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
Product liability claims may adversely impact our operating results
We could inadvertently acquire radioactive scrap metal that could potentially be included in recycled mixed 
metal shipped to consumers worldwide. Although we have invested in radiation detection equipment in the 
majority of our locations, including the facilities from which we ship directly to customers, failure to detect 
radioactive metal remains a possibility. Even though we maintain insurance to address the risk of this failure 
in detection, there can be no assurance that the insurance coverage would be adequate or will continue to be 
available on acceptable terms. In addition, if we fail to meet contractual requirements for a product, we may 
be subject to product warranty costs and claims. These costs and claims could both have a material adverse 
eﬀect on our ﬁnancial condition and results of operations and harm our reputation.
We are subject to legal proceedings and legal compliance risks that may adversely impact our 
ﬁnancial condition, results of operations, and liquidity
We spend substantial resources ensuring that we comply with domestic and foreign laws and regulations, 
contractual obligations and other legal standards. Notwithstanding this, we are subject to a variety of legal 
proceedings and compliance risks in respect of various matters, including regulatory, safety, environmental, 
employment, transportation, intellectual property, contractual, import/export, international trade, and 
governmental matters that arise in the course of our business and in our industry. For example, legal 
proceedings can include those arising from accidents involving Company-owned vehicles, including 
Company tractor trailers. In some instances, such accidents and the related litigation involve accidents that 
have resulted in third-party fatalities. An outcome in an unusual or signiﬁcant legal proceeding or 
compliance investigation in excess of insurance recoveries could adversely aﬀect our ﬁnancial condition and 
results of operations. For information regarding our current signiﬁcant legal proceedings and contingencies, 
see Part I, Item 3. Legal Proceedings and “Contingencies – Other” in Note 10 - Commitments and 
Contingencies in Part II, Item 8 of this report.
Climate change may adversely impact our facilities and our ongoing operations
The potential physical impacts of climate change on our operations are highly uncertain and depend upon 
the unique geographic and environmental factors present, for example rising sea levels at our deepwater 
port facilities, changing storm patterns and intensities, and changing temperature levels. As many of our 
recycling facilities are located near deepwater ports, rising sea levels may disrupt our ability to receive 
scrap metal, process the metal through our shredders, and ship products to our customers. Extreme weather 
events and conditions, such as wildﬁres, hurricanes, thunderstorms, tornadoes, and snow or ice storms, may 
increase our costs or cause damage to our facilities, and any damage resulting from extreme weather may 
not be fully insured. Increased frequency and duration of adverse weather events and conditions may also 
inhibit construction activity utilizing our products, scrap metal inﬂows to our recycling facilities, and retail 
admissions and parts sales at our auto parts stores. Potential adverse impacts from climate change, 
including rising temperatures and extreme weather events and conditions, may create health and safety 
issues for employees operating at our facilities and may lead to an inability to maintain standard operating 
hours.
We may not realize our deferred tax assets in the future
The assessment of recoverability of our deferred tax assets is based on an evaluation of existing positive 
and negative evidence as to whether it is more-likely-than-not that they will be realized. If negative 
evidence outweighs positive evidence, a valuation allowance is required. Factors that may result in a 
valuation allowance include signiﬁcant negative industry or economic trends, a decrease in earnings 
performance and projections of future taxable income, adverse changes in laws or regulations, and a variety 
of other factors. Recording a valuation allowance could have a material adverse impact on our results of 
operations and ﬁnancial condition. In the past, we have recorded signiﬁcant valuation allowances against our 
deferred tax assets. Deferred tax assets may require further valuation allowances if it is not more-likely-
than-not that the deferred tax assets will be realized.
Tax increases and changes in tax rules may adversely aﬀect our ﬁnancial results
As a company conducting business on a global basis with physical operations throughout North America, we 
are exposed, both directly and indirectly, to the eﬀects of changes in U.S., state, local, and foreign tax rules. 
Taxes for ﬁnancial reporting purposes and cash tax liabilities in the future may be adversely aﬀected by 
changes in such tax rules. Such changes may put us at a competitive disadvantage compared to some of our 
major competitors, to the extent we are unable to pass the tax costs through to our customers.
On August 16, 2022, the Inﬂation Reduction Act of 2022 (“IRA”) was signed into law, with tax provisions 
primarily focused on implementing a 15% minimum tax on global adjusted ﬁnancial statement income and a 
1% excise tax on share repurchases. The IRA also creates a number of potentially beneﬁcial tax credits to 
incentivize investments in certain technologies and industries which may be applicable to our business. 
Certain provisions of the IRA became eﬀective in ﬁscal 2023. As of August 31, 2023, we did not meet the 
threshold to be subject to the 15% minimum tax. We may, however, be subject to the 1% excise tax on 
future share repurchases.
22 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
One or more cybersecurity incidents may adversely impact our ﬁnancial condition, results of 
operations, and reputation
Our operations involve the use of multiple systems, some of which are outsourced to certain third-party 
service and hosting providers, that process, store, and transmit sensitive information about our customers, 
suppliers, employees, ﬁnancial position, operating results, and strategies. We face global cybersecurity risks 
and threats on a continual and ongoing basis, which include, but are not limited to, attempts to access 
systems and information, computer viruses, or denial-of-service attacks. These risks and threats range from 
uncoordinated individual attempts to sophisticated and targeted measures. Increased numbers of 
employees working remotely increases our exposure to cyber-threats. While we are not aware of any 
material cyber-attacks or breaches of our systems to date, such attempts occur regularly and, thus, we have 
and continue to implement measures to safeguard our systems and information and mitigate potential risks, 
including employee training around phishing, malware, and other cyber risks, but there is no assurance that 
such actions will be suﬃcient to prevent cyber-attacks or security breaches that manipulate or improperly 
use our systems, compromise sensitive information, destroy or corrupt data, or otherwise disrupt our 
operations. The occurrence of such events, including breaches of our security measures or those of our third-
party service providers, could negatively impact our reputation and our competitive position and could result 
in litigation with third parties, regulatory action, loss of business due to disruption of operations and/or 
reputational damage, potential liability and increased remediation and protection costs, any of which could 
have a material adverse eﬀect on our ﬁnancial condition and results of operations. Additionally, as 
cybersecurity threats become more sophisticated, we may need to increase our investments in security 
measures which could have a material adverse eﬀect on our ﬁnancial condition and results of operations.
Increasing attention to environmental, social and governance (ESG) matters may impact our 
business and ﬁnancial results
Increasing attention has been given to corporate activities related to ESG matters in public discourse and the 
investment community. A number of advocacy groups, both domestically and internationally, have 
campaigned for governmental and private action to promote ESG-related change at public companies, 
including, but not limited to, through the investment and voting practices of investment advisers, pension 
funds, universities and other members of the investing community. 
These activities have also aimed to increase the attention on and demand for action related to various ESG 
matters, which has contributed to increasing societal, investor, and legislative focus and pressure on ESG 
practices and disclosures, including those related to climate change, GHG emissions targets, business 
resilience under the assumptions of demand-constrained scenarios, net-zero ambitions, transition plans, 
actions related to diversity and inclusion, political activities, racial equity audits, and governance standards. 
As a result, we may face increasing pressure regarding our ESG practices and disclosures. Investors, 
stakeholders, and other interested parties are also increasingly focusing on issues related to environmental 
justice. This has resulted and is likely to continue to result in increased scrutiny with respect to our business 
and operations, which could in turn result in the cancellation or delay of projects, the revocation or delay of 
permits, termination of contracts, lawsuits, regulatory action, and policy change that may adversely aﬀect 
our business strategy, increase our costs, and adversely aﬀect our reputation and ﬁnancial performance. 
Responding to such ESG-focused activism has been and will likely continue to be costly and time-
consuming. Such response eﬀorts could also result in the implementation of certain ESG practices and/or 
disclosure requirements that may present a heightened level of legal and regulatory risk, or that threaten 
our credibility with other investors and stakeholders. The methodologies and standards for tracking and 
reporting on ESG matters are relatively new, have not been standardized, and continue to evolve. As a 
result, our ESG-related disclosures, metrics, and targets may not necessarily be calculated in the same 
manner or comparable to similarly titled measures presented by us in other contexts, or by other companies 
or third-party estimates. While we believe that our ESG disclosures and methodologies reﬂect our business 
strategy and are reasonable at the time made or used, as our business or applicable methodologies, 
standards, or regulations develop and evolve, we may revise or cease reporting or using certain disclosures 
and methodologies if we determine that they are no longer advisable or appropriate. If our ESG disclosures 
and methodologies are or are perceived by government authorities, investors, or stakeholders to be 
inadequate, inaccurate, or non-compliant with applicable standards or regulations, or if we discover material 
inaccuracies therein, our reputation could be negatively impacted, and we could be exposed to litigation and 
other regulatory actions. 
We are exposed to translation risks associated with ﬂuctuations in foreign currency exchange 
rates 
Our operations in Canada expose us to translation risks associated with ﬂuctuations in foreign currency 
exchange rates as compared to the U.S. dollar, our reporting currency. As a result, we are subject to foreign 
currency exchange risks due to exchange rate movements in connection with the translation of the 
operating costs and the assets and liabilities of our foreign operations into our functional currency for 
inclusion in our Consolidated Financial Statements.
23 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
We may incur losses and additional costs as a result of our hedging transactions
We currently use interest rate swap derivative instruments, as well as derivative contracts for commodities 
used in normal business operations that are settled by physical delivery, and we expect to continue their use 
in the future. If the instruments we use to hedge our exposure to various types of risk are not eﬀective or 
increase our exposure to unexpected events or risks, we may incur losses. In addition, we may be required 
to incur additional costs in connection with any future regulation of derivative instruments applicable to us.
Risk Factors Relating to the Regulatory Environment
Governmental agencies may refuse to grant or renew our licenses and permits, thus restricting 
our ability to operate
We conduct certain aspects of our operations subject to licenses, permits, and approvals from state and local 
governments. Governmental agencies often resist the establishment of certain types of facilities in their 
communities, including metal recycling and auto parts facilities. Increased permitting requirements could 
require substantial additional capital expenditures, impose ﬁnancial assurance obligations, subject us to 
increased compliance and penalty risks, severely limit operational ﬂexibility, and increase operating costs, 
or adversely impact our ability to acquire or sell materials. Increased focus on strengthening environmental 
compliance and enforcement in overburdened communities that may be disproportionately impacted by 
adverse health and environmental eﬀects may impact our ability to obtain or renew licenses and permits for 
facilities in or near such communities. In addition, changes in zoning and increased residential and mixed-
use development near our facilities are reducing the buﬀer zones and creating land use conﬂicts with heavy 
industrial uses such as ours. This could result in increased complaints, increased inspections and 
enforcement including ﬁnes and penalties, operating restrictions, the need for additional capital 
expenditures, and increased opposition to maintaining or renewing required approvals, licenses, and 
permits. In addition, waste products from our operations are subject to classiﬁcation and regulations that, 
among other things, determine how such materials may be handled, stored, transported, and disposed. 
Failure to obtain or maintain regulatory permits, approvals, or exemptions for such waste could materially 
increase our costs or limit our operations. For example, in ﬁscal 2022, as a result of court orders and 
regulatory changes, we were required at times to transport shredder waste from our Oakland facility out of 
state for disposal at increased costs. See Part I, Item 3. Legal Proceedings. As an additional example, our 
Bay Area Air Quality Management District (“BAAQMD”) permit to operate currently limits the number of 
ships that may call at our Oakland, California facility to 26 ships per year. In July 2018, we applied for a 
modiﬁcation of such permit to increase the number of annual ship calls to 32 per year. BAAQMD has not 
acted on our permit modiﬁcation request but, in the interim, had routinely issued annual Compliance and 
Settlement Agreements (“CSA”) to permit 32 ship calls in each year. In October 2022, however, BAAQMD 
declined to renew the CSA for 2022, following which we applied for and obtained a short-term variance 
authorizing the 32 ship calls in calendar year 2022. Unless we are able to operate within the current 26 ship 
call limit in calendar year 2023, we will need to apply for a similar variance for 2023. Failure to obtain such a 
variance in the future could have a material adverse eﬀect on our ﬁnancial condition and results of 
operations due to the reduced marine shipments, and lost proﬁts related thereto. Additionally, by letter 
dated June 22, 2023, ODEQ notiﬁed the Company that it intended to reopen the Company’s Title V permit at 
the steel mill for purposes of incorporating the emissions of a third-party contractor that has operated on a 
portion of the site for decades. We have objected to such action and are engaged in discussions with ODEQ.
Furthermore, from time to time, both the U.S. and foreign governments impose regulations and restrictions 
on trade in the markets in which we operate. In some countries, governments require us to apply for 
certiﬁcates or registration before allowing shipment of recycled metal to customers in those countries. There 
can be no assurance that future approvals, licenses, and permits will be granted or that we will be able to 
maintain and renew the approvals, licenses, and permits we currently hold. Failure to obtain these approvals 
could cause us to limit or discontinue operations in these locations or prevent us from developing or 
acquiring new facilities, which could have a material adverse eﬀect on our ﬁnancial condition and results of 
operations.
Environmental compliance costs and potential environmental liabilities may have a material 
adverse eﬀect on our ﬁnancial condition and results of operations
Compliance with environmental laws and regulations is a signiﬁcant factor in our business. We are subject to 
local, state, and federal environmental laws and regulations in the U.S. and other countries relating to, 
among other matters:
•Waste disposal;
•Air emissions;
•Waste water and storm water management, treatment, and discharge;
•The use and treatment of groundwater;
•Soil and groundwater contamination and remediation;
24 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
•Generation, discharge, storage, handling, transportation, and disposal of hazardous materials and 
secondary materials;
•Employee health and safety; and
•Climate change generally.
We are also required to obtain environmental permits from governmental authorities for certain operations. 
Violation of or failure to obtain permits or comply with these laws or regulations could result in our business 
being ﬁned or otherwise sanctioned by regulators or becoming subject to litigation by private parties. In 
recent years, capital expenditures for environmental projects have increased and have represented a 
signiﬁcant share of our annual capital expenditures. Future environmental compliance costs, including 
capital expenditures for environmental projects, may increase because of new laws and regulations, 
changing regulatory interpretations and stricter enforcement of current laws and regulations by regulatory 
authorities, expanding emissions, groundwater, storm water and other testing requirements, and new 
information on emission or contaminant levels including with respect to emerging contaminants such as per- 
and polyﬂuoroalkyl substances (“PFAS”), uncertainty regarding adequate pollution control levels, the future 
costs of pollution control technology, and issues related to climate change.
We have seen an increased focus by federal, state, and local regulators on metals recycling and auto 
dismantling facilities and new or expanding regulatory requirements. For example, the California 
Department of Toxic Substances Control (“DTSC”) has increased its enforcement actions and sought to 
impose additional permitting and regulatory requirements on the metals recycling industry in the state that 
has resulted in and could in the future increase operating and compliance costs and require additional 
capital expenditures. In addition, in July 2021, the EPA issued an enforcement alert reﬂecting a national 
enforcement initiative in conjunction with state regulators focused on Clean Air Act compliance at metal 
recycling facilities that operate auto and scrap metal shredders. While we believe we are an industry leader 
in air emission controls and have been working with state and local regulators on compliance and permitting 
matters, we have in the past and may in the future be subject to enforcement actions or litigation by 
regulators or private parties that could result in additional penalties, compliance requirements, or capital 
investments. See Part I, Item 3. Legal Proceedings of this report.
In addition, previous operations by us, predecessor entities, or others at facilities that we currently or 
formerly owned, operated, or otherwise used may have caused contamination from hazardous substances. 
As a result, we are exposed to possible claims, including government ﬁnes and penalties, costs for 
investigation and clean-up activities, claims for natural resources damages, and claims by third parties for 
personal injury and property damage, under environmental laws and regulations, especially for the 
remediation of waterways and soil or groundwater contamination. These laws can impose liability for the 
cleanup of hazardous substances even if the owner or operator was neither aware of nor responsible for the 
release of the hazardous substances. We have, in the past, incurred liabilities, expenditures, ﬁnes and 
penalties associated with violations of certain of these laws and regulations. In December 2000, we were 
notiﬁed by the EPA that we are one of the potentially responsible parties that owns or operates, or formerly 
owned or operated, sites which are part of or adjacent to Portland Harbor. Further, we have been notiﬁed that 
we are or may be a potentially responsible party at sites other than Portland Harbor currently or formerly 
owned or operated by us or at other sites where we may have responsibility for such costs due to past 
disposal or other activities. Environmental compliance costs and potential environmental liabilities could 
have a material adverse eﬀect on our ﬁnancial condition, results of operations, and cash ﬂows. See also the 
risk factor “Potential costs related to the environmental cleanup of Portland Harbor may be material to our 
ﬁnancial position and liquidity” in this Item 1A and “Contingencies – Environmental” in Note 10 - 
Commitments and Contingencies in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8 of 
this report.
The U.S. Federal Government and state and local regulators are also emphasizing eﬀorts to strengthen 
environmental compliance and enforcement, including with respect to clean-up actions under superfund and 
hazardous waste laws, in overburdened communities that may be disproportionately impacted by adverse 
health and environmental eﬀects. On September 10, 2021, U.S. EPA Region 9 and the California 
Environmental Protection Agency announced a joint eﬀort to expand environmental enforcement in 
overburdened California communities. These initiatives could result in increased enforcement, compliance, 
and clean-up costs, including increased capital expenditures, at our facilities located at or near such 
communities.
Compliance with existing and future climate change, greenhouse gas, and other air emission 
laws and regulations may adversely impact our operating results
Recent and future legislation or increased regulation regarding climate change and GHG emissions could 
impose signiﬁcant costs on our business and our customers and suppliers, including increased energy, 
capital equipment, emissions controls, environmental monitoring and reporting, and other costs in order to 
comply with laws and regulations concerning and limitations imposed on climate change and GHG 
emissions. The potential costs of allowances, taxes, fees, oﬀsets, or credits or additional emission reduction 
measures that may be part of “cap and trade” programs or other legislative or regulatory requirements are 
still uncertain and the future of these programs or measures is unknown. For example, in March 2020, the 
Governor of Oregon issued an executive order directing state 
25 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
agencies to take certain actions to reduce and regulate GHG emissions. Pursuant to this executive order, 
ODEQ adopted a new Climate Protection Program to limit GHG emissions in the state including from large 
stationary sources such as our steel mill. Pursuant to these regulations, the mill’s GHG process emissions 
will be subject to a best available emission reduction technology analysis and standard and its natural gas 
GHG combustion emissions will be subject to the cap and annual reductions applied to its natural gas 
supplier. The implementation of such regulations, standards, and programs and any associated costs, 
including any operating or capital expenditures, are uncertain, but may be material to our results of 
operations, cash ﬂows, and ﬁnancial position. The potential increased costs to us of natural gas supplies are 
also uncertain. In addition, the ODEQ Cleaner Air Oregon (“CAO”) program regulates toxic air emissions from 
manufacturing and commercial facilities located in Oregon. The ODEQ has published a prioritization list of 
the facilities within the state subject to the CAO program based on emissions inventories that facilities 
submitted to the ODEQ. The prioritization list established four tiers of risk groups. Our steel mill has been 
assigned to the ﬁrst-tier risk group and entered the CAO program in 2020. To comply with the existing CAO 
program rules, and as they may be revised in the future, we must undertake an emissions inventory and a 
public health risk assessment for both our steel mill and our Portland metals recycling facility. We may be 
required to incur additional operating or capital expenditures to mitigate any signiﬁcant identiﬁed emissions 
risks, and such expenditures may be material. In addition, we have and continue to incur material capital 
expenditures to enclose and install additional emission controls for our shredders to meet air emission 
standards. Recent and future climate change and GHG laws or regulations could negatively impact our 
ability (and that of our customers and suppliers) to compete with companies situated in areas not subject to 
such requirements. Until the timing, scope, and extent of any future laws or regulations becomes known, we 
cannot predict the eﬀect on our ﬁnancial condition, operating performance, or ability to compete. 
Furthermore, even without such laws or regulations, increased awareness and any adverse publicity in the 
global marketplace about the GHGs emitted by companies in the metals recycling and steel manufacturing 
industries could harm our reputation and reduce customer demand for our products.
Risk Factors Relating to Our Employees
Labor shortages or increased labor costs may adversely aﬀect our operating results, ﬁnancial 
condition, and cash ﬂows
Our employees contribute to developing and meeting our business goals and objectives, and labor is a 
signiﬁcant component of operating our business. The impact of labor shortages or increased labor costs 
because of increased competition for employees, unemployment levels and beneﬁts, higher employee 
turnover rates, increases in the federally-mandated or state-mandated minimum wage, change in exempt 
and non-exempt status, or other employee beneﬁts costs (including costs associated with health insurance 
coverage or workers’ compensation insurance), may increase our costs or impede our ability to operate our 
facilities and could have a material adverse eﬀect on our results of operations, ﬁnancial condition, and cash 
ﬂows. As a result of the tight labor markets we have experienced since ﬁscal 2021, we have received fewer 
job applicants in certain local markets, which, at times, hindered our ability to reach full staﬃng levels at 
some of our facilities. Recruiting and retaining employees in suﬃcient numbers to optimally staﬀ our 
facilities may result in increases in our labor costs.
Reliance on employees subject to collective bargaining may restrict our ability to operate
Approximately 23% of our full-time employees are represented by unions under collective bargaining 
agreements, including substantially all of the manufacturing employees at our steel manufacturing facility. 
As these agreements expire, we may not be able to negotiate extensions or replacements of such 
agreements on acceptable terms. Any failure to reach an agreement with one or more of our unions may 
result in strikes, lockouts, or other labor actions, including work slowdowns or stoppages, which could have a 
material adverse eﬀect on our results of operations.
The underfunded status of our multiemployer pension plans may cause us to increase our 
contributions to the plans
As discussed in Note 13 - Employee Beneﬁts in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, 
Item 8 of this report, we contribute to the Steelworkers Western Independent Shops Pension Plan (“WISPP”), 
a multiemployer plan beneﬁting union employees of our steel mill. Because we have no current intention of 
withdrawing from the WISPP, we have not recognized a withdrawal liability in our consolidated ﬁnancial 
statements. However, if such a liability were triggered, it could have a material adverse eﬀect on our results 
of operations, ﬁnancial position, liquidity, and cash ﬂows. Our contributions to the WISPP could also increase 
as a result of a diminished contribution base due to the insolvency or withdrawal of other employers who 
currently contribute to it, the inability or failure of withdrawing employers to pay their withdrawal liabilities, 
or other funding deﬁciencies, as we would need to fund the retirement obligations of these employers.
26 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS
None.
ITEM 1C. CYBERSECURITY
N/A.
27 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
ITEM 2. PROPERTIES
Our facilities and administrative oﬃces by division, type and location were as follows as of August 31, 2023: 
      Number of Facilities   
Type Location  Owned     Leased   
Administrative 
Oﬃces California 
  —     1  
  New Jersey    —     1  
  Oregon    —     1  
  Rhode Island    —     1  
Auto Parts StoresAlberta, Canada    —     3  
  Arkansas    —     1  
  British Columbia, Canada    —     1  
  California    3     16  
  Florida    —     1  
  Georgia    1     —  
  Illinois    —     1  
  Indiana    1     —  
  Kansas    —     1  
  Missouri    1     3  
  Nevada    —     2  
  Ohio    —     1  
  Oregon    —     2  
  Rhode Island    2     —  
  Texas    —     3  
  Utah    —     1  
  Virginia    —     1  
  Washington    1     4  
Metals RecyclingAlabama    3     —  
  British Columbia, Canada    —     4  
  California    4    —  
  Georgia    10     —  
  Hawaii    1    1  
  Kentucky    3     1  
  Maine    2     —  
  Massachusetts    2    1  
  Mississippi    3     —  
  Montana    1     —  
  Nevada    —     1  
  New Hampshire    2     —  
  Oregon    4    —  
  Puerto Rico    1    3  
  Rhode Island    1     1 
  Tennessee    1     1  
  Washington    3    —  
Steel Mill Oregon    1     —  
Steel DistributionCalifornia    1     —  
Recycling ServicesTexas    —     1  
 Total Operating Facilities and 
Administrative Oﬃces 
  52     59  
  Non-Operating    7     7  
       59     66  
 
[A] Operation includes a deepwater port. Puerto Rico and Hawaii operations access deepwater ports through public docks.
[B] Includes large-scale shredding operations.
(1)Includes eight primarily owned facilities where an adjacent or supplementary parcel of the site is leased.
(2)Three sites are jointly owned with minority interest partners.
28 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023(1)
(2)
[A][B]
[B]
[A][B]
[A][B]
[A][B]
[A][B]
[A]
[A][B]
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
We consider all operating properties, both owned and leased, to be well-maintained, in good operating 
condition, and suitable and adequate to carry on our business. For further discussion of our operating 
properties, see “Business,” and “Distribution” in Part I, Item 1 of this report.
ITEM 3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS
From time to time, we are involved in various litigation matters that arise in the ordinary course of business 
involving normal and routine claims, including environmental compliance matters. Such proceedings 
include, but are not limited to, proceedings relating to our status as a potentially responsible party with 
respect to the Portland Harbor Superfund Site and proceedings relating to other legacy environmental issues. 
For additional information regarding such matters, see Note 10 - Commitments and Contingencies in the 
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8 of this report.
In ﬁscal 2013, the Commonwealth of Massachusetts advised us of alleged violations of environmental 
requirements, including but not limited to those related to air emissions and hazardous waste management, 
at our operations in the Commonwealth. We actively engaged in discussions with the Commonwealth's 
representatives, which resulted in a settlement agreement to resolve the alleged violations. A consent 
judgment was jointly ﬁled with and entered by the Superior Court for the County of Suﬀolk, Commonwealth 
of Massachusetts on September 24, 2015. The settlement involved a $450 thousand cash payment, an 
additional $450 thousand in suspended payments to be waived upon completion of a shredder emission 
control system and certain other speciﬁed milestones, and $350 thousand in supplemental environmental 
projects that we have completed. In ﬁscal 2021, the upgraded shredder emission control system became 
fully operational to design criteria, and the adjusted milestones for waiver of the suspended penalties were 
met.
On February 23, 2021, the California State Department of Toxic Substance Control (“DTSC”) issued a 
corrective action enforcement order with respect to our metal recycling facility in Oakland, California that 
would require us to submit a current conditions report, to undertake a facilities investigation, risk 
assessment, a corrective measures study, and to implement corrective measures selected by the DTSC 
based on those assessments and studies. We dispute DTSC’s alleged jurisdictional basis for the order, as 
well as the scope of work required by the order, which we believe is unwarranted and duplicative of ongoing 
assessments being conducted under the oversight of another state agency. We have ﬁled a notice of defense 
that by law stays the eﬀectiveness of the order and are challenging the order through the DTSC 
administrative process.
In addition, the DTSC issued a similar corrective action enforcement order on March 18, 2021 with respect to 
our metal recycling facility in Fresno, California based on inspections conducted by the DTSC in 2013. That 
2013 inspection resulted in the issuance of a Summary of Violations in 2015 setting forth a number of 
alleged violations relating to hazardous waste management requirements. While we dispute the alleged 
violations, we engaged in settlement discussions that had resulted in a tentative agreement in April 2018 to 
settle the matter for $490 thousand, of which $368 thousand was to be paid as a civil penalty and $122 
thousand was to be paid as reimbursement for agency investigation and enforcement costs. However, the 
parties were not able to reach agreement on the injunctive terms of the settlement agreement, and the 
California Oﬃce of the Attorney General (“COAG”), on behalf of DTSC, ﬁled suit in the Superior Court of the 
State of California, County of Fresno on June 25, 2020 against Schnitzer Fresno, Inc., a wholly-owned 
subsidiary, which operates the facility, seeking a permanent injunction and civil penalties. In early 2022, the 
parties agreed to formal mediation of the dispute, which eﬀort was unsuccessful. However, we were able to 
resume settlement negotiations with DTSC, and settlement was achieved in January 2023. A Stipulated 
Judgement resolving the case was entered by the Fresno County Superior Court on January 18, 2023. The 
settlement terms include payment of a penalty of $525 thousand, speciﬁed injunctive relief requirements, 
and completion of site investigation and remediation requirements depending on the outcome of the 
investigation and risk assessment. 
In January 2018, the Company received a ﬁnding of violation letter from the United States Environmental 
Protection Agency (“USEPA”) with respect to alleged violations of environmental requirements stemming 
from refrigerant recovery management program inspections at 12 of our facilities in the New England and 
Paciﬁc Northwest regions in July 2017 and November 2017. Except with respect to a minor and now corrected 
non-compliance matter at one facility, we believe that we were in compliance with the relevant regulations. 
Nevertheless, in December 2017 and prior to receipt of the USEPA letter, we implemented improvements to 
our refrigerant recovery management program to further strengthen that program, including improvements 
to address concerns raised by USEPA during the inspections. We conferred with USEPA and the United States 
Department of Justice (“USDOJ”) regarding the alleged violations and reached agreement to settle this 
matter. On April 21, 2022, the USDOJ on behalf of the USEPA ﬁled a Complaint and lodged a Consent Decree 
reﬂecting the terms of the agreed settlement with the United States District Court for the District of 
Massachusetts, which Consent Decree was entered as a ﬁnal judgment by the Court on June 23, 2022. 
Pursuant to the Consent Decree, the Company agreed to settle the matter without admitting any liability 
with respect to the allegations in the Complaint for a civil penalty of $1.55 million, implementation of an 
approved, further enhanced refrigerant recovery management program, and execution of a R-12 refrigerant 
destruction mitigation project. The Company has implemented the USEPA approved enhanced refrigerant 
recovery management program at its metals recycling facilities, implemented the mitigation project and 
paid the civil penalty on July 18, 2022.
29 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
In January 2020, the USEPA issued a Notice of Violation (“NOV”) based on its evaluation of data requested 
during a June 2019 inspection at our facility in Oakland, California alleging the same violation of a Bay Area 
Air Quality Management District (“BAAQMD”) air emissions rule that was the subject of a Compliance and 
Settlement Agreement (“CSA”) with BAAQMD that was executed as of September 22, 2020 and also alleging 
violations of Title V Major Source permitting requirements based on source testing results of the enclosed 
shredder. The CSA required the installation of new emission controls for volatile organic compounds 
(“VOCs”), the payment of a civil penalty and excess emissions fees totaling $400 thousand, and the 
provision of certain VOC oﬀsets. The Company timely ﬁled an application for a Title V Major Source Permit 
and simultaneously ﬁled an application for Synthetic Minor Operating Permit based on the proposed 
installation of Regenerative Thermal Oxidizers and acid gas scrubbers. The Company maintains that the 
timely ﬁling of a Title V Major Source permit application constitutes compliance with Title V Major Source 
rules and that USEPA’s Title V non-compliance allegations are erroneous. The Company has conveyed that 
position to USEPA and has provided USEPA with documentation requested by USEPA conﬁrming our position. 
To date, USEPA has taken no further action relating to the NOV. In addition, the Company has completed 
installation of new VOC emissions controls that have achieved compliance with the BAAQMD emissions rule. 
Accordingly, the Company does not believe that federal enforcement of the BAAQMD rule or Title V 
permitting requirements is warranted.
On September 3, 2021, the Oregon Department of Environmental Quality (“ODEQ”) issued a Pre-Enforcement 
Notice (“PEN”) alleging that the Company’s metal shredder facility in Portland, Oregon was in violation of 
Title V of the federal Clean Air Act (“CAA”). In the PEN, ODEQ also alleged violations of major source new 
source review, CAO and federal hazardous air pollutant control technology requirements and gave notice to 
the Company that ODEQ had referred the matter to USEPA for review and possible formal enforcement. On 
April 25, 2022, the Company received an Information Request from USEPA, Region 10 under Section 114 of 
the CAA with respect to both the Portland shredder facility and the Tacoma metal shredder facility. The 
Company has responded to the Information Request. In our response, we identiﬁed why Title V does not 
apply to the Portland and Tacoma facilities, explained that we had submitted an application to ODEQ in 
December 2018 for an Air Contaminant Discharge Permit for the Portland facility with plant site emission 
limits that would limit emissions to less than Title V thresholds, noted that the Tacoma facility operates 
pursuant to an Order of Approval issued by the Puget Sound Clean Air Agency, described that we were 
proactively enclosing the shredders and installing particulate and volatile organic compound controls at both 
facilities, and included information on the permit applications that had been submitted in connection with 
the enclosure and emission control projects. The Company does not believe that any enforcement action is 
warranted in this matter. ODEQ issued a separate information request for the Portland facility on December 
8, 2022, and EPA transmitted a letter to the Company on December 20, 2022, indicating that ODEQ would 
assume lead agency status for potential enforcement. We responded to the ODEQ information request on 
January 12, 2023, and submitted additional information on April 13, 2023. The Company has disputed 
ODEQ's allegations concerning the violations and is currently in negotiations regarding resolution of this 
matter. If additional emissions controls are required at either or both of the facilities, the costs of installation 
could be material to our results of operations and cash ﬂows.
On June 22, 2023, ODEQ issued two separate letters to the Company concerning the steel mill’s Title V 
permit. In the ﬁrst letter, ODEQ alleged violations related to ﬂuoride and hydrogen ﬂuoride emissions and 
also claimed a failure to fully implement a pollution prevention plan. The Company has ﬁled a notice of 
contested case and is in discussions with ODEQ to resolve this matter. In the second letter, ODEQ notiﬁed 
the Company of its intent to reopen the steel mill’s Title V permit to include a third-party contractor’s 
emissions that has operated on a portion of the mill property for decades and to add a greenhouse gas plant 
site emissions limit compliance monitoring requirement to the Title V permit. The Company has contested 
ODEQ’s actions and is in discussions to resolve this matter.
On August 5, 2020, The Athletics Investment Group LLC (“A’s”) ﬁled an action in the California Superior Court 
for the County of Alameda against the DTSC as Respondent and the Company as Real Party in Interest, 
seeking rescission of the “f letter” pursuant to which DTSC classiﬁed treated shredder waste from the 
Company’s metal shredding facility in Oakland, California as a “nonhazardous waste” which among other 
things permits its use as alternative daily cover at municipal landﬁlls. Pursuant to determinations under 
section 66260.200(f) of the state hazardous waste regulations issued in 1988 and 1989 (the “f letters”), the 
DTSC determined that treated shredder waste from the Company’s facility does not pose a signiﬁcant hazard 
to human health, safety, or the environment. The Superior Court on April 16, 2021 issued an order and writ of 
mandate commanding the DTSC within 30 days to rescind the Company’s “f letters” concluding that, under a 
law enacted by the legislature in 2014, the DTSC had a mandatory duty to rescind the “f letters.” The 
Superior Court reached this decision despite a determination by DTSC in 2018 pursuant to the 2014 statute 
reconﬁrming that treated shredder residue does not need to be managed as a hazardous waste in order to 
protect human health, safety, or the environment. Following the lifting of an initial stay of that order, DTSC 
rescinded the Company’s “f letters” on November 29, 2021. As a result of the April 16, 2021 Superior Court 
order and subsequent orders by the same Superior Court, the Company has at times been required to 
transport its shredder waste out of state for disposal at increased costs. The Company ﬁled notices of appeal 
of the Superior Court's orders, and on September 30, 2022 the California State Court of Appeals, First 
Appellate District, Division Three reversed the April 16, 2021 Superior Court order, holding that the statute 
does not impose a mandatory duty on DTSC to rescind the Company’s “f letters” and that DTSC could 
continue to regulate metal shredder waste through statutorily compliant “f letters” since DTSC’s analysis 
conﬁrmed this waste need not be classiﬁed as hazardous to protect human health and the environment. 
DTSC subsequently agreed to an alternative treatment 
30 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
standard for the shredder waste under an existing statutory exclusion, which allowed the Company to cease 
transporting its shredder waste out of state. Following the California Supreme Court’s denial of review of the 
Court of Appeals’ decision, the Company immediately sought reinstatement of its “f letters.” On April 3, 
2023, the Company received conﬁrmation from DTSC that the “f letters” are in eﬀect, subject to certain 
conditions.
On December 10, 2021, an emergency regulation (“CTMSR Regulation”) that allows metal shredding facilities 
to transport and dispose of treated shredder residue as non-hazardous waste under a conditional exclusion 
became eﬀective, and the Company shipped treated shredder residue for use as alternative daily cover at 
municipal landﬁlls in California from late December 2021 to September 7, 2022 when the emergency 
regulation expired. Following an inspection by the DTSC of the Company’s Oakland metal shredding facility 
on May 16 and 17, 2022, the Company in its compilation and review of records requested by the DTSC during 
that inspection discovered and promptly self-disclosed to the DTSC that it is unable to conﬁrm that it was in 
compliance with certain aspects of the CTMSR Regulation for certain periods since the adoption of the 
emergency regulation. The Company reported the corrective actions it has taken and the numerous detailed 
procedures that are now in place to prevent recurrence. The Company is conﬁdent that any failure to comply 
with the CTMSR Regulation did not pose a risk to human health or the environment. On August 31, 2022, the 
DTSC issued an Inspection Report detailing alleged violations including allegations that the Company treated 
and stored metal shredder residue without a permit or other grant of authorization in violation of the 
California Hazardous Waste Control Law (“HWCL”). The Company had previously discussed with DTSC the 
various forms of authorization that would satisfy the CTMSR Regulation and had promptly obtained a Permit 
by Rule under the HCWL which it understood to be a satisfactory option. In a September 14, 2022 letter, the 
Company responded in detail to the alleged violations setting forth the corrective actions it has taken 
including having obtained interim status authorization for the treatment and storage of metal shredder 
residue under the permitting provisions of the HCWL with a full reservation of rights.
On May 6, 2022, the A’s ﬁled an action in the Superior Court of the State of California, County of Alameda 
against the BAAQMD as Respondent and the Company as Real Party in Interest (the “BAAQMD Case”) 
alleging that the BAAQMD has failed to properly regulate the Company’s Oakland shredder facility under the 
federal and California Clean Air Acts and seeking an order requiring the BAAQMD to revoke the Company’s 
Permit to Operate for the Oakland facility. On June 3, 2022, the BAAQMD removed this action to the United 
States District Court, Northern District of California where the A’s had previously ﬁled an action against the 
Company on July 7, 2021 raising substantially similar issues under the federal Clean Air Act’s citizen suit 
provision alleging violations by the Oakland facility of the federal Clean Air Act and permit conditions and 
seeking declaratory and injunctive relief, which action is currently in discovery with a trial, if any, currently 
scheduled for June 2024. The BAAQMD Case was remanded back to Alameda Superior Court on October 7, 
2022, and no schedule has yet been established for that case.
On March 30, 2022, September 8, 2022, and July 31, 2023, the Company received letters from the COAG 
alleging violations of the Stipulation for Entry of Final Judgment and Order on Consent (“Consent Order”) 
issued by the Superior Court of the State of California, County of Alameda in February 2021 that was entered 
into with the Alameda County District Attorney, DTSC and COAG to settle certain alleged violations of 
environmental requirements at our Oakland metals recycling facility. The letters demand that the Company 
take additional measures to address the oﬀ-site release and deposition of light ﬁbrous material (“LFM”). The 
Company does not believe that it is in violation of the Consent Order and has detailed the additional control 
measures that the Company has implemented and continues to implement to reduce the potential for 
releases of LFM from its Oakland facility. The Company is in continuing discussions with the COAG, the 
Alameda County District Attorney’s oﬃce, and DTSC regarding this matter and does not believe that further 
enforcement action is warranted.
ITEM 4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES
Not applicable.
31 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
PART II
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT’S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS, AND 
ISSUER PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
Our Class A common stock is listed on The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC (“NASDAQ”) under the symbol RDUS 
(SCHN prior to September 1, 2023). There were 147 holders of record of Class A common stock on October 
23, 2023. Our Class A common stock has been trading since November 16, 1993. There was one holder of 
record of Class B common stock on October 23, 2023. Our Class B common stock is not publicly traded.
We declared our 118th consecutive quarterly dividend in the fourth quarter of ﬁscal 2023. The payment of 
future dividends is subject to approval by our Board of Directors and continued compliance with the terms of 
our credit agreement. See Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of 
Operations in Part II, Item 7 of this report for further discussion of our credit agreement.
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
Pursuant to a share repurchase program as amended in 2001, 2006, and 2008, our Board of Directors had 
previously authorized the repurchase of up to nine million shares of our Class A common stock when 
management deems such repurchases to be appropriate. On June 27, 2022, our Board of Directors authorized 
a new share repurchase program of up to an additional three million shares of our Class A common stock. 
We may repurchase our common stock for a variety of reasons, such as to optimize our capital structure and 
to oﬀset dilution related to share-based compensation arrangements. We consider several factors in 
determining whether to make share repurchases including, among other factors, our cash needs, the 
availability of funding, our future business plans, and the market price of our stock. We did not repurchase 
our common stock in ﬁscal 2023. We repurchased approximately 944 thousand shares for a total of $34 
million in open-market transactions in ﬁscal 2022. We did not repurchase our common stock in ﬁscal 2021. 
As of August 31, 2023, there were approximately 2.8 million shares available for repurchase under the 
program.
The share repurchase program does not require us to acquire any speciﬁc number of shares, and we may 
suspend, extend, or terminate the program at any time without prior notice, and the program may be 
executed through open-market purchases, privately negotiated transactions, or utilizing Rule 10b5-1 
programs.
32 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
Performance Graph
The following graph and related information compare cumulative total shareholder return on our Class A 
common stock for the ﬁve-year period from September 1, 2018 through August 31, 2023, with the 
cumulative total return for the same period of (i) the S&P 500 Steel Index and (ii) the S&P 600 Metals & 
Mining Index. These comparisons assume an investment of $100 at the commencement of the ﬁve-year 
period and that all dividends are reinvested. The stock performance outlined in the performance graph below 
is not necessarily indicative of our future performance, and we do not endorse any predictions as to future 
stock performance. 
 
 
 
    Year Ended August 31,  
   2018  2019  2020  2021  2022  2023 
Radius Recycling  $ 100  $ 87  $ 81  $ 197  $ 140  $ 144 
S&P 500 Steel  $ 100  $ 78  $ 73  $ 188  $ 213  $ 258 
S&P 600 Metals & Mining  $ 100  $ 66  $ 64  $ 116  $ 115  $ 151 
 
(1)Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Class A Common Stock
(2)Because of the composition of our major product categories, we have no direct market peer issuers.
ITEM 6. [RESERVED]
 
33 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023(1)(2)
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS 
OF OPERATIONS
This section includes a discussion of our operations for the ﬁscal years ended August 31, 2023 and 2022. The 
following discussion and analysis provide information which management believes is relevant to an 
assessment and understanding of our ﬁnancial condition and results of operations. The discussion should be 
read in conjunction with the Consolidated Financial Statements and the related Notes thereto included in Part 
II, Item 8 of this report.
For discussion of our results of operations for ﬁscal year 2021 including comparison to ﬁscal 2022, refer to 
Part II, Item 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations in our 
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended August 31, 2022.
Business
Founded in 1906, Radius Recycling is one of North America’s largest recyclers of ferrous and nonferrous 
metal, including end-of-life vehicles, and a manufacturer of ﬁnished steel products. As a vertically integrated 
organization, we oﬀer a range of products and services to meet global demand through our network that 
includes 50 retail self-service auto parts stores, 54 metals recycling facilities, and an electric arc furnace 
(“EAF”) steel mill. Our internal organizational and reporting structure includes a single operating and 
reportable segment.
We sell recycled ferrous and nonferrous metal in both foreign and domestic markets. We also sell a range of 
ﬁnished steel long products produced at our steel mill. Our results of operations depend in large part on the 
demand and prices for recycled metal in foreign and domestic markets and on the supply of raw materials, 
including end-of-life vehicles, available to be processed at our facilities. Our results of operations also 
depend substantially on our operating leverage from processing and selling higher volumes of recycled 
metal as well as our ability to eﬃciently extract ferrous and nonferrous metals from the shredding process. 
We respond to changes in selling prices for processed metal by seeking to adjust purchase prices for 
unprocessed scrap metal in order to manage the impact on our operating results. We believe we generally 
beneﬁt from sustained periods of stable or rising recycled metal selling prices, which allow us to better 
maintain or increase both operating results and unprocessed scrap metal ﬂow into our facilities. When 
recycled metal selling prices decline, either sharply or for a sustained period, our operating margins typically 
compress. With respect to ﬁnished steel products produced at our steel mill, our results of operations are 
impacted by demand and prices for these products, which are sold to customers located primarily in the 
Western U.S. and Western Canada.
Our quarterly operating results ﬂuctuate based on a variety of factors including, but not limited to, changes 
in market conditions for recycled ferrous and nonferrous metal and ﬁnished steel products, the supply of 
scrap metal in our domestic markets, and varying demand for used auto parts from our self-service retail 
stores. Certain of these factors are inﬂuenced, to a degree, by the impact of seasonal changes including 
severe weather conditions, which can impact the timing of shipments and inhibit construction activity 
utilizing our products, scrap metal collection and production levels at our facilities, and retail admissions and 
parts sales at our auto parts stores. Further, sanctions, trade actions, and licensing and inspection 
requirements can impact the level of proﬁtability on sales of our products and, in certain cases, impede or 
restrict our ability to sell to certain export markets or require us to direct our sales to alternative market 
destinations, which can cause our quarterly operating results to ﬂuctuate.
34 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
Strategic Priorities
As we continue to closely monitor economic conditions, we remain focused on the following core strategies 
and plans to meet our business goals and objectives:
•Long-term expansion of ferrous and nonferrous scrap metal supply and processing, sales volumes, 
and operating margins;
•Manufacturing and information technology investments and process improvements to increase the 
separation and recovery of metal materials from our shredding process, expand product optionality, 
enable volume growth, increase eﬃciency, and expand recycling services;
•Development of new products and use of our core competencies in adjacent recycling businesses to 
expand recycling services and capabilities to reach a broader market, enhance customer value, and 
increase operating margins;
•Increase market share through initiatives to maximize volumes and through selective partnerships, 
alliances, and acquisitions;
•Productivity and continuous improvement initiatives to ensure the safety of our employees, increase 
operating eﬃciency and eﬀectiveness, advance sustainable business practices, improve natural 
resource stewardship, and reduce operating expense;
•Use of our seven deepwater ports and ground-based logistics network to directly access customers 
domestically and internationally to meet demand for our products wherever it is greatest; and
•Further optimization of our integrated recycling and steel manufacturing operating platforms to 
maximize opportunities for synergies, cost eﬃciencies, and volumes.
Key economic factors and trends aﬀecting the industries in which we operate
We sell recycled metals to the global steel industry for the production of ﬁnished steel. Our ﬁnancial results 
largely depend on supply of raw materials in the U.S. and Western Canada and demand for recycled metal in 
foreign and domestic markets and for ﬁnished steel products in the Western U.S. and Western Canada. 
Demand for most of our products is cyclical in nature and sensitive to changes in general economic 
conditions. The timing and magnitude of the economic cycles in the industries in which our products are 
used, including global steel manufacturing and nonresidential and infrastructure construction in the U.S., are 
diﬃcult to predict. Global economic conditions, including impacts of geopolitical instability and the COVID-
19 pandemic, structural and cyclical changes in supply and demand conditions, inﬂation, rising interest 
rates, and the strength of the U.S. dollar, the availability and price of raw material alternatives, and trade 
actions such as tariﬀs aﬀect market prices for and sales volumes of recycled ferrous and nonferrous metal in 
global markets and steel products in the Western U.S. and Western Canada and can have a signiﬁcant impact 
on the results of our operations.
Market conditions for recycled metals globally were weaker in ﬁscal 2023 compared to the prior ﬁscal year 
driven by weaker demand primarily from slower global growth, including due to the impact of prolonged 
China COVID-19 lockdowns, inﬂationary pressure including high energy prices and increased scrap collection 
and other operating costs, rising interest rates, and the strength of the U.S. Dollar. Demand for recycled 
metals ﬂuctuated throughout ﬁscal 2023, at times sharply, primarily reﬂecting the volatility in global steel 
demand and inventory levels. The slowdown in economic activity that began substantially in the second half 
of ﬁscal 2022 and persisted throughout ﬁscal 2023 led to reduced generation of scrap metal in the U.S. 
domestic market and increased competition for available scrap volumes. The tight supply ﬂows in 
combination with the lower price environment for recycled metals put signiﬁcant pressure on metals spreads 
in ﬁscal 2023, causing operating margin compression.
For our full 2023 ﬁscal year, the average net selling prices for our ferrous and nonferrous products decreased 
by 18% and 11%, respectively, compared to the prior ﬁscal year. In ﬁscal 2022, these average net selling 
prices increased by 19% and 23%, respectively, compared to ﬁscal 2021. For ﬁscal 2023, ferrous sales 
volumes decreased by 5% and nonferrous sales volumes increased by 7%, compared to the prior ﬁscal year. 
In ﬁscal 2022, sales volumes for these products increased by 5% and 16%, respectively, compared to ﬁscal 
2021. Our ferrous and nonferrous sales volumes in ﬁscal 2023 reﬂected a full year, and in ﬁscal 2022 
reﬂected a partial year, of additional volumes arising from the Columbus Recycling business acquired on 
October 1, 2021, and the Encore Recycling business acquired on April 29, 2022. Sales volumes for these 
products in ﬁscal 2023 reﬂected a partial year of additional volumes arising from the ScrapSource business 
acquired on November 18, 2022. As global economies revived and commercial and investment activities 
resumed in the wake of the COVID-19 pandemic, including throughout ﬁscal 2021 and continuing into ﬁscal 
2022, demand for recycled metals and ﬁnished steel increased substantially, which contributed to periods of 
sharp increases in market selling prices for these products. Demand began to weaken in the fourth quarter 
of ﬁscal 2022, which continued into ﬁscal 2023 amid macroeconomic concerns including slower growth and 
inﬂationary pressures. During ﬁscal 2023, we experienced periods of market recovery, but market conditions 
for recycled metals, including supply ﬂows, were weaker overall in comparison to ﬁscal 2022. Average net 
selling prices for our ﬁnished steel products, which are produced in our steel mill using EAF technology, 
decreased by 13% in ﬁscal 2023 compared to 
35 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
the record-high levels reached in the prior ﬁscal year, but remained at historically high levels, reﬂecting 
continued strong market demand for these products.
We continue to believe decarbonization eﬀorts by companies, industries, and governments around the world, 
including investments in low carbon technologies such as renewable energies, electric vehicles, and energy 
eﬃciency solutions that are more metal intensive and minimize carbon dioxide emissions from the use of 
fossil fuels, among other factors, support global long-term demand for our recycled metal products.
Steel Mill Fire 
On May 22, 2021, we experienced a ﬁre at our steel mill in McMinnville, Oregon. Direct physical loss or 
damage to property from the incident was limited to the mill’s melt shop, with no bodily injuries and no 
physical loss or damage to other buildings or equipment. The rolling mill production ceased in early June 
2021. In August 2021, our steel mill began ramping up operations following the substantial completion of 
replacement and repairs of property and equipment in the melt shop that had been lost or damaged by the 
ﬁre. We experienced loss of business income during the shutdown of the steel mill and the subsequent 
ramp-up phase which was substantially completed during the second quarter of ﬁscal 2022. We have 
insurance that is fully applicable to the losses and ﬁled insurance claims, which are subject to deductibles 
and various conditions, exclusions, and limits, for the property that experienced physical loss or damage and 
business income losses resulting from the matter. The property damage deductible under the policies 
insuring our assets in this matter is $1 million, while the deductible for lost business income is 10 times the 
Average Daily Gross Earnings which would have been earned had no interruption occurred, calculated 
subject to judgments and uncertainties. In ﬁscal 2021, we recognized an initial $10 million insurance 
receivable and related insurance recovery gain, the latter reported within cost of goods sold on the 
Consolidated Statements of Operations, primarily oﬀsetting applicable losses incurred including capital 
purchases of $10 million that we had incurred as of the end of the ﬁscal year. In ﬁscal 2022, we increased 
the amount of this insurance receivable to $25 million and recognized a related $15 million insurance 
recovery gain within cost of goods sold on the Consolidated Statements of Operations, reﬂecting recovery of 
applicable losses incurred as a result of the ﬁre to date. In addition, during ﬁscal 2022, we received advance 
payments from insurers totaling approximately $30 million towards our claims, which amount reduced the 
$25 million insurance receivable to zero with the remaining amount of advance payments of $5 million 
reported within other accrued liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheets as of August 31, 2022. In ﬁscal 
2023, we received additional cash payments from insurers towards our claims totaling approximately $22 
million, and in the fourth quarter of ﬁscal 2023 we reached a full and ﬁnal settlement with our insurers for 
our claims and recognized an additional $27 million insurance recovery gain within cost of goods sold on the 
Consolidated Statements of Operations, reﬂecting recovery of applicable losses including business income 
losses incurred as a result of the ﬁre.
Everett Facility Shredder Fire 
On December 8, 2021, we experienced a ﬁre at our metals recycling facility in Everett, Massachusetts. Direct 
physical loss or damage to property from the incident was limited to the facility’s shredder building and 
equipment, with no bodily injuries and no physical loss or damage to property reported at other buildings or 
equipment. As a result of the ﬁre, shredding operations ceased, while all non-shredding operations at the 
facility continued, including torching, shearing, separating, and sorting purchased non-shreddable recycled 
ferrous metals. On January 28, 2022, shredding operations at the facility began ramping up following the 
replacement and repairs to shredder equipment that had been damaged. In addition, shredding operations 
temporarily ceased at the facility on June 18, 2022 and, following discussions with the Massachusetts 
Department of Environmental Protection and the Massachusetts Attorney General’s oﬃce, we installed a 
temporary emission capture system and controls that allowed for us to resume shredding operations on 
November 11, 2022 and for continued operation during the repair and replacement of the shredder enclosure 
building. Non-shredding operations at the facility continued during this period. The repair and replacement of 
most property that experienced physical loss or damage, primarily buildings and improvements, was 
substantially completed by the end of ﬁscal 2023. We have insurance that we believe is fully applicable to 
the losses, including but not limited to the costs of installing the temporary capture and controls system and 
any associated loss of business income, and have ﬁled insurance claims, which are subject to deductibles 
and various conditions, exclusions, and limits, for the property damage or loss and business income losses 
resulting from the matter. The property damage deductible under the policies insuring our assets in this 
matter is $0.5 million, while the deductible for lost business income is 10 times the Average Daily Gross 
Earnings which would have been earned had no interruption occurred, calculated subject to judgments and 
uncertainties. The insurance claims resolution process may extend signiﬁcantly beyond completion of repair 
and replacement of the physical plant property that experienced physical loss or damage and the restart of 
production activities. In ﬁscal 2022, after the ﬁre, we recognized an aggregate $17 million insurance 
receivable and related insurance recovery gain. In ﬁscal 2023, we recognized an additional $16 million 
insurance receivable and related insurance recovery gain. As of August 31, 2023, we had recognized a total 
of $34 million in insurance recovery gains, all reported within cost of goods sold on the Consolidated 
Statements of Operations, reﬂecting recovery of applicable losses to date including impairment charges of 
$7 million related to the carrying value of plant and equipment assets lost in or damaged by the ﬁre, and 
capital purchases, non-capitalizable repair and replacement costs, and other applicable losses totaling $27 
million that had been incurred as of August 31, 2023. Also, during ﬁscal 2023 and 2022, we received advance 
payments from insurers totaling approximately 
36 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
$26 million and $7 million, respectively, towards our claims, and not reﬂecting any ﬁnal or full settlement of 
claims with the insurers, which amount reduced the insurance receivable to $1 million and $10 million as of 
August 31, 2023 and 2022, respectively. The insurance receivable is reported within prepaid expenses and 
other current assets on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. These amounts do not reﬂect potential additional 
recoveries of costs for the repair and replacement of property that experienced physical loss or damage or 
of business income losses resulting from this matter that may be recognized in the future when settlements 
of the claims are resolved.
Coronavirus Disease 2019 (“COVID-19”) 
Following the onset of COVID-19 and its negative eﬀects on our business, most prominently reﬂected in our 
ﬁscal 2020 results, global economic conditions improved beginning in ﬁscal 2021 and continued to improve 
through most of ﬁscal 2022. However, there are ongoing global impacts resulting directly or indirectly from 
the pandemic, including labor shortages, logistical challenges, and increases in costs for certain goods and 
services including due to the impact of inﬂation, which have negatively impacted our sales volumes, 
operating costs, and ﬁnancial results to varying degrees.
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In this management’s discussion and analysis, we use supplemental measures of our performance, liquidity, 
and capital structure which are derived from our consolidated ﬁnancial information but which are not 
presented in our consolidated ﬁnancial statements prepared in accordance with GAAP. We believe that 
providing these non-GAAP ﬁnancial measures adds a meaningful presentation of our operating and ﬁnancial 
performance, liquidity, and capital structure. We use adjusted EBITDA as one of the measures to compare 
and evaluate ﬁnancial performance. Adjusted EBITDA is the sum of our net income before results from 
discontinued operations, interest expense, income taxes, depreciation and amortization, goodwill 
impairment charges, other asset impairment charges, charges for legacy environmental matters (net of 
recoveries), restructuring charges and other exit-related activities, business development costs not related 
to ongoing operations including pre-acquisition expenses, charges related to non-ordinary course legal 
settlements, and other items which are not related to underlying business operational performance. See the 
reconciliations of supplemental ﬁnancial measures, including adjusted EBITDA, in Non-GAAP Financial 
Measures at the end of this Item 7.
Our non-GAAP ﬁnancial measures should be considered in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the most 
directly comparable U.S. GAAP measures. Although we ﬁnd these non-GAAP ﬁnancial measures useful in 
evaluating the performance of our business, our reliance on these measures is limited because they often 
materially diﬀer from our consolidated ﬁnancial statements presented in accordance with GAAP. Therefore, 
we typically use these adjusted amounts in conjunction with our GAAP results to address these limitations. 
Our non-GAAP ﬁnancial measures may not be comparable to similarly titled measures of other companies. 
Other companies, including companies in our industry, may calculate non-GAAP ﬁnancial measures 
diﬀerently than we do, limiting the usefulness of those measures for comparative purposes.
 
37 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
Financial Highlights of Results of Operations for Fiscal 2023 
•Diluted loss per share from continuing operations attributable to Radius shareholders in ﬁscal 2023 
was $0.92, compared to earnings per share of $5.72 in the prior ﬁscal year.
•Adjusted diluted earnings per share from continuing operations attributable to Radius shareholders in 
ﬁscal 2023 was $0.85, compared to $6.07 in the prior ﬁscal year.
•Net loss in ﬁscal 2023 was $25 million, compared to net income of $172 million in the prior ﬁscal 
year.
•Adjusted EBITDA in ﬁscal 2023 was $144 million, compared to $313 million in the prior ﬁscal year.
Market conditions for recycled metals were weaker in ﬁscal 2023 compared to the prior ﬁscal year, leading 
to signiﬁcantly lower average net selling prices for our ferrous and nonferrous products and a compression in 
metal spreads. The average net selling prices for our ferrous and nonferrous products decreased by 18% and 
11%, respectively, compared to ﬁscal 2022. Ferrous and nonferrous sales volumes decreased by 5% and 
increased by 7%, respectively, compared to the prior ﬁscal year, which changes included additional volumes 
arising from our three business acquisitions completed during ﬁscal 2022 and 2023, as well as the adverse 
impact on sales volumes in the prior ﬁscal year of the initial Everett shredder downtime. Our ferrous and 
nonferrous sales volumes in ﬁscal 2023 were adversely impacted by disruptions related to an extended 
shredder outage at the Everett facility and a regulatory issue limiting operations at our shredder facility in 
California, both of which were resolved by mid-November 2022. Our nonferrous sales volumes in ﬁscal 2023 
reﬂected additional recovery of recycled material through our advanced metal recovery technology 
investments. Average net selling prices for our ﬁnished steel products decreased by 13% compared to the 
record-high prices in the prior ﬁscal year, contributing to lower metal spreads. Finished steel sales volumes 
increased by 12% in ﬁscal 2023, primarily reﬂecting the impact on the prior ﬁscal year volumes of the ramp 
up of steel mill operations which was substantially completed during the second quarter of ﬁscal 2022 
following the May 2021 steel mill ﬁre. Our results in ﬁscal 2023 also reﬂected the unfavorable impact of 
tighter supply ﬂows of scrap metal and reduced processed volumes in the lower price and slower economic 
environment, signiﬁcantly lower year-over-year platinum group metals (PGM) prices, and inﬂationary 
pressure on operating costs, as well as a favorable change in the eﬀect of average inventory accounting 
year-over-year. In addition, our results in ﬁscal 2023 included $51 million in goodwill and other asset 
impairment charges and $43 million in insurance recovery gains relating to the steel mill ﬁre and the Everett 
facility shredder ﬁre. Starting in the third quarter of ﬁscal 2023, we achieved the full quarterly run rate of $10 
million of productivity initiatives announced in October 2022 and the full quarterly run rate of $5 million of 
selling, general, and administrative (“SG&A”) savings initiatives announced in January 2023, which helped to 
oﬀset the eﬀects of higher operating costs including from inﬂationary pressure.
SG&A expense in ﬁscal 2023 was relatively ﬂat compared to the prior ﬁscal year reﬂecting lower incentive 
compensation accruals due to Company performance, partially oﬀset by higher salaries and wages and 
outside and professional services expenses, due in part to our acquisitions and other growth-related 
initiatives, as well as higher legacy environmental charges and the impact of inﬂation. These higher 
expenses in ﬁscal 2023 were partially oﬀset by beneﬁts from productivity and cost reduction initiatives 
when compared to the prior ﬁscal year.
The following items further highlight selected liquidity and capital structure metrics:
•Net cash provided by operating activities of $139 million in ﬁscal 2023, compared to $238 million in 
the prior ﬁscal year.
•Debt was $249 million as of both August 31, 2022 and 2023.
•Debt, net of cash, was $243 million as of August 31, 2023, compared to $205 million as of August 31, 
2022.
See the reconciliations of adjusted diluted earnings per share from continuing operations attributable to 
Radius shareholders, adjusted EBITDA, and debt, net of cash in Non-GAAP Financial Measures at the end of 
this Item 7.
38 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
Results of Operations
Selected Financial Measures and Operating Statistics
   For the Year Ended August 31,  % Increase 
(Decrease)  
($ in thousands, except for prices 
and per share amounts)  2023  2022  2021  2023 vs. 
2022  2022 vs. 
2021  
Ferrous revenues  $1,439,9
83  $1,914,2
55  $1,557,89
1    (25)%   23%
Nonferrous revenues   781,102   892,444   684,862    (12)%   30%
Steel revenues   507,550   531,731   379,203    (5)%   40%
Retail and other revenues   153,589   147,385   136,595    4%   8%
Total revenues   2,882,2
24   3,485,8
15   2,758,55
1    (17)%   26%
Cost of goods sold   2,574,5
13   2,997,7
45   2,305,35
7    (14)%   30%
Gross margin (total revenues less cost of 
goods sold)  $307,711  $488,070  $453,194    (37)%   8%
Gross margin (%)    10.7%   14.0%   16.4%   (24)%   (15)%
Selling, general and administrative 
expense  $265,929  $263,257  $242,463    1%   9%
Diluted (loss) earnings per share from 
continuing operations attributable to 
Radius shareholders:                     
Reported  $(0.92) $ 5.72  $ 5.66   NM    1%
Adjusted  $ 0.85  $ 6.07  $ 6.13    (86)%   (1)%
Net (loss) income  $(25,438) $171,996  $169,975   NM    1%
Adjusted EBITDA  $144,327  $312,715  $289,209    (54)%   8%
Recycled ferrous metal average sales 
prices ($/LT):                     
Domestic  $ 360  $ 438  $ 364    (18)%   20%
Foreign  $ 376  $ 457  $ 385    (18)%   19%
Average  $ 371  $ 452  $ 381    (18)%   19%
Ferrous volumes (LT, in thousands):                     
Domestic   1,952   1,806    1,500    8%   20%
Foreign   2,424   2,810    2,908    (14)%   (3)%
Total ferrous volumes (LT, in 
thousands)   4,376   4,616    4,408    (5)%   5%
Recycled nonferrous metal average sales 
price ($/pound)  $ 0.96  $ 1.08  $ 0.88    (11)%   23%
Nonferrous volumes (pounds, in 
thousands)   738,937   687,419   593,378    7%   16%
Finished steel average sales price ($/ST) $ 930  $1,075  $ 737    (13)%   46%
Finished steel sales volumes (ST, in 
thousands)    521    465    488    12%   (5)%
Cars purchased (in thousands)    286    312    338    (8)%   (8)%
Number of auto parts stores at period 
end    50    51    50    (2)%   2%
Rolling mill utilization    89%   88%   78%   1%   13%
 
NM = Not Meaningful
LT = Long Ton, which is equivalent to 2,240 pounds. ST = Short Ton, which is equivalent to 2,000 pounds.
(1)Steel revenues include predominantly sales of ﬁnished steel products, in addition to sales of semi-ﬁnished goods (billets) 
and steel manufacturing scrap.
(2)See the reconciliations of Non-GAAP Financial Measures at the end of this Item 7.
(3)Price information is shown after netting the cost of freight incurred to deliver the product to the customer.
(4)Ferrous and nonferrous volumes sold externally and delivered to our steel mill for ﬁnished steel production.
(5)May not foot due to rounding.
(6)Average sales price and volume information excludes platinum group metals in catalytic converters.
(7)Cars purchased by auto parts stores only.
(8)Rolling mill utilization is based on eﬀective annual production capacity under current conditions of 580 thousand tons of 
ﬁnished steel products.(1)
(2)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(4)(5)
(3)(6)
(4)(6)
(3)
(7)
(8)
39 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
Revenues
Revenues in ﬁscal 2023 decreased by 17% compared to the prior ﬁscal year primarily due to signiﬁcantly 
lower average net selling prices for our ferrous and nonferrous products driven by weaker market conditions 
for recycled metals globally. In ﬁscal 2023, the average net selling prices for our ferrous and nonferrous 
products decreased by 18% and 11%, respectively, compared to the prior ﬁscal year. Ferrous and nonferrous 
sales volumes decreased by 5% and increased by 7%, respectively, compared to the prior ﬁscal year. Our 
ferrous and nonferrous sales volumes in ﬁscal 2023 in part reﬂected additional volumes arising from the 
Columbus Recycling business acquired on October 1, 2021, the Encore Recycling business acquired on April 
29, 2022, and the ScrapSource business acquired on November 18, 2022, as well as the adverse impact on 
sales volumes in the prior ﬁscal year of the initial Everett shredder downtime. Our ferrous and nonferrous 
sales volumes in ﬁscal 2023 were adversely impacted by disruptions related to an extended shredder outage 
at the Everett facility and a regulatory issue limiting operations at our shredder facility in California, both of 
which were resolved by mid-November 2022, as well as tight supply ﬂows in the lower price and slower 
economic environment. Our nonferrous sales volumes in ﬁscal 2023 reﬂected additional recovery of recycled 
material through our advanced metal recovery technology investments. Market conditions for our ﬁnished 
steel products were softer in ﬁscal 2023, leading to ﬁnished steel average selling prices decreasing 13%, 
compared to the record-high prices in the prior ﬁscal year. Finished steel sales volumes increased 12% in 
ﬁscal 2023, primarily reﬂecting the impact on the prior ﬁscal year volumes of the ramp up of steel mill 
operations that began in August 2021 and which was substantially completed during the second quarter of 
ﬁscal 2022. The ramp-up of steel mill operations during the ﬁrst half of ﬁscal 2022 followed completion of 
repair and replacement of damaged property arising from the May 2021 steel mill ﬁre.
Operating Performance
Net loss in ﬁscal 2023 was $25 million, compared to net income of $172 million in the prior ﬁscal year. 
Adjusted EBITDA in ﬁscal 2023 was $144 million, compared to $313 million in the prior ﬁscal year. The lower 
price environment for recycled metals, as well as the impact of tighter supply ﬂows, reduced processed 
volumes, and the extended operational disruptions in the ﬁrst quarter of ﬁscal 2023, had a signiﬁcant 
adverse impact on our operating margins and overall operating results in ﬁscal 2023. Ferrous metal spreads 
in ﬁscal 2023 decreased by approximately 21% compared to the prior ﬁscal year driven by lower selling 
prices and the cost of obtaining adequate supply ﬂows of scrap metal including end-of-life vehicles in the 
tighter supply environment. In addition, average net selling prices for our nonferrous joint products that are 
recovered from the shredding process, comprising primarily zorba, decreased by approximately 3% 
compared to the prior ﬁscal year. Finished steel metal spreads were also lower in ﬁscal 2023 compared to 
the prior ﬁscal year. Our results in ﬁscal 2023 also reﬂected the unfavorable impact of tighter supply ﬂows of 
scrap metal and reduced processed volumes in the lower price and slower economic environment, 
signiﬁcantly lower year-over-year PGM prices, and inﬂationary pressure on operating costs, as well as a 
favorable change in the eﬀect of average inventory accounting year-over-year. In addition, our results in 
ﬁscal 2023 included $51 million in goodwill and other asset impairment charges and $43 million in insurance 
recovery gains relating to the steel mill ﬁre and the Everett facility shredder ﬁre. Starting in the third quarter 
of ﬁscal 2023, we achieved the full quarterly run rate of $10 million of productivity initiatives announced in 
October 2022 and the full quarterly run rate of $5 million of selling, general, and administrative (“SG&A”) 
savings initiatives announced in January 2023, which helped to oﬀset the eﬀects of higher operating costs 
including from inﬂationary pressure.
SG&A expense in ﬁscal 2023 was relatively ﬂat compared to the prior ﬁscal year reﬂecting lower incentive 
compensation accruals due to Company performance, partially oﬀset by higher salaries and wages and 
outside and professional services expenses, due in part to our acquisitions and other growth-related 
initiatives, as well as higher legacy environmental charges and the impact of inﬂation. These higher 
expenses in ﬁscal 2023 were partially oﬀset by beneﬁts from productivity and cost reduction initiatives 
when compared to the prior ﬁscal year.
In October 2022, we announced and began implementing productivity and cost reduction initiatives with a 
targeted annual beneﬁt of approximately $40 million. In addition, in January 2023, we announced 
incremental initiatives aiming to reduce SG&A costs by approximately $20 million annually. These initiatives 
aim to improve proﬁtability through a combination of increased yields, eﬃciencies in processing, 
procurement, and pricing, and reduced costs including from headcount reductions, decreased lease costs, 
professional and outside services, and implementation of operational eﬃciencies. Starting in the third 
quarter of ﬁscal 2023, we achieved the full quarterly run rate of beneﬁts from these initiatives, and others 
implemented during ﬁscal 2022, which helped to partially oﬀset the eﬀects of inﬂationary pressure on 
operating costs.
In the fourth quarter of ﬁscal 2023, we performed the annual goodwill impairment test as of July 1, 2023, 
which resulted in a non-cash goodwill impairment charge of $39 million, representing a portion of the 
carrying amount of goodwill allocated to one reporting unit comprising a regional metals recycling operation, 
while the goodwill allocated to our other reporting units was deemed to not be impaired. We did not record 
any goodwill impairment charges in ﬁscal 2022. See further discussion in the Critical Accounting Estimates 
section at the end of Part II, Item of this report.
40 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
See the reconciliation of adjusted EBITDA in the Non-GAAP Financial Measures at the end of this Item 7.
Interest Expense
Interest expense was $19 million, $9 million, and $5 million as of August 31, 2023, 2022, and 2021, 
respectively. The increase in interest expense was primarily due to higher interest rates on amounts 
outstanding under our bank credit facilities, as well as increased average borrowings, compared to the prior 
ﬁscal year.
Income Taxes
    Year Ended August 31,  
   2023   2022    2021  
(Loss) income from continuing operations before income 
taxes  $ (28,076) $216,676  $ 207,989 
Income tax beneﬁt (expense)  $ 2,747  $ (44,597) $ (37,935)
Eﬀective tax rate    9.8%   20.6%   18.2%
Our eﬀective tax rate from continuing operations for ﬁscal 2023 was a beneﬁt on pre-tax loss of 9.8%, 
compared to an expense on pre-tax income of 20.6% for ﬁscal 2022. Our eﬀective tax rate from continuing 
operations for ﬁscal 2023 was lower than the U.S. federal statutory rate of 21% primarily due to the 
aggregate eﬀect of the relatively low absolute level of pre-tax earnings, permanent diﬀerences from non-
deductible expenses, and unrecognized tax beneﬁts. Our eﬀective tax rate from continuing operations for 
ﬁscal 2022 approximated the U.S. federal statutory rate of 21%, reﬂecting tax beneﬁts from vesting of share-
based awards, the foreign derived intangible income (“FDII”) deduction, and research and development 
credits, oﬀset by the aggregate impact of state taxes and permanent diﬀerences from non-deductible 
expenses.
We assess the realizability of our deferred tax assets on a quarterly basis through an analysis of potential 
sources of future taxable income, including prior ﬁscal year taxable income available to absorb a carryback 
of tax losses, reversals of existing taxable temporary diﬀerences, tax planning strategies, and forecasts of 
taxable income. We consider all negative and positive evidence to determine if valuation allowances against 
deferred tax assets are required. We continue to maintain valuation allowances against certain deferred tax 
assets in certain jurisdictions as a result of negative evidence, including historical losses in these 
jurisdictions, which indicates that it is more-likely-than-not that the associated tax beneﬁt will not be 
realized. Realization of the deferred tax assets is dependent upon generating suﬃcient taxable income in 
the associated tax jurisdictions in future years to beneﬁt from the reversal of net deductible temporary 
diﬀerences. We will continue to regularly assess the realizability of deferred tax assets. Changes in historical 
earnings performance and future earnings projections, among other factors, may cause us to adjust our 
valuation allowance on deferred tax assets, which would impact our results of operations in the period we 
determine that these factors have changed.
Inﬂation Reduction Act
On August 16, 2022, the Inﬂation Reduction Act of 2022 (“IRA”) was signed into law, with tax provisions 
primarily focused on implementing a 15% Corporate Alternative Minimum Tax (“CAMT”) and a 1% excise tax 
on corporate share repurchases. As of August 31, 2023, we did not meet the threshold to be subject to the 
CAMT. We may, however, be subject to the 1% excise tax on future share repurchases.
 
Liquidity and Capital Resources
We rely on cash provided by operating activities as a primary source of liquidity, supplemented by current 
cash on hand and borrowings under our existing credit facilities.
Sources and Uses of Cash
We had cash balances of $6 million and $44 million as of August 31, 2023 and 2022, respectively. Cash 
balances are intended to be used primarily for working capital, capital expenditures, dividends, share 
repurchases, investments, and acquisitions. We use excess cash on hand to reduce amounts outstanding 
under our credit facilities. As of both August 31, 2023 and 2022, debt was $249 million, and debt, net of cash, 
was $243 million as of August 31, 2023, compared to $205 million as of August 31, 2022, which increase was 
primarily due to lower cash balances resulting from the repayment of increased borrowings from our credit 
facilities during ﬁscal 2023 to fund the acquisition of the ScrapSource business on November 18, 2022, and 
capital expenditures. See the reconciliation of debt, net of cash, in Non-GAAP Financial Measures at the end 
of this Item 7.
41 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
Operating Activities
Net cash provided by operating activities in ﬁscal 2023 was $139 million, compared to $238 million in ﬁscal 
2022.
Sources of cash other than from earnings in ﬁscal 2023 included a $48 million decrease in inventories 
primarily due to lower raw material purchase costs and the timing of purchases and sales and a $12 million 
decrease in accounts receivable primarily due to the timing of sales and collections. Uses of cash in ﬁscal 
2023 included a $24 million decrease in accrued payroll and related liabilities primarily due to decreased 
incentive compensation liabilities and a $14 million decrease in accrued liabilities due in part to recognition 
through ﬁscal 2023 earnings of advance payments received from insurers in excess of recoveries as of the 
end of ﬁscal 2022 upon full and ﬁnal settlement with our insurers for our claims arising from the May 2021 
steel mill ﬁre.
Sources of cash other than from earnings in ﬁscal 2022 included a $21 million increase in accounts payable 
primarily due to higher raw material purchase prices and the timing of purchases and payments. Uses of 
cash in ﬁscal 2022 included a $37 million increase in inventories due to higher raw material purchase costs 
and the timing of purchases and sales, a $19 million increase in prepaid expenses and other current assets 
primarily due to increased receivables from insurers, a $15 million decrease in environmental liabilities 
primarily due to payments in connection with legacy environmental matters, and a $14 million decrease in 
accrued payroll and related liabilities primarily due to decreased incentive compensation liabilities. The 
sources and uses of cash related to operating activities described above also reﬂect higher net working 
capital needs during the ramp-up of steel mill operations that began in August 2021 following completion of 
repair and replacement of damaged property arising from the May 2021 steel mill ﬁre.
Investing Activities
Net cash used in investing activities in ﬁscal 2023 was $144 million, compared to $316 million in ﬁscal 2022.
Cash used in investing activities in ﬁscal 2023 included $25 million paid to acquire the assets of the 
ScrapSource business on November 18, 2022. We funded this acquisition using cash on hand and borrowings 
under our existing credit facilities. See Note 7 - Business Acquisitions in the Notes to the Consolidated 
Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8 of this report for further detail. Cash used in investing activities in 
ﬁscal 2023 also included capital expenditures of $130 million to upgrade our equipment and infrastructure 
and for investments in advanced metals recovery technology and environmental and safety-related assets, 
compared to $150 million in the prior ﬁscal year. Cash ﬂows from investing activities in ﬁscal 2023 included 
proceeds of $8 million representing the portion of advance payments from insurers deemed a recovery of 
capital purchases incurred for repair and replacement of damaged property arising from the December 2021 
Everett facility shredder ﬁre, compared to such proceeds totaling $17 million in the prior ﬁscal year in 
connection with our insurance claims relating to the May 2021 steel mill ﬁre and the December 2021 Everett 
facility shredder ﬁre.
Cash used in investing activities in ﬁscal 2022 included $117 million paid to acquire the Columbus Recycling 
business on October 1, 2021, which amount included $10 million paid primarily for net working capital in 
excess of an agreed-upon benchmark, and also included $63 million paid to acquire the Encore Recycling 
business on April 29, 2022, which amount included $8 million paid at closing for estimated net working 
capital in excess of an agreed-upon benchmark. We funded these acquisitions using cash on hand and 
borrowings under our existing credit facilities. Cash used in investing activities in ﬁscal 2022 also included 
the purchase of an investment in the equity of a privately-held Canadian recycling entity for $5 million.
Financing Activities
Net cash used in ﬁnancing activities for ﬁscal 2023 was $33 million, compared to net cash provided by 
ﬁnancing activities of $95 million in ﬁscal 2022.
Cash ﬂows from ﬁnancing activities in ﬁscal 2023 included $3 million in net repayment of debt, compared to 
$166 million in net borrowings of debt in the prior ﬁscal year (refer to Non-GAAP Financial Measures at the 
end of this Item 7). Uses of cash in ﬁscal 2023 and 2022 included $8 million and $11 million, respectively, 
for payment of employee tax withholdings resulting from settlement of share-based awards and $21 million 
in each ﬁscal year for the payment of dividends.
42 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
Debt
Following is a summary of our outstanding balances and availability on credit facilities and long-term debt, 
exclusive of ﬁnance lease obligations (in thousands):
   Outstanding 
as of
August 31, 
2023   Remaining
Availability 
Bank secured revolving credit facilities  $ 230,000  $ 573,472 
Other debt obligations  $ 12,192   N/A 
 
(1)Remaining availability is net of $8 million of outstanding stand-by letters of credit as of August 31, 2023.
Our senior secured revolving credit facilities, which provide for revolving loans of $800 million and C$15 
million, mature in August 2027 pursuant to a credit agreement with Bank of America, N.A., as administrative 
agent, and other lenders party thereto. Interest rates on outstanding indebtedness under the credit 
agreement are based, at our option, on either the Secured Overnight Financing Rate (“SOFR”) (or the 
Canadian Dollar Oﬀered Rate, “CDOR” for C$ loans), plus a spread of between 1.25% and 2.00%, with the 
amount of the spread based on a pricing grid tied to our ratio of consolidated net funded debt to EBITDA (as 
deﬁned by the credit agreement), or the greater of (a) the prime rate, (b) the federal funds rate plus 0.50% or 
(c) the daily rate equal to Term SOFR plus 1.00%, in each case, plus a spread of between 0.25% and 1.00% 
based on a pricing grid tied to our consolidated net funded debt to EBITDA ratio. In addition, commitment 
fees are payable on the unused portion of the credit facilities at rates between 0.175% and 0.30% based on a 
pricing grid tied to our ratio of consolidated net funded debt to EBITDA.
Under the credit agreement, we may establish one or more key performance indicators (“KPIs”) to measure 
our performance with respect to certain of our environmental, social and governance targets. Subject to the 
terms and conditions of the credit agreement, we may propose to amend the credit agreement to modify (i) 
the pricing spread and (ii) the commitment fee rate. Such modiﬁcations would be tied to our performance 
against the KPIs and would allow for (i) the pricing spread to be increased or decreased by no more than (a) 
0.025% per KPI and (b) 0.05% for all KPIs, and (ii) the commitment fee rate to be increased or decreased by 
no more than 0.005% for all KPIs. Such adjustments would be determined on an annual basis and would not 
be cumulative.
We had borrowings outstanding under our credit facilities of $230 million as of both August 31, 2023 and 
2022. The weighted average interest rate on amounts outstanding under our credit facilities was 7.17% and 
3.65% as of August 31, 2023 and 2022, respectively. In the fourth quarter of ﬁscal 2023, we entered three 
interest rate swap transactions to hedge the variability in interest cash ﬂows associated with our variable-
rate loans under our credit facilities. The interest rate swaps require us to make ﬁxed-rate payments based 
on a total notional amount of $150 million and an average annual rate of approximately 4.40% in exchange 
for the receipt of variable-rate amounts over a three-year term ending in August 2026. See Note 15 - 
Derivative Financial Instruments in Part II, Item 8 of this report for disclosure related to derivative 
instruments and hedging activities.
We use the credit facilities to fund working capital, capital expenditures, dividends, share repurchases, 
investments, and acquisitions. Our credit agreement contains various representations and warranties, 
events of default, and ﬁnancial and other customary covenants which limit (subject to certain exceptions) 
our ability to, among other things, incur or suﬀer to exist certain liens, make investments, incur or guaranty 
additional indebtedness, enter into consolidations, mergers, acquisitions, and sales of assets, make 
distributions and other restricted payments, change the nature of our business, engage in transactions with 
aﬃliates, and enter into restrictive agreements, including agreements that restrict the ability of our 
subsidiaries to make distributions. As of August 31, 2023, the ﬁnancial covenants under the credit 
agreement included (a) a consolidated ﬁxed charge coverage ratio, deﬁned as the four-quarter rolling sum of 
consolidated EBITDA less deﬁned maintenance capital expenditures and certain environmental expenditures 
divided by consolidated ﬁxed charges, and (b) a consolidated leverage ratio, deﬁned as consolidated funded 
indebtedness divided by the sum of consolidated net worth and consolidated funded indebtedness.
As of August 31, 2023, we were in compliance with the ﬁnancial covenants under our credit agreement. The 
consolidated ﬁxed charge coverage ratio was required to be no less than 1.50 to 1.00 and was 3.08 to 1.00 
as of August 31, 2023. The consolidated leverage ratio was required to be no more than 0.55 to 1.00 and was 
0.22 to 1.00 as of August 31, 2023.
Our obligations under our credit agreement are guaranteed by substantially all of our subsidiaries. The credit 
facilities and the related guarantees are secured by senior ﬁrst priority liens on certain of our and our 
subsidiaries’ assets, including equipment, inventory, and accounts receivable.
While we currently expect to remain in compliance with the ﬁnancial covenants under the credit agreement, 
we may not be able to do so in the event market conditions or other factors have a signiﬁcant adverse (1)
impact on our results of operations and ﬁnancial position. If we do not maintain compliance with our 
ﬁnancial covenants and are unable to obtain an amendment or waiver from our lenders, a breach of a 
ﬁnancial covenant would constitute an event of default and allow the lenders to exercise remedies under the 
agreements, the 
43 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
most severe of which is the termination of the credit facility under our committed bank credit agreement 
and acceleration of the amounts owed under the agreement. In such case, we would be required to evaluate 
available alternatives and take appropriate steps to obtain alternative funds. We cannot assure that any 
such alternative funds, if sought, could be obtained or, if obtained, would be adequate or on acceptable 
terms.
Other debt obligations, which totaled $12 million and $13 million as of August 31, 2023 and 2022, 
respectively, primarily relate to equipment purchases, the contract consideration for which includes an 
obligation to make future monthly payments to the vendor in the form of licensing fees. For accounting 
purposes, such obligations are treated as a partial ﬁnancing of the purchase price by the equipment vendor. 
Monthly payments commence when the equipment is placed in service and achieves speciﬁed minimum 
operating metrics, with payments continuing for a period of four years thereafter.
Capital Expenditures
Capital expenditures totaled $130 million for ﬁscal 2023, compared to $150 million for ﬁscal 2022. Capital 
expenditures included approximately $33 million and $51 million for investments in growth in ﬁscal 2023 
and 2022, respectively. We currently plan to invest approximately $100 million in capital expenditures in 
ﬁscal 2024. These capital expenditures include investments in growth, including new nonferrous processing 
technologies, and to support volume initiatives as well as post-acquisition and other growth projects, and 
investments to upgrade our equipment and infrastructure and for environmental and safety-related assets, 
using cash generated from operations and available credit facilities. Supply chain disruptions have 
contributed to some delays in construction activities and equipment deliveries related to our capital 
projects, and to the time required to obtain permits from government agencies, resulting in the deferral of 
certain capital expenditures. Given the continually evolving nature of such disruptions and other factors 
impacting the timing of project completion, the extent to which forecasted capital expenditures could be 
deferred is uncertain.
Environmental Compliance
Building on our commitment to recycling and operating our business in an environmentally responsible 
manner, we continue to invest in facilities that improve our environmental presence in the communities in 
which we operate. As part of our capital expenditures discussed in the prior paragraph, we invested 
approximately $33 million in capital expenditures for environmental projects in ﬁscal 2023, and we currently 
plan to invest approximately $35 million for such projects in ﬁscal 2024. These projects include investments 
in equipment to ensure ongoing compliance with air quality and other environmental regulations and storm 
water systems.
We have been identiﬁed by the EPA as one of the potentially responsible parties that own or operate or 
formerly owned or operated sites which are part of or adjacent to Portland Harbor. See Note 10 - 
Commitments and Contingencies in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8 of 
this report for a discussion of this matter, as well as other legacy environmental loss contingencies. We 
believe it is not possible to reasonably estimate the amount or range of costs which we are likely to or 
which it is reasonably possible that we will incur in connection with Portland Harbor, although such costs 
could be material to our ﬁnancial position, results of operations, cash ﬂows, and liquidity. We have insurance 
policies and Qualiﬁed Settlement Funds (“QSFs”) that we believe will provide reimbursement for costs we 
incur for defense, remediation, and mitigation for natural resource damages claims in connection with 
Portland Harbor, although there are no assurances that those policies and the QSFs will cover all of the costs 
which we may incur. Signiﬁcant cash outﬂows in the future related to Portland Harbor could reduce the 
amounts available for borrowing that could otherwise be used for working capital, capital expenditures, 
dividends, share repurchases, investments, and acquisitions and could result in our failure to maintain 
compliance with certain covenants in our debt agreements, and could adversely impact our liquidity.
Dividends
On June 27, 2023, our Board of Directors declared a dividend for the fourth quarter of ﬁscal 2023 of $0.1875 
per common share, which equates to an annual cash dividend of $0.75 per common share. Dividends of 
$0.75 per common share, totaling $21 million, were declared and paid during ﬁscal 2023, and $21 million in 
dividends were also declared and paid during ﬁscal 2022.
Share Repurchase Program
We did not repurchase any shares of our common stock during ﬁscal 2023. For information regarding share 
repurchases during ﬁscal 2022, see “Item 5. Market for Registrant's Common Equity, Related Stockholder 
Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities” above in Part II of this report, incorporated by reference 
herein. 
Assessment of Liquidity and Capital Resources
Historically, our available cash resources, internally generated funds, credit facilities, and equity oﬀerings 
have ﬁnanced our acquisitions, capital expenditures, working capital, and other ﬁnancing needs.
44 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
We generally believe our current cash resources, internally generated funds, existing credit facilities, and 
access to the capital markets will provide adequate short-term and long-term liquidity needs for working 
capital, capital expenditures, dividends, share repurchases, investments and acquisitions, joint ventures, 
debt service requirements, environmental obligations, and other contingencies. However, in the event of a 
sustained market deterioration, we may need additional liquidity which would require us to evaluate 
available alternatives and take appropriate steps to obtain suﬃcient additional funds. There can be no 
assurances that any such supplemental funding, if sought, could be obtained or, if obtained, would be 
adequate or on acceptable terms.
Contractual Obligations 
We have certain contractual obligations to make future payments. The following table summarizes future 
obligations related to debt and leases as of August 31, 2023 (in thousands): 
    Payment Due by Period  
   2024  2025  2026  2027  2028  Thereaf
ter  Totals 
Contractual Obligations                             
Credit facilities
 $ —  $ —  $ —  $230,00
0  $ —  $ —  $230,00
0 
Interest payments on credit 
facilities  $16,491  $16,491  $16,491  $16,084  $ —  $ —  $65,557 
Other debt, including interest $3,924  $2,799  $2,799  $2,799  $ 704  $ 234  $13,259 
Finance leases, including 
interest  $2,558  $1,746  $1,262  $1,103  $ 939  $ 445  $8,053 
Operating leases
 $23,768  $19,391  $15,503  $13,546  $10,901  $55,434  $138,54
3 
 
(1)Credit facilities include the principal amount of borrowings outstanding under bank secured revolving credit facilities, 
which mature in August 2027.
(2)Interest payments on credit facilities are based on interest rates in eﬀect as of August 31, 2023. As contractual interest 
rates and the amount of debt outstanding is variable in certain cases, actual cash payments may diﬀer from the 
estimates provided.
(3)Other debt obligations primarily relate to equipment purchases, the contract consideration for which includes an 
obligation to make future monthly payments to the vendor in the form of licensing fees. For accounting purposes, such 
obligation is treated as a partial ﬁnancing of the purchase price by the equipment vendor. Monthly payments commence 
when the equipment is placed in service and continue for a period of four years thereafter.
(4)Operating lease payments reﬂect those embedded in the measurement of our operating lease liabilities and, thus, 
include future lease payments for the remaining non-cancellable period of the lease together with periods covered by 
renewal (or termination) options which we are reasonably certain to exercise (or not to exercise). These operating lease 
payments do not include certain tax, insurance, and maintenance costs, which are also required contractual obligations 
under our operating leases but are generally not ﬁxed and can ﬂuctuate from year to year. Also, we have excluded 
future minimum lease payments for leases that have been executed but have not commenced as of August 31, 2023.
In addition to future obligations related to debt and leases presented in the table above, we have certain 
material cash requirements, including but not limited to commitments for capital expenditures. See “Capital 
Expenditures” within “Liquidity and Capital Resources” above in this Item 7 for discussion of our planned 
investment in capital expenditures in ﬁscal 2024, a portion of which represents contractual commitments 
that existed as of the end of our ﬁscal 2023. We also had open purchase orders as of August 31, 2023 for 
purchases of primarily fuels and lubricants, machinery and equipment components and parts, and 
consumables used in our operations of approximately $76 million, nearly all of which require payment of 
cash in our ﬁscal 2024. 
In the fourth quarter of ﬁscal 2023, we entered three interest rate swap transactions to hedge the variability 
in interest cash ﬂows associated with our variable-rate loans under our credit facilities. The interest rate 
swaps require us to make ﬁxed-rate payments based on a total notional amount of $150 million and an 
average annual rate of approximately 4.40% in exchange for the receipt of variable-rate amounts over a 
three-year term ending in August 2026. See Note 15 - Derivative Financial Instruments in Part II, Item 8 of 
this report for disclosure related to derivative instruments and hedging activities.
See Note 13 - Employee Beneﬁts in Part II, Item 8 of this report for disclosure related to qualiﬁed and 
nonqualiﬁed retirement plans, which include a deﬁned beneﬁt pension plan, a supplemental executive 
retirement beneﬁt plan, multiemployer pension plans, deﬁned contribution plans, and a deferred 
compensation plan. 
We maintain stand-by letters of credit to provide support for certain obligations, including workers’ 
compensation and performance bonds. As of August 31, 2023, we had $8 million outstanding under these 
arrangements.(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
45 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
Critical Accounting Estimates
The preparation of ﬁnancial statements in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the 
United States of America requires us to make certain judgments, estimates, and assumptions regarding 
uncertainties that aﬀect the reported amounts of assets, liabilities, revenues and expenses, and related 
disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities. An accounting estimate is deemed to be critical if it is made 
based on assumptions and judgments about matters that are inherently uncertain at the time the estimate is 
made, if diﬀerent estimates reasonably could have been used, or if changes in the estimate that are 
reasonably likely to occur could materially impact our consolidated ﬁnancial statements. Because of the 
uncertainty inherent in these matters, actual results could diﬀer from the estimates we use. We are not 
currently aware of any reasonably likely events or circumstances that would result in materially diﬀerent 
amounts being reported.
Our critical accounting estimates include those related to inventories, business acquisitions, long-lived 
assets, goodwill, environmental costs, and income taxes.
Inventories
Our inventories consist of processed and unprocessed scrap metal (ferrous, nonferrous, and mixed 
nonferrous recovered joint products arising from the manufacturing process), semi-ﬁnished steel products 
(billets), ﬁnished steel products (primarily rebar, wire rod, and merchant bar), used and salvaged vehicles, 
and supplies. Inventories are stated at the lower of cost and net realizable value. We consider estimated 
future selling prices when determining the estimated net realizable value of our inventory. As we generally 
sell our recycled ferrous metal under contracts that provide for shipment within 30 to 60 days after the price 
is agreed, we utilize the selling prices under committed contracts and sales orders for determining the 
estimated net realizable value of quantities on hand that will be shipped under these contracts and sales 
orders.
The accounting process we use to record ferrous scrap metal quantities relies on signiﬁcant estimates. With 
respect to estimating the quantities of unprocessed ferrous scrap metal inventory that are moved into 
production, we rely on weighed quantities of the processed ferrous material, adjusted for estimated metal 
recoveries and yields that are based on historical trends and other judgments by management. Actual 
recoveries and yields can vary depending on product quality, moisture content, and the source of the 
unprocessed metal. The Company’s estimates are intended to reasonably reﬂect the quantities of 
unprocessed ferrous scrap metal that are used in the production of processed ferrous metal. To assist in 
validating the reasonableness of these estimates, we periodically review shrink factors and perform 
monthly physical inventories. Due to the inherent nature of our scrap metal inventories, including variations 
in product density, holding period, and production processes utilized to manufacture the products, physical 
inventories will not necessarily detect all variances for scrap metal inventory such that estimates of 
quantities are required. To mitigate this risk, we further adjust our ferrous physical inventories when the 
volume of a commodity is low and a physical inventory count is deemed to more accurately estimate the 
remaining volume.
Goodwill
We evaluate goodwill for impairment annually on July 1 and upon the occurrence of certain triggering events 
or substantive changes in circumstances that indicate that the fair value of goodwill may be impaired. 
Impairment of goodwill is tested at the reporting unit level. A reporting unit is an operating segment or one 
level below an operating segment (referred to as a “component”).
When testing goodwill for impairment, we have the option to ﬁrst assess qualitative factors to determine 
whether the existence of events or circumstances leads to a determination that it is more-likely-than-not 
that the estimated fair value of a reporting unit is less than its carrying amount. If we elect to perform a 
qualitative assessment and determine that an impairment is more-likely-than-not, we are then required to 
perform the quantitative impairment test, otherwise no further analysis is required. We also may elect not to 
perform the qualitative assessment and, instead, proceed directly to the quantitative impairment test. When 
performing the quantitative impairment test, we apply a one-step quantitative test and record the amount of 
goodwill impairment as the excess of a reporting unit’s carrying amount over its fair value, not to exceed 
the total amount of goodwill allocated to that reporting unit.
We estimate the fair value of a reporting unit using an income approach based on the present value of 
expected future cash ﬂows utilizing a market-based weighted average cost of capital (“WACC”) determined 
separately for the reporting unit. To estimate the present value of the cash ﬂows that extend beyond the 
ﬁnal year in the discounted cash ﬂow analysis, we employ a terminal value technique, whereby we use 
estimated operating cash ﬂows minus capital expenditures, adjust for changes in working capital 
requirements in the ﬁnal year of the analysis, and then discount these estimated cash ﬂows by the WACC to 
establish the terminal value.
46 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
The determination of fair value using the income approach requires judgment and involves the use of 
estimates and assumptions about expected future cash ﬂows derived from internal forecasts and the impact 
of market conditions on those assumptions. Assumptions primarily include revenue growth rates driven by 
future ferrous and nonferrous commodity price and sales volume expectations, gross margins, selling, 
general and administrative expense relative to total revenues, capital expenditures, working capital 
requirements, discount rate (WACC), tax rate, terminal growth rate, beneﬁts associated with a taxable 
transaction, and synergistic beneﬁts available to market participants.
We also use a market approach based on earnings multiple data and our Company’s market capitalization to 
corroborate our reporting units’ valuations. We reconcile the Company’s market capitalization to the 
aggregated estimated fair value of all reporting units, including consideration of a control premium 
representing the estimated amount a market participant would pay to obtain a controlling interest in the 
Company. 
In the fourth quarter of ﬁscal 2023, we performed the annual goodwill impairment test as of July 1, 2023. As 
of the testing date, the balance of our goodwill was $269 million, which was allocated among four reporting 
units. All of the approximately $13 million of goodwill carried by one of the reporting units, a recycling 
services operation, related to the business acquisition that was completed in ﬁscal 2023. We elected to 
perform the qualitative assessment for this reporting unit and concluded that it was not more likely than not 
that the fair value of the reporting unit was less than its carrying value. The remaining $256 million of 
goodwill as of the testing date was allocated among three reporting units, which consist of two regional 
metals recycling operations and our network of auto parts stores. Based primarily on the respective ﬁnancial 
and operational performance of each of these three reporting units and the Company overall, as well as the 
year-over-year decrease in our market capitalization as of the testing date, we elected to not perform the 
qualitative assessment and to proceed directly to the quantitative impairment test for goodwill allocated to 
the three reporting units to identify potential impairment and measure an impairment loss, if necessary.
The three reporting units for which we performed the quantitative assessment consist of two regional metals 
recycling operations and our network of auto parts stores. For one of the metals recycling reporting units and 
the autos reporting unit subject to the quantitative impairment test, the estimated fair value of the reporting 
unit exceeded its carrying amount by approximately 24% and 33%, respectively, as of July 1, 2023. For the 
other metals recycling reporting unit, the estimated fair value of the reporting unit was less than its carrying 
amount, resulting in a partial impairment of goodwill of $39 million. The projections used in the income 
approach for the metals recycling and autos reporting units took into consideration, as applicable, the 
impact of recent and current market conditions for ferrous and nonferrous recycled metals and retail auto 
parts, the cost of obtaining adequate supply ﬂows of scrap metal including end-of-life vehicles, and recent 
trends in production and other operating costs. The projections assumed a recovery of operating margins 
from the levels experienced around the time of the July 1, 2023 measurement date over a multi-year period. 
The WACC rate used in the income approach valuation for the two metals recycling reporting units was 
13.68%, and the WACC rate used for the autos reporting unit was 13.62%. The terminal growth rate used in 
the income approach valuation for all three reporting units was 2%. A reporting-unit-speciﬁc risk premium is 
embedded in the WACC to reﬂect the perceived level of uncertainty inherent in each reporting unit's 
expected future cash ﬂows. For the metals recycling and autos reporting units with no goodwill impairment, 
assuming all other components of the fair value estimates were held constant, an increase in the WACC of 
100 basis points would have decreased the indicated headroom to 13% and 21%, respectively. For the 
metals recycling reporting unit with partial goodwill impairment, assuming all other components of the fair 
value estimate were held constant, an increase in the WACC of 100 basis points would have resulted in a 
material amount of additional impairment of the goodwill allocated to the reporting unit. See Note 8 - 
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets, net in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, 
Item 8 of this report for further detail.
As a result of the inherent uncertainty associated with forming the estimates described above, actual results 
could diﬀer from those estimates. Future events and changing market conditions may impact our 
assumptions as to future revenue and operating margin growth, WACC, and other factors that may result in 
changes in our estimates of the reporting units’ fair value. Although we believe the assumptions used in 
testing our reporting units’ goodwill for impairment are reasonable, a lack of recovery or further 
deterioration in market conditions for recycled metals from current levels, a sustained trend of weaker than 
anticipated ﬁnancial performance for the reporting units with allocated goodwill, including the pace and 
extent of operating margin and volume recovery, a lack of recovery or further decline in our share price from 
current levels for a sustained period, or an increase in the market-based WACC, among other factors, could 
signiﬁcantly impact our impairment analysis and may result in future goodwill impairment charges that, if 
incurred, could have a material adverse eﬀect on our ﬁnancial condition and results of operations.
Business Acquisitions
 
We recognize the assets acquired, the liabilities assumed, and any noncontrolling interest in the acquiree at 
the acquisition date, measured at their fair values as of that date. Contingent purchase consideration is 
recorded at fair value at the date of acquisition. Any excess purchase price over the fair value of the net 
assets acquired is recorded as goodwill. Within one year from the date of acquisition, we may update the 
value allocated to the assets acquired and liabilities assumed, and the resulting goodwill balance, based on 
information 
47 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
received regarding the valuation of such assets and liabilities that was not available at the time of purchase. 
Measuring assets and liabilities at fair value requires us to determine the price that would be paid by a third-
party market participant based on the highest and best use of the assets or interests acquired. See Note 7 - 
Business Acquisitions in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8 of this report 
for disclosure of our acquisition of the Columbus Recycling business on October 1, 2021, our acquisition of 
the Encore Recycling business on April 29, 2022, and our acquisition of the ScrapSource business on 
November 18, 2022.
Long-Lived Assets
We test long-lived tangible and intangible assets for impairment at the asset group level, which is 
determined based on the lowest level for which identiﬁable cash ﬂows are largely independent of the cash 
ﬂows of other groups of assets and liabilities. We test our asset groups for impairment when certain 
triggering events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying value of the asset group may be 
impaired. If the carrying value of the asset group is not recoverable because it exceeds the estimate of 
future undiscounted cash ﬂows from the use and eventual disposition of the asset group, an impairment loss 
is recognized by the amount the carrying value exceeds its fair value, if any. The impairment loss is 
allocated to the long-lived assets of the group on a pro rata basis using the relative carrying amounts of 
those assets, except that the loss allocated to an individual long-lived asset of the group shall not reduce 
the carrying amount of that asset below its fair value. Fair value is determined using one or more of the 
income, market, or cost approaches, depending on the nature of the asset group. Determination of fair value 
is considered a critical accounting estimate. In ﬁscal 2023, we did not identify any triggering events or 
changes in circumstances indicating that the carrying value of a material asset group may be impaired.
Environmental Costs
We operate in industries that inherently possess environmental risks. To manage these risks, we employ 
both our own environmental staﬀ and outside consultants. Environmental management and ﬁnance 
personnel meet regularly to discuss environmental risks. We estimate future costs for known environmental 
remediation requirements and accrue for them on an undiscounted basis when it is probable that we have 
incurred a liability and the related costs can be reasonably estimated but the timing of incurring the 
estimated costs is unknown. The regulatory and government management of these projects is complex, 
which is one of the primary factors that make it diﬃcult to assess the cost of potential and future 
remediation. When only a wide range of estimated amounts can be reasonably established and no other 
amount within the range is better than any other, the low end of the range is recorded in the ﬁnancial 
statements. If further developments or resolution of an environmental matter result in facts and 
circumstances that are signiﬁcantly diﬀerent than the assumptions used to develop these liabilities, the 
accrual for environmental remediation could be materially understated or overstated. Adjustments to these 
liabilities are made when additional information becomes available that aﬀects the estimated costs to study 
or remediate any environmental issues or when expenditures for which accruals are established are made. 
The factors we consider in the recognition and measurement of environmental liabilities include:
•Current regulations, both at the time the liability is established and during the course of the 
investigation or remediation process, which specify standards for acceptable remediation;
•Information about the site which becomes available as the site is studied and remediated;
•The professional judgment of senior level internal staﬀ and outside consultants, who take into 
account similar, recent instances of environmental remediation issues, and studies of our sites, 
among other considerations;
•Available technologies that can be used for remediation; and
•The number and ﬁnancial condition of other potentially responsible parties and the extent of their 
responsibility for the costs of study and remediation.
Our accrued environmental liabilities as of August 31, 2023 included $5 million related to the Portland 
Harbor Superfund site. Because the ﬁnal remedial actions have not yet been designed and there has not 
been a ﬁnal determination of the amount of natural resource damages or of the allocation among the 
potentially responsible parties of costs of the investigations, or remedial action costs, we believe it is not 
possible to reasonably estimate the amount or range of costs which we are likely or which it is reasonably 
possible that we may incur in connection with Portland Harbor, although such costs could be material to our 
ﬁnancial position, results of operations, cash ﬂows, and liquidity. Therefore, no additional amounts have 
been accrued. Further, we have been notiﬁed that we are or may be a potentially responsible party at sites 
other than Portland Harbor which are currently or formerly owned or operated by us or at other sites where 
we may have responsibility for such costs due to past disposal or other activities. See “Contingencies – 
Environmental” in Note 10 - Commitments and Contingencies in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial 
Statements in Part II, Item 8 of this report.
48 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
Income Taxes
Valuation Allowances
We assess the realizability of our deferred tax assets on a quarterly basis through an analysis of potential 
sources of future taxable income, including prior year taxable income available to absorb a carryback of tax 
losses, reversals of existing taxable temporary diﬀerences, tax planning strategies, and forecasts of taxable 
income. We consider all negative and positive evidence, including the weight of the evidence, to determine 
if valuation allowances against deferred tax assets are required. Due to the signiﬁcant judgment involved, 
realizability of our deferred tax assets is considered a critical accounting estimate. We continue to maintain 
valuation allowances against certain state and Canadian deferred tax assets.
Recently Issued Accounting Standards
For a description of recent accounting pronouncements that may have an impact on our ﬁnancial condition, 
results of operations, or cash ﬂows, see Note 3 - Recent Accounting Pronouncements in the Notes to the 
Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8 of this report.
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Debt, net of cash
Debt, net of cash is the diﬀerence between (i) the sum of long-term debt and short-term borrowings (i.e., 
total debt) and (ii) cash and cash equivalents. We believe that presenting debt, net of cash is useful to 
investors as a measure of our leverage, as cash and cash equivalents can be used, among other things, to 
repay indebtedness.
The following is a reconciliation of debt, net of cash (in thousands):
   August 31, 2023  August 31, 2022 
Short-term borrowings  $ 5,813  $ 6,041 
Long-term debt, net of current maturities    243,579    242,521 
Total debt    249,392    248,562 
Less cash and cash equivalents    6,032    43,803 
Total debt, net of cash  $ 243,360  $ 204,759 
Net borrowings (repayments) of debt
Net borrowings (repayments) of debt is the sum of borrowings from long-term debt and repayments of long-
term debt. We present this amount as the net change in our borrowings (repayments) for the period because 
we believe it is useful for investors as a meaningful presentation of the change in debt.
The following is a reconciliation of net (repayments) borrowings of debt (in thousands):
   Fiscal 2023  Fiscal 2022  Fiscal 2021 
Borrowings from long-term debt  $ 625,228  $ 1,055,106  $ 546,706 
Repayments of long-term debt    (628,020)   (889,127)   (578,030)
Net (repayments) borrowings of debt  $ (2,792) $ 165,979  $ (31,324)
 
49 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
Adjusted EBITDA, adjusted selling, general, and administrative expense, adjusted income from 
continuing operations attributable to Radius shareholders, and adjusted diluted earnings per 
share from continuing operations attributable to Radius shareholders
Management believes that providing these non-GAAP ﬁnancial measures adds a meaningful presentation of 
our results from business operations excluding adjustments for goodwill impairment charges, other asset 
impairment charges (net of recoveries), legacy environmental matters (net of recoveries), restructuring 
charges and other exit-related activities, business development costs not related to ongoing operations 
including pre-acquisition expenses, charges related to non-ordinary course legal settlements, and the 
income tax beneﬁt allocated to these adjustments, items which are not related to underlying business 
operational performance, and improves the period-to-period comparability of our results from business 
operations.
Following are reconciliations of net (loss) income to adjusted EBITDA, and adjusted selling, general, and 
administrative expense (in thousands): 
    Year Ended August 31,  
   2023  2022  2021 
Reconciliation of adjusted EBITDA:             
Net (loss) income  $(25,438) $171,996  $169,975 
Loss from discontinued operations, net of tax    109    83    79 
Interest expense   18,589   8,538   5,285 
Income tax (beneﬁt) expense   (2,747)  44,597   37,935 
Depreciation and amortization   89,760   75,053   58,599 
Goodwill impairment charges   39,270    —    — 
Other asset impairment charges, net   11,252   1,570    — 
Charges for legacy environmental matters, net   10,370   7,518   13,773 
Restructuring charges and other exit-related activities   2,730    77   1,008 
Business development costs    432   2,693   2,155 
Charges related to legal settlements    —    590    400 
Adjusted EBITDA  $144,327  $312,715  $289,209 
              
Selling, general and administrative expense:             
As reported  $265,929  $263,257  $242,463 
Charges for legacy environmental matters, net   (10,370)  (7,518)  (13,773)
Business development costs    (432)  (2,693)  (2,155)
Adjusted  $255,127  $253,046  $226,535 
 
(1)For the year ended August 31, 2023, asset impairment charges included $5 million of impairment and other 
adjustments of an equity investment to fair value reported within “Other loss, net” on the Consolidated Statement of 
Operations.
(2)Legal and environmental charges, net of recoveries, for legacy environmental matters including those related to 
Portland Harbor and to other legacy environmental loss contingencies. See Note 10 - Commitments and Contingencies, 
“Portland Harbor” and “Other Legacy Environmental Loss Contingencies” in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial 
Statements in Part II, Item 8 of this report.
(3)Charges related to legal settlements in ﬁscal 2022 and 2021 relate to a claim by a utility provider for past charges. 
50 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023(1)
(2)
(3)
(2)
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
Following are reconciliations of adjusted income (loss) from continuing operations attributable to Radius 
shareholders and adjusted diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations attributable to Radius 
shareholders (in thousands, except per share data):
    Year Ended August 31,  
   2023  2022  2021 
Income (loss) from continuing operations attributable to Radius 
shareholders:             
As reported  $(25,682) $168,883  $165,191 
Goodwill impairment charges   39,270    —    — 
Other asset impairment charges, net   11,252   1,570    — 
Charges for legacy environmental matters, net   10,370   7,518   13,773 
Restructuring charges and other exit-related activities   2,730    77   1,008 
Business development costs    432   2,693   2,155 
Charges related to legal settlements    —    590    400 
Income tax beneﬁt allocated to adjustments   (14,080)  (1,992)  (3,712)
Adjusted  $24,292  $179,339  $178,815 
              
Diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations 
attributable to Radius shareholders:             
As reported  $ (0.92) $ 5.72  $ 5.66 
Goodwill impairment charges, per share    1.40    —    — 
Other asset impairment charges, net, per share    0.40    0.05    — 
Charges for legacy environmental matters, net, per share    0.37    0.25    0.47 
Restructuring charges and other exit-related activities, per share    0.10    —    0.03 
Business development costs, per share    0.02    0.09    0.07 
Charges related to legal settlements, per share    —    0.02    0.01 
Income tax beneﬁt allocated to adjustments, per share    (0.50)   (0.07)   (0.13)
Eﬀect of dilutive shares, per share    (0.02)   —    — 
Adjusted  $ 0.85  $ 6.07  $ 6.13 
 
(1)For the year ended August 31, 2023, asset impairment charges included $5 million ($0.19 per share before income tax) 
of impairment and other adjustments of an equity investment to fair value reported within “Other loss, net” on the 
Consolidated Statement of Operations.
(2)Legal and environmental charges, net of recoveries, for legacy environmental matters including those related to the 
Portland Harbor Superfund site and to other legacy environmental loss contingencies. See Note 10 - Commitments and 
Contingencies, “Portland Harbor” and “Other Legacy Environmental Loss Contingencies” in the Notes to the 
Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8 of this report.
(3)Charges related to legal settlements in ﬁscal 2022 and 2021 relate to a claim by a utility provider for past charges.
(4)Income tax allocated to the aggregate adjustments reconciling reported and adjusted income (loss) from continuing 
operations attributable to Radius shareholders and diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations 
attributable to Radius shareholders is determined based on a tax provision calculated with and without the adjustments.
(5)For the year ended August 31, 2023, adjusted diluted earnings (loss) per share from continuing operations attributable 
to Radius shareholders reﬂects the inclusion of an incremental 652 thousand common stock equivalent shares 
attributable to dilutive share-based compensation awards that were antidilutive for the purpose of calculating the 
comparable GAAP loss per share measure.
(6)May not foot due to rounding.
51 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
(6)
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
ITEM 7A. QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
Commodity Price Risk
We are exposed to commodity price risk, mainly associated with variations in the market price for ferrous 
and nonferrous metals, including recycled metal, ﬁnished steel products, auto bodies, and other 
commodities. The timing and magnitude of industry cycles are diﬃcult to predict and are impacted by 
general economic conditions. We respond to increases and decreases in forward selling prices by adjusting 
purchase prices. We actively manage our exposure to commodity price risk and monitor the actual and 
expected spread between forward selling prices and purchase costs and processing and shipping expense. 
Sales contracts are based on prices negotiated with our customers, and generally orders are placed 30 to 60 
days ahead of the shipment date. However, ﬁnancial results may be negatively impacted when forward 
selling prices fall more quickly than we can adjust purchase prices or when customers fail to meet their 
contractual obligations. We assess the net realizable value of inventory (“NRV”) each quarter based upon 
contracted sales orders and estimates of future selling prices. For our uncommitted inventories, a 10% 
decrease in the selling price of inventory would not have had a material NRV impact as of August 31, 2023 
and 2022.
Interest Rate Risk
We are exposed to market risk associated with changes in interest rates related to our debt obligations. Our 
revolving credit facility is subject to variable interest rates and therefore have exposure to changes in 
interest rates. We may at times use derivative instruments to manage some portion of this risk. Our interest 
rate swap derivatives are agreements with independent counterparties that provide for payments based on 
a notional amount and are designed to hedge the variability in cash ﬂows resulting from variable interest 
rates for a portion of our credit facilities. If market interest rates had changed 10% from actual interest rate 
levels in ﬁscal 2023 or 2022, the eﬀect on our interest expense and net income would not have been 
material.
Credit Risk
Credit risk relates to the risk of loss that might occur as a result of non-performance by counterparties of 
their contractual obligations to take delivery of recycled metal and ﬁnished steel products and to make 
ﬁnancial settlements of these obligations, or to provide suﬃcient quantities of recycled metal or payment to 
settle advances, loans and other contractual receivables in connection with demolition and scrap extraction 
projects. We manage our exposure to credit risk through a variety of methods, including shipping recycled 
ferrous metal exports under letters of credit, collection of deposits prior to shipment for certain nonferrous 
export customers, establishment of credit limits for certain sales on open terms, credit insurance and 
designation of collateral and ﬁnancial guarantees securing advances, loans, and other contractual 
receivables. We have experienced ﬂuctuations in the availability of credit insurance that we have historically 
used to cover a portion of our recycled metal and ﬁnished steel sales to domestic customers, which in cases 
of reduced availability may increase our exposure to customer credit risk. In addition, in higher or rising 
commodity price environments, we have experienced proportionately lower credit insurance coverage of 
applicable customer credit limits, which may increase our exposure to customer credit risk.
Historically, we have shipped almost all of our large shipments of recycled ferrous metal to foreign 
customers under contracts supported by letters of credit issued or conﬁrmed by banks deemed creditworthy. 
The letters of credit ensure payment by the customer. As we generally sell export recycled ferrous metal 
under contracts or orders that generally provide for shipment within 30 to 60 days after the price is agreed, 
our customers typically do not have diﬃculty obtaining letters of credit from their banks in periods of rising 
ferrous prices, as the value of the letters of credit are collateralized by the value of the inventory on the 
ship. However, in periods of signiﬁcantly declining prices, or due to country-speciﬁc currency limitations, our 
customers may not be able to obtain letters of credit for the full sales value of the inventory to be shipped.
As of August 31, 2023 and 2022, 38% and 24%, respectively, of our accounts receivable balance were 
covered by letters of credit, and the amount of past due receivables was not material.
Foreign Currency Exchange Rate Risk
We are exposed to foreign currency exchange rate risk, mainly associated with sales transactions and 
related accounts receivable denominated in the U.S. Dollar by our Canadian subsidiary with a functional 
currency of the Canadian Dollar. In certain instances, we may use derivatives to manage some portion of 
this risk. As of August 31, 2023 and 2022, we did not have any derivative contracts to manage our foreign 
currency exchange rate risk.
 
52 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
Management of the Company is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over 
ﬁnancial reporting, as such term is deﬁned in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f) under the Securities Exchange 
Act of 1934. The Company’s internal control over ﬁnancial reporting is a process designed by, or under the 
supervision of, the Company’s principal executive and principal ﬁnancial oﬃcers and eﬀected by the 
Company’s Board of Directors, management, and other personnel to provide reasonable assurance regarding 
the reliability of ﬁnancial reporting and the preparation of ﬁnancial statements for external purposes in 
accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.
The Company’s internal control over ﬁnancial reporting includes policies and procedures that relate to the 
maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reﬂect the transactions and 
dispositions of assets of the Company; provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as 
necessary to permit the preparation of the Company’s consolidated ﬁnancial statements in accordance with 
generally accepted accounting principles and that the receipts and expenditures of the Company are being 
made only in accordance with authorization of the Company’s management and directors; and provide 
reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or 
disposition of the Company’s assets that could have a material eﬀect on the Company’s consolidated 
ﬁnancial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over ﬁnancial reporting may not prevent or detect 
misstatements. Also, projection of any evaluation of eﬀectiveness to future periods is subject to the risk that 
controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions or that the degree of compliance with 
the policies and procedures may deteriorate.
Management of the Company assessed the eﬀectiveness of the Company’s internal control over ﬁnancial 
reporting using the criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the 
Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (“COSO”). Based on its assessment, 
management determined that the Company’s internal control over ﬁnancial reporting was eﬀective as of 
August 31, 2023. As permitted by SEC guidance for newly acquired businesses, management's assessment 
of the Company's internal control over ﬁnancial reporting did not include an assessment of internal control 
over ﬁnancial reporting of the ScrapSource business acquired by the Company on November 18, 2022. The 
ScrapSource business represented less than 2% of consolidated total assets and less than 1% of 
consolidated total revenues as of and for the year ended August 31, 2023.
PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, the independent registered public accounting ﬁrm that audited the Company’s 
consolidated ﬁnancial statements included in this Annual Report, also audited the eﬀectiveness of the 
Company’s internal control over ﬁnancial reporting as of August 31, 2023, as stated in their report included 
herein.
 
 
   
Tamara L. Lundgren  Stefano R. Gaggini
Chairman, President and Chief Executive Oﬃcer
 Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Oﬃcer
October 25, 2023  October 25, 2023
 
 
 
53 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
 
To the Board of Directors and Shareholders of Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling
 
Opinions on the Financial Statements and Internal Control over Financial Reporting
 
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba 
Radius Recycling and its subsidiaries (the “Company”) as of August 31, 2023 and 2022, and the related 
consolidated statements of operations, of comprehensive (loss) income, of equity and of cash ﬂows for each 
of the three years in the period ended August 31, 2023, including the related notes and ﬁnancial statement 
schedule listed in the index appearing under Item 15(a)(2) (collectively referred to as the “consolidated 
ﬁnancial statements”). We also have audited the Company's internal control over ﬁnancial reporting as of 
August 31, 2023, based on criteria established in Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued by 
the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO).
 
In our opinion, the consolidated ﬁnancial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material 
respects, the ﬁnancial position of the Company as of August 31, 2023 and 2022, and the results of its 
operations and its cash ﬂows for each of the three years in the period ended August 31, 2023 in conformity 
with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America. Also in our opinion, the 
Company maintained, in all material respects, eﬀective internal control over ﬁnancial reporting as of August 
31, 2023, based on criteria established in Internal Control - Integrated Framework(2013) issued by the COSO.
 
Basis for Opinions
 
The Company's management is responsible for these consolidated ﬁnancial statements, for maintaining 
eﬀective internal control over ﬁnancial reporting, and for its assessment of the eﬀectiveness of internal 
control over ﬁnancial reporting, included in the accompanying Management’s Annual Report on Internal 
Control Over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express opinions on the Company’s consolidated 
ﬁnancial statements and on the Company's internal control over ﬁnancial reporting based on our audits. We 
are a public accounting ﬁrm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) 
(PCAOB) and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal 
securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the 
PCAOB.
 
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we 
plan and perform the audits to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the consolidated ﬁnancial 
statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud, and whether eﬀective internal 
control over ﬁnancial reporting was maintained in all material respects.
 
Our audits of the consolidated ﬁnancial statements included performing procedures to assess the risks of 
material misstatement of the consolidated ﬁnancial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and 
performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, 
evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the consolidated ﬁnancial statements. Our audits also 
included evaluating the accounting principles used and signiﬁcant estimates made by management, as well 
as evaluating the overall presentation of the consolidated ﬁnancial statements. Our audit of internal control 
over ﬁnancial reporting included obtaining an understanding of internal control over ﬁnancial reporting, 
assessing the risk that a material weakness exists, and testing and evaluating the design and operating 
eﬀectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk. Our audits also included performing such other 
procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audits provide a 
reasonable basis for our opinions.
 
As described in Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting, management has 
excluded the ScrapSource business from its assessment of internal control over ﬁnancial reporting as of 
August 31, 2023 because it was acquired by the Company in a purchase business combination during ﬁscal 
2023. We have also excluded the ScrapSource business from our audit of internal control over ﬁnancial 
reporting. The ScrapSource business is a wholly-owned subsidiary whose total assets and total revenues 
excluded from management’s assessment and our audit of internal control over ﬁnancial reporting represent 
approximately 2% and 1%, respectively, of the related consolidated ﬁnancial statement amounts as of and 
for the year ended August 31, 2023.
 
Deﬁnition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
 
A company’s internal control over ﬁnancial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance 
regarding the reliability of ﬁnancial reporting and the preparation of ﬁnancial statements for external 
purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. A company’s internal control over 
ﬁnancial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (i) pertain to the maintenance of records that, 
in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reﬂect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the 
company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit 
preparation of ﬁnancial statements in 
54 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the 
company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the 
company; and (iii) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized 
acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s assets that could have a material eﬀect on the ﬁnancial 
statements.
 
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over ﬁnancial reporting may not prevent or detect 
misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of eﬀectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk 
that controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance 
with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
 
Critical Audit Matters
 
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current period audit of the 
consolidated ﬁnancial statements that were communicated or required to be communicated to the audit 
committee and that (i) relate to accounts or disclosures that are material to the consolidated ﬁnancial 
statements and (ii) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The 
communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the consolidated ﬁnancial 
statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matters below, providing 
separate opinions on the critical audit matters or on the accounts or disclosures to which they relate.
 
Goodwill Impairment Assessment – One of the Metals Recycling Reporting Units 
 
As described in Notes 2 and 8 to the consolidated ﬁnancial statements, management evaluates goodwill for 
impairment annually on July 1 and upon the occurrence of certain triggering events or substantive changes 
in circumstances that indicate that the fair value of goodwill may be impaired. Management may elect not 
to perform the qualitative assessment and, instead, proceed directly to the quantitative impairment test. 
The quantitative impairment test entails estimating the fair value of each reporting unit with allocated 
goodwill and comparing it to the reporting unit’s carrying amount. Management records the amount of 
goodwill impairment as the excess of a reporting unit’s carrying amount over its fair value, if any, not to 
exceed the total amount of goodwill allocated to that reporting unit. Management estimated the fair value of 
the reporting units subject to the quantitative impairment test as of July 1, 2023 using an income approach 
based on the present value of expected future cash ﬂows, including terminal value, utilizing a market-based 
weighted average cost of capital (WACC) determined separately for each reporting unit. The determination 
of fair value under this income approach involves the use of estimates and assumptions, including revenue 
growth rates driven by future ferrous and nonferrous commodity price and sales volume expectations, gross 
margins, selling, general, and administrative expense relative to total revenues, capital expenditures, 
working capital requirements, discount rate (WACC), tax rate, terminal growth rate, beneﬁts associated with 
a taxable transaction, and synergistic beneﬁts available to market participants. For one of the metals 
recycling reporting units subject to the quantitative impairment test, the estimated fair value of the 
reporting unit was less than its carrying amount, resulting in a partial impairment of goodwill of $39 million 
in the year ended August 31, 2023. The Company’s goodwill balance was $229 million as of August 31, 2023, 
which includes goodwill related to one of the metals recycling reporting units subject to a quantitative 
impairment test as of July 1, 2023.
 
The principal considerations for our determination that performing procedures relating to the goodwill 
impairment assessment of one of the metals recycling reporting units is a critical audit matter are (i) the 
signiﬁcant judgment by management when developing the fair value estimate of the reporting unit; (ii) a 
high degree of auditor judgment, subjectivity, and eﬀort in performing procedures and evaluating 
management’s signiﬁcant assumptions related to the future ferrous commodity price expectations and the 
WACC; and (iii) the audit eﬀort involved the use of professionals with specialized skill and knowledge.
 
Addressing the matter involved performing procedures and evaluating audit evidence in connection with 
forming our overall opinion on the consolidated ﬁnancial statements. These procedures included testing the 
eﬀectiveness of controls relating to management’s goodwill impairment assessment, including controls over 
the valuation of the reporting units subject to the quantitative impairment test. These procedures also 
included, among others, (i) testing management’s process for developing the fair value estimate of one of 
the metals recycling reporting units; (ii) evaluating the appropriateness of the income approach used by 
management; (iii) testing the completeness and accuracy of underlying data used in the income approach; 
and (iv) evaluating the signiﬁcant assumptions used by management related to the future ferrous 
commodity price expectations and the WACC. Evaluating management’s assumption related to the future 
ferrous commodity price expectations involved evaluating whether the assumption used by management 
was reasonable considering (i) the current and past performance of one of the metals recycling reporting 
units; (ii) the consistency with external market and industry data; and (iii) whether the assumptions were 
consistent with evidence obtained in other areas of the audit. Professionals with specialized skill and 
knowledge were used to assist in evaluating (i) the appropriateness of the income approach and (ii) the 
reasonableness of the WACC assumption.
 
55 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
Volume of Ferrous Metal Inventory 
 
As described in Notes 2 and 4 to the consolidated ﬁnancial statements, the Company’s processed and 
unprocessed scrap metal inventory was $144 million as of August 31, 2023, of which processed and 
unprocessed ferrous metal inventory represents a signiﬁcant portion. The accounting process the Company 
uses to record ferrous scrap metal quantities relies on signiﬁcant estimates. With respect to estimating the 
quantities of unprocessed ferrous scrap metal inventory that are moved into production, management relies 
on weighed quantities of the processed ferrous material, adjusted for estimated metal recoveries and yields 
that are based on historical trends and other judgments by management. Actual recoveries and yields can 
vary depending on product quality, moisture content, and the source of the unprocessed metal. The 
Company’s estimates are intended to reasonably reﬂect the quantities of unprocessed ferrous scrap metal 
that are used in the production of processed ferrous metal. To assist in validating the reasonableness of 
these estimates, management periodically reviews shrink factors and performs monthly physical 
inventories. Due to the inherent nature of the Company’s scrap metal inventories, including variations in 
product density, holding period, and production processes utilized to manufacture the products, physical 
inventories will not necessarily detect all variances for scrap metal inventory such that estimates of 
quantities are required. To mitigate this risk, the Company further adjusts its ferrous physical inventories 
when the volume of a commodity is low and a physical inventory count is deemed to more accurately 
estimate the remaining volume.
 
The principal considerations for our determination that performing procedures relating to the volume of 
ferrous metal inventory is a critical audit matter are a high degree of auditor eﬀort in performing procedures 
and evaluating audit evidence related to the  ferrous metal inventory volumes.
 
Addressing the matter involved performing procedures and evaluating audit evidence in connection with 
forming our overall opinion on the consolidated ﬁnancial statements. These procedures included testing the 
eﬀectiveness of controls relating to the ferrous metal inventory volumes, including the ferrous metal 
recoveries and yields. These procedures also included, among others, (i) testing inventory quantities 
received; (ii) assessing the reasonableness of management’s estimated yields by comparing them to actual 
yields of ultimate ferrous metal recoveries; (iii) testing ferrous metal inventory shipments; (iv) observing 
certain of management’s physical inventory counts; (v) assessing rollforward activity between the time of 
the inventory counts observed and year-end; and (vi) considering whether evidence obtained in other areas 
of the audit is consistent with management’s estimates related to ferrous metal inventory volumes.
 
 
 
/s/ PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP
Portland, Oregon
October 25, 2023
 
We have served as the Company’s auditor since 1976, which includes periods before the Company became 
subject to SEC reporting requirements.
56 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents    
 
SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
(In thousands, except per share amounts)
(Currency – U.S. Dollar)
 
    August 31,  
    2023    2022  
Assets         
Current assets:         
Cash and cash equivalents  $ 6,032  $ 43,803 
Accounts receivable, net    210,442    237,654 
Inventories    278,642    315,189 
Refundable income taxes    3,245    1,696 
Prepaid expenses and other current assets    51,979    73,044 
Total current assets    550,340    671,386 
Property, plant and equipment, net    706,805    664,120 
Operating lease right-of-use assets    115,686    122,413 
Investments in joint ventures    10,750    12,841 
Goodwill    229,419    255,198 
Intangibles, net    32,540    26,155 
Deferred income taxes    22,713    24,598 
Other assets    47,696    49,886 
Total assets  $ 1,715,949  $ 1,826,597 
Liabilities and Equity         
Current liabilities:         
Short-term borrowings  $ 5,813  $ 6,041 
Accounts payable    209,423    217,689 
Accrued payroll and related liabilities    35,144    59,702 
Environmental liabilities    13,743    13,031 
Operating lease liabilities    19,835    21,660 
Accrued income taxes    358    3,856 
Other accrued liabilities    39,614    59,594 
Total current liabilities    323,930    381,573 
Deferred income taxes    58,617    63,328 
Long-term debt, net of current maturities    243,579    242,521 
Environmental liabilities, net of current portion    53,034    55,469 
Operating lease liabilities, net of current maturities    96,086    101,651 
Other long-term liabilities    29,044    23,581 
Total liabilities    804,290    868,123 
Commitments and contingencies (Note 10)         
Radius Recycling (“Radius”) shareholders’ equity:         
Preferred stock – 20,000 shares $1.00 par value authorized, 
none issued    —    — 
Class A common stock – 75,000 shares $1.00 par value authorized,
   27,312 and 26,747 shares issued and outstanding    27,312    26,747 
Class B common stock – 25,000 shares $1.00 par value authorized,
   200 and 200 shares issued and outstanding    200    200 
Additional paid-in capital    26,035    22,975 
Retained earnings    894,316    941,146 
Accumulated other comprehensive loss    (39,683)   (37,089)
Total Radius shareholders’ equity    908,180    953,979 
Noncontrolling interests    3,479    4,495 
Total equity    911,659    958,474 
Total liabilities and equity  $ 1,715,949  $ 1,826,597 
See Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
57 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents    
 
SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS
(In thousands, except per share amounts)
(Currency – U.S. Dollar)
 
    Year Ended August 31,  
    2023   2022   2021  
Revenues  $2,882,224  $3,485,815  $2,758,551 
Operating expense:             
Cost of goods sold   2,574,513   2,997,745   2,305,357 
Selling, general and administrative    265,929   263,257   242,463 
(Income) from joint ventures    (2,090)   (2,740)   (4,006)
Goodwill impairment charges    39,270    —    — 
Other asset impairment charges, net    5,797    1,570    — 
Restructuring charges and other exit-related activities    2,730    77    1,008 
Operating (loss) income    (3,925)  225,906   213,729 
Interest expense    (18,589)   (8,538)   (5,285)
Other loss, net    (5,562)   (692)   (455)
(Loss) income from continuing operations before income 
taxes    (28,076)  216,676   207,989 
Income tax beneﬁt (expense)    2,747    (44,597)   (37,935)
(Loss) income from continuing operations    (25,329)  172,079   170,054 
Loss from discontinued operations, net of tax    (109)   (83)   (79)
Net (loss) income    (25,438)  171,996   169,975 
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests    (353)   (3,196)   (4,863)
Net (loss) income attributable to Radius shareholders  $ (25,791) $168,800  $165,112 
             
Net (loss) income per share attributable to Radius 
shareholders:             
Basic:             
(Loss) income per share from continuing operations  $ (0.92) $ 6.01  $ 5.90 
Net (loss) income per share  $ (0.92) $ 6.01  $ 5.90 
Diluted:             
(Loss) income per share from continuing operations  $ (0.92) $ 5.72  $ 5.66 
Net (loss) income per share  $ (0.92) $ 5.72  $ 5.66 
Weighted average number of common shares:             
Basic    28,008    28,084    27,982 
Diluted    28,008    29,529    29,193 
See Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
58 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents    
 
SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE (LOSS) INCOME
(In thousands)
(Currency – U.S. Dollar)
 
    Year Ended August 31,  
    2023    2022    2021  
Net (loss) income  $ (25,438) $171,996  $169,975 
Other comprehensive (loss) income, net of tax:             
Foreign currency translation adjustments    (2,661)   (3,070)   2,575 
Cash ﬂow hedges, net    (304)   —    — 
Pension obligations, net    371    535    (258)
Total other comprehensive (loss) income, net of tax    (2,594)   (2,535)   2,317 
Comprehensive (loss) income    (28,032)  169,461   172,292 
Less comprehensive income attributable to noncontrolling 
interests    (353)   (3,196)   (4,863)
Comprehensive (loss) income attributable to Radius 
shareholders  $ (28,385) $166,265  $167,429 
See Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
59 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents    
 
SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF EQUITY
(In thousands, except per share amounts)
(Currency – U.S. Dollar)
 
                                         
    Common Stock   Addit
ional     Accu
mulat
ed 
Other  Total 
Radiu
s        
    Class A    Class B   Paid-
in  Retai
ned  Comp
rehen
sive  Share
holde
rs’  Nonc
ontro
lling  Total 
   Share
s  Amo
unt  Share
s  Amou
nt  Capit
al  Earni
ngs  Loss  Equit
y  Intere
sts  Equit
y 
Balance as of August 31, 
2020  26,8
99  $26,
899   200  $200  $36,6
16  $649,
863  $(36,
871) $676,
707  $3,72
9  $680,
436 
Net income   —   —    —   —   —   165,
112   —   165,
112   4,86
3   169,
975 
Other comprehensive 
income, net of tax   —   —    —   —   —   —   2,31
7   2,31
7   —   2,31
7 
Distributions to 
noncontrolling interests   —   —    —   —   —   —   —   —   (4,5
77)  (4,5
77)
Issuance of restricted stock  657   657    —   —   (657)  —   —   —   —   — 
Restricted stock withheld 
for taxes  (224)  (22
4)   —   —   (5,4
14)  —   —   (5,6
38)  —   (5,6
38)
Share-based compensation 
cost   —   —    —   —   18,5
29   —   —   18,5
29   —   18,5
29 
Dividends ($0.75 per 
common share)   —   —    —   —   —   (21,
263)  —   (21,
263)  —   (21,
263)
Balance as of August 31, 
2021  27,3
32   27,
332   200   200   49,0
74   793,
712   (34,
554)  835,
764   4,01
5   839,
779 
Net income   —   —    —   —   —   168,
800   —   168,
800   3,19
6   171,
996 
Other comprehensive loss, 
net of tax   —   —    —   —   —   —   (2,5
35)  (2,5
35)  —   (2,5
35)
Distributions to 
noncontrolling interests   —   —    —   —   —   —   —   —   (2,7
16)  (2,7
16)
Share repurchases   (944)
  (94
4)   —   —   (33,
304)  —   —   (34,
248)  —   (34,
248)
Issuance of restricted stock  568   568    —   —   (568)  —   —   —   —   — 
Restricted stock withheld 
for taxes  (209)  (20
9)   —   —   (10,
848)  —   —   (11,
057)  —   (11,
057)
Share-based compensation 
cost   —   —    —   —   18,6
21   —   —   18,6
21   —   18,6
21 
Dividends ($0.75 per 
common share)    — 
  — 
   — 
  — 
  — 
  (21,
366)
  — 
  (21,
366)
  — 
  (21,
366)
Balance as of August 31, 
2022   26,7
47   26,
747   200   200   22,9
75   941,
146   (37,
089)  953,
979   4,49
5   958,
474 
Net (loss) income    — 
  —    —   —   —   (25,
791)  —   (25,
791)  353   (25,
438)
Other comprehensive loss, 
net of tax    —   —    —   —   —   —   (2,5
94)  (2,5
94)  —   (2,5
94)
Distributions to 
noncontrolling interests    —   —    —   —   —   —   —   —   (1,3
69)  (1,3
69)
Issuance of restricted stock  847   847    —   —   (847)  —   —   —   —   — 
Restricted stock withheld 
for taxes   (282)  (28
2)   —   —   (7,3
47)  —   —   (7,6
29)  —   (7,6
29)
Share-based compensation 
cost    —   —    —   —   11,2
54   —   —   11,2
54   —   11,2
54 
Dividends ($0.75 per 
common share)    —   —    —   —   —   (21,
039)  —   (21,
039)  —   (21,
039)
Balance as of August 31, 
2023   27,3
12  $27,
312   200  $200  $26,0
35  $894,
316  $(39,
683) $908,
180  $3,47
9  $911,
659 
See Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
60 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents    
 
SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
(In thousands)
(Currency – U.S. Dollar)
 
    Year Ended August 31,  
    2023    2022    2021  
Cash ﬂows from operating activities:             
Net (loss) income  $ (25,438) $ 171,996  $ 169,975 
Adjustments to reconcile net (loss) income to cash provided by 
operating activities:             
Goodwill impairment charges    39,270    —    — 
Other asset impairment charges, net    11,252    1,570    — 
Exit-related asset impairments    254    —    — 
Depreciation and amortization    89,760    75,053    58,599 
Inventory write-downs    575    3,199    — 
Deferred income taxes    (3,934)   25,052    6,884 
Undistributed equity in earnings of joint ventures    (2,090)   (2,740)   (4,006)
Share-based compensation expense    11,186    18,517    18,213 
(Gain) loss on disposal of assets, net    (324)   824    717 
Unrealized foreign exchange loss, net    47    78    127 
Credit loss, net    311    40    — 
Changes in assets and liabilities, net of acquisitions:             
Accounts receivable    11,637    633    (84,086)
Inventories    48,039    (37,232)   (88,622)
Income taxes    (3,548)   2,119    22,789 
Prepaid expenses and other current assets    (3,359)   (19,117)   (15,674)
Other long-term assets    (4,594)   (994)   (5,402)
Operating lease assets and liabilities    (696)   (2,198)   (813)
Accounts payable    5,458    20,578    64,956 
Accrued payroll and related liabilities    (24,334)   (13,866)   27,824 
Other accrued liabilities    (13,782)   4,798    613 
Environmental liabilities    (1,641)   (14,866)   12,895 
Other long-term liabilities    3,313    1,132    3,825 
Distributed equity in earnings of joint ventures    2,000    3,100    1,250 
Net cash provided by operating activities    139,362    237,676    190,064 
Cash ﬂows from investing activities:             
Capital expenditures   (129,516)  (150,121)  (118,866)
Acquisitions, net of acquired cash    (26,902)  (179,721)   — 
Proceeds from insurance and sale of assets    12,449    18,776    587 
Purchase of equity investment    —    (5,000)   — 
Deposit on land option    —    (80)   630 
Net cash used in investing activities   (143,969)  (316,146)  (117,649)
Cash ﬂows from ﬁnancing activities:             
Borrowings from long-term debt    625,228   1,055,106    546,706 
Repayments of long-term debt   (628,020)  (889,127)  (578,030)
Payment of debt issuance costs    (156)   (2,093)   (23)
Repurchase of Class A common stock    —    (34,248)   — 
Taxes paid related to net share settlement of share-based 
payment awards    (7,629)   (11,057)   (5,638)
Distributions to noncontrolling interests    (1,369)   (2,716)   (4,577)
Dividends paid    (21,186)   (21,291)   (21,259)
Net cash (used in) provided by ﬁnancing activities    (33,132)   94,574    (62,821)
Eﬀect of exchange rate changes on cash    (32)   (119)   337 
Net (decrease) increase in cash and cash equivalents    (37,771)   15,985    9,931 
Cash and cash equivalents as of beginning of year    43,803    27,818    17,887 
Cash and cash equivalents as of end of year  $ 6,032  $ 43,803  $ 27,818 
See Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
61 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents    
 
SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS (CONTINUED)
(In thousands)
(Currency – U.S. Dollar)
 
    Year Ended August 31,  
    2023    2022    2021  
SUPPLEMENTAL DISCLOSURES:             
Cash paid during the year for:             
Interest  $ 16,597  $ 4,712  $ 2,669 
Income taxes, net  $ 4,702  $ 17,309  $ 8,244 
Schedule of noncash investing and ﬁnancing transactions:             
Purchases of property, plant and equipment included in 
liabilities  $ 17,117  $ 38,136  $ 29,337 
See Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
62 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Note 1 - Nature of Operations
Founded in 1906, Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling, an Oregon corporation, is one of North 
America’s largest recyclers of ferrous and nonferrous metal, including end-of-life vehicles, and a 
manufacturer of ﬁnished steel products. Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling and its 
consolidated subsidiaries, together, are referred to as the Company.
The Company acquires and recycles ferrous and nonferrous scrap metal for sale to foreign and domestic 
metal producers, processors, and brokers, and it procures salvaged vehicles and sells serviceable used auto 
parts from these vehicles through a network of self-service auto parts stores. Most of these auto parts stores 
supply the Company’s shredding facilities with auto bodies that are processed into saleable recycled metal 
products. In addition to the sale of recycled metal products processed at its facilities, the Company provides 
a variety of recycling and related services. The Company also produces a range of ﬁnished steel long 
products at its electric arc furnace (“EAF”) steel mill using recycled ferrous metal sourced internally from its 
recycling and joint venture operations and other raw materials.
As of August 31, 2023, all of the Company’s facilities were located in the United States (“U.S.”) and its 
territories and Canada.
Note 2 - Summary of Signiﬁcant Accounting Policies
Basis of Presentation
The Consolidated Financial Statements include the accounts of Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius 
Recycling and its majority-owned and wholly-owned subsidiaries. The equity method of accounting is used 
for investments in joint ventures over which the Company has signiﬁcant inﬂuence but does not have 
eﬀective control. All signiﬁcant intercompany account balances, transactions, proﬁts, and losses have been 
eliminated. All transactions and relationships with variable interest entities are evaluated to determine 
whether the Company is the primary beneﬁciary of the entities, therefore requiring consolidation. The 
Company does not have any variable interest entities requiring consolidation.
Segment Reporting 
The accounting standards for reporting information about operating segments deﬁne an operating segment 
as a component of an enterprise that engages in business activities from which it may earn revenues and 
incur expenses for which discrete ﬁnancial information is available that is evaluated regularly by the chief 
operating decision-maker in deciding how to allocate resources and in assessing performance. The 
Company’s internal organizational and reporting structure reﬂects a functionally based, integrated model 
and includes a single operating and reportable segment.
Cash and Cash Equivalents
Cash and cash equivalents include short-term securities that are not restricted by third parties and have an 
original maturity date of 90 days or less. Included in accounts payable are book overdrafts representing 
outstanding payments in excess of funds on deposit of $62 million and $56 million as of August 31, 2023 
and 2022, respectively.
Accounts Receivable, net
Accounts receivable represent amounts primarily due from customers on product and other sales. These 
accounts receivable, which are reduced by an allowance for credit losses, are recorded at the invoiced 
amount and do not bear interest. The Company extends credit to customers under contracts containing 
customary and explicit payment terms, and payment is generally required within 30 to 60 days of shipment. 
Nonferrous export sales typically require a deposit prior to shipment. Historically, almost all of the 
Company’s ferrous export sales have been made with letters of credit. Ferrous and nonferrous metal sales to 
domestic customers and ﬁnished steel sales are generally made on open account, and a portion of these 
sales are covered by credit insurance.
The Company evaluates the collectibility of its accounts receivable based on a combination of factors, 
including whether sales were made pursuant to letters of credit or required deposits prior to shipment, the 
aging of customer receivable balances, the ﬁnancial condition of the Company’s customers, historical 
collection rates, and economic trends. Management uses this evaluation to estimate the amount of 
customer receivables that may not be collected in the future and records a provision for expected credit 
losses. Accounts are written oﬀ when all eﬀorts to collect have been exhausted. The allowance for credit 
losses was $2 million as of both August 31, 2023 and 2022.
Also included in accounts receivable are short-term advances to scrap metal suppliers used as a mechanism 
to acquire unprocessed scrap metal. The advances are generally repaid with scrap metal, as opposed to 
cash. Repayments of advances with scrap metal are treated as 
 
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
noncash operating activities in the Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows and totaled $13 million, $11 
million, and $10 million for the ﬁscal years ended August 31, 2023, 2022, and 2021, respectively.
Inventories
The Company’s inventories consist of processed and unprocessed scrap metal (ferrous, nonferrous, and 
mixed nonferrous recovered joint products arising from the manufacturing process), semi-ﬁnished steel 
products (billets), ﬁnished steel products (primarily rebar, wire rod, and merchant bar), used and salvaged 
vehicles, and supplies. Inventories are stated at the lower of cost and net realizable value. The Company 
determines the cost of ferrous and nonferrous scrap metal inventories using the average cost method and 
capitalizes substantially all direct processing costs and facility costs into inventory. The Company allocates 
material and production costs to joint products using the gross margin method. The Company determines 
the cost of used and salvaged vehicle inventory at its auto parts stores, which is reported within ﬁnished 
goods, based on the average price the Company pays for a vehicle and capitalizes the vehicle cost and 
substantially all production costs into inventory. The Company determines the cost of its semi-ﬁnished and 
ﬁnished steel product inventories based on average costs and capitalizes all direct and indirect costs of 
manufacturing into inventory. Indirect costs of manufacturing include general plant costs, maintenance, and 
facility costs. The Company determines the cost of the substantial majority of its supplies inventory using 
the average cost method and reduces the carrying value for losses due to obsolescence. Fixed 
manufacturing costs incurred in periods of abnormally low production are expensed. The Company considers 
estimated future selling prices when determining the estimated net realizable value of its inventory. As the 
Company generally sells its recycled ferrous metal under contracts that provide for shipment within 30 to 60 
days after the price is agreed, it utilizes the selling prices under committed contracts and sales orders for 
determining the estimated net realizable value of quantities on hand that will be shipped under these 
contracts and sales orders.
The accounting process the Company uses to record ferrous scrap metal quantities relies on signiﬁcant 
estimates. With respect to estimating the quantities of unprocessed ferrous scrap metal inventory that are 
moved into production, management relies on weighed quantities of the processed ferrous material, 
adjusted for estimated metal recoveries and yields that are based on historical trends and other judgments 
by management. Actual recoveries and yields can vary depending on product quality, moisture content, and 
the source of the unprocessed metal. The Company’s estimates are intended to reasonably reﬂect the 
quantities of unprocessed ferrous scrap metal that are used in the production of processed ferrous metal. To 
assist in validating the reasonableness of these estimates, management periodically reviews shrink factors 
and performs monthly physical inventories. Due to the inherent nature of the Company’s scrap metal 
inventories, including variations in product density, holding period, and production processes utilized to 
manufacture the products, physical inventories will not necessarily detect all variances for scrap metal 
inventory such that estimates of quantities are required. To mitigate this risk, the Company further adjusts 
its ferrous physical inventories when the volume of a commodity is low and a physical inventory count is 
deemed to more accurately estimate the remaining volume.
Leases
The Company enters into leases to obtain access to real property, machinery, and equipment assets. Most of 
the Company’s lease obligations relate to real property leases for the Company’s operating sites, including 
the substantial majority of its auto parts stores, and for the Company’s administrative oﬃces. The Company 
determines whether an arrangement contains a lease at inception by assessing whether it receives the right 
to direct the use of and obtain substantially all of the economic beneﬁt from use of the underlying asset. 
Lease classiﬁcation, measurement, and recognition are determined at lease commencement, which is the 
date the underlying asset is available for use by the Company. The accounting classiﬁcation of a lease is 
based on whether the arrangement is eﬀectively a ﬁnanced purchase of the underlying asset (ﬁnance lease) 
or not (operating lease). Leases that, at lease commencement, have a non-cancellable lease term of 12 
months or less and do not include an option to either purchase the underlying asset or renew the lease 
beyond 12 months that the Company is reasonably certain to exercise are classiﬁed as short-term leases 
and are not recognized on the balance sheet.
64 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
For leases other than short-term leases, the Company recognizes right-of-use assets and lease liabilities 
based primarily on the present value of future minimum lease payments over the lease term at lease 
commencement. Right-of-use assets represent the Company’s right to use the underlying asset during the 
lease term, while lease liabilities represent the Company’s obligation to make future lease payments. The 
lease term is the non-cancellable period of the lease, together with periods covered by renewal (or 
termination) options which the Company is reasonably certain to exercise (or not to exercise). Lease 
payments are discounted to present value using the Company’s incremental borrowing rate unless the 
discount rate implicit in the lease is readily determinable. The Company’s incremental borrowing rate for 
each lease is the estimated rate of interest that the Company would have to pay to borrow the aggregate 
lease payments on a collateralized basis over the lease term. Estimation of the incremental borrowing rate 
requires judgment by management and reﬂects an assessment of the Company’s credit standing to derive 
an implied secured credit rating and corresponding yield curve. Right-of-use assets and lease liabilities are 
subject to remeasurement after lease commencement when certain events or changes in circumstances 
arise, such as a change in the lease term due to reassessment of whether the Company is reasonably 
certain to exercise a renewal or termination option.
For operating leases, lease expense is recognized on a straight-line basis over the lease term. For ﬁnance 
leases, the lease right-of-use asset is amortized on a straight-line basis and interest expense is recognized 
on the lease liability using the eﬀective interest rate method. Many of the Company’s real property leases 
contain variable lease payments that depend on an index or a rate, which are included in the measurement 
of the right-of-use asset and lease liability using the index or rate at lease commencement. Subsequent 
changes in variable lease payments are recorded as variable lease expenses during the period in which they 
are incurred. The Company elected a practical expedient to not separate lease and related non-lease 
components for accounting purposes and, thus, costs related to such non-lease components are disclosed as 
lease expense. Payments for short-term leases are recognized in the income statement on a straight-line 
basis over the lease term. See Note 5 - Leases for further detail.
The Company leases machinery assets to customers primarily to facilitate the provision of recycling 
services. For the periods presented, such lessor arrangements were classiﬁed as operating leases, whereby 
the Company keeps the asset underlying the lease on its balance sheet and depreciates the asset based on 
its estimated useful life. The Company recognizes lease income for these operating leases on a straight-line 
basis within revenues in the Consolidated Statements of Operations. As of both August 31, 2023 and 2022, 
property, plant and equipment, net, as reported in the Consolidated Balance Sheets, included machinery 
assets underlying these operating leases with a carrying value of $13 million. Lease income derived from 
these operating leases was not material to any of the periods presented.
Property, Plant and Equipment, net
Property, plant and equipment are recorded at cost. Expenditures for major additions and improvements are 
capitalized, while routine repair and maintenance costs are expensed as incurred. Interest cost related to the 
construction of qualifying assets is capitalized as part of the construction costs. When assets are retired or 
sold, the related cost and accumulated depreciation are removed from the accounts and resulting gains or 
losses are generally included in operating expense. Gains and losses from sales of assets related to an exit 
activity are reported within restructuring charges and other exit-related activities in the Consolidated 
Statements of Operations. Depreciation is recorded on a straight-line basis over the estimated useful lives of 
the assets. Upon idling an asset, depreciation continues to be recorded. Leasehold improvements are 
amortized over the shorter of their estimated useful lives or the remaining lease term.
As of August 31, 2023, the useful lives used for depreciation and amortization were as follows:
  Useful Life
(in years)
Machinery and equipment   3 to 40
Land improvements   3 to 35
Buildings and leasehold improvements   5 to 40
Enterprise Resource Planning (“ERP”) systems   5 to 10
Oﬃce equipment and other software licenses   3 to 10
Prepaid Expenses
The Company’s prepaid expenses, reported within prepaid expenses and other current assets in the 
Consolidated Balance Sheets, totaled $27 million and $43 million as of August 31, 2023 and 2022, 
respectively, and consisted primarily of deposits on capital projects, prepaid insurance, prepaid services, 
and prepaid property taxes.
65 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Other Assets
The Company’s other assets, exclusive of prepaid expenses and assets relating to certain employee beneﬁt 
plans, consisted primarily of receivables from insurers, cash held in a client trust account relating to a legal 
settlement, two equity investments, capitalized implementation costs for cloud computing arrangements, 
debt issuance costs, notes and other contractual receivables, and major spare parts and equipment. Other 
assets are reported within either prepaid expenses and other current assets or other assets in the 
Consolidated Balance Sheets based on their expected use either during or beyond the current operating 
cycle of one year from the reporting date. See Note 13 - Employee Beneﬁts for further detail on the 
Company’s assets relating to employee beneﬁt plans.
Receivables from insurers represent the portion of insured losses expected to be recovered from the 
Company’s insurers.under various insurance policies or from a Qualiﬁed Settlement Fund holding settlement 
amounts deposited by certain insurers of claims against the Company related to the Portland Harbor 
Superfund site. The receivables are recorded at an amount not to exceed the recorded loss and only if the 
terms of legally enforceable insurance contracts support that the insurance recovery will not be disputed and 
is deemed collectible, or if recovery of the loss by the Company from a Qualiﬁed Settlement Fund is 
probable. Receivables from insurers totaled $14 million and $28 million as of August 31, 2023 and 2022, 
respectively. As of August 31, 2023, receivables from insurers comprised primarily $10 million relating to 
environmental claims, $2 million relating to workers’ compensation claims, $1 million relating to third-party 
claims, and $1 million relating to property loss and damage and other claims in connection with the 
December 2021 ﬁre at the Company’s shredder facility in Everett, Massachusetts. As of August 31, 2022, 
receivables from insurers comprised primarily $10 million relating to claims in connection with the Everett 
facility shredder ﬁre, $7 million relating to environmental claims, $6 million relating to third-party claims, 
and $4 million relating to workers’ compensation claims. See “Accounting for Impacts of Involuntary Events” 
below in this Note for further discussion of receivables and advance payments from insurers relating to 
property damage and business interruption claims.
Other assets as of both August 31, 2023 and 2022 also included approximately $7 million in connection with 
cash deposited into a client trust account in the second quarter of ﬁscal 2021 to fund the remediation of a 
site, a portion of which was previously leased to and operated by an indirect, wholly-owned subsidiary. The 
cash was deposited into the client trust account by other potentially liable parties in connection with 
settlement of a lawsuit relating to allocation of the remediation costs, including agreement by the 
Company’s subsidiary to perform certain remedial actions. See “Other Legacy Environmental Loss 
Contingencies” within “Contingencies – Environmental” in Note 10 - Commitments and Contingencies for 
further discussion of this matter.
The Company invested $5 million in the equity of a privately-held Canadian recycling technology entity in 
May 2022. The Company's inﬂuence over the operating and ﬁnancial policies of the entity is not signiﬁcant, 
and, thus, the investment is accounted for under the guidance for investments in equity securities. The 
equity investment does not have a readily determinable fair value and, therefore, is carried at cost and 
adjusted for impairments and observable price changes. The investment is reported within other assets in 
the Consolidated Balance Sheets. The carrying value of the investment as of both August 31, 2023 and 2022 
was $5 million. The Company has not recorded any impairments or upward or downward adjustments to the 
carrying value of the investment since acquisition.
The Company invested $6 million in the equity of a privately-held U.S. waste and recycling entity in ﬁscal 
2017. The investment is accounted for under the guidance for investments in equity securities. In August 
2022, the privately-held entity merged with a publicly-traded U.S. entity. As a result of the merger, the 
Company's investment became held in equity units of a subsidiary of the publicly-traded entity, which 
equity units are not publicly traded but are exchangeable for shares of the publicly-traded entity. The timing 
and magnitude of exchange is solely at the discretion of the publicly-traded entity. During the ﬁrst half of 
ﬁscal 2023, because of these exchange conditions, the equity investment was determined to not have a 
readily determinable fair value and, therefore, continued to be carried at cost and adjusted for impairments 
and observable price changes. In the ﬁrst quarter of ﬁscal 2023, the Company identiﬁed an impairment 
indicator for its investment and, based on its fair value measurement incorporating observable trading 
prices of the publicly-traded entity and unobservable inputs, recognized a $4 million impairment within other 
loss, net on the Consolidated Statement of Operations. During the third quarter of ﬁscal 2023, the publicly-
traded entity allowed for an exchange event, and the Company exchanged its full investment in the 
subsidiary's equity units for shares of the publicly-traded entity, which have a readily determinable fair 
value, and which the Company still held as of August 31, 2023. As a result, in ﬁscal 2023 following the 
exchange event, the Company recorded an additional $1 million, net, downward adjustment of the equity 
investment to its fair value of $1 million as of August 31, 2023, which loss is reported within other loss, net 
on the Consolidated Statement of Operations. The investment is reported within prepaid expenses and other 
current assets as of August 31, 2023, and within other assets as of August 31, 2022, in the Consolidated 
Balance Sheets.
66 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
The Company’s cloud computing arrangements primarily comprise hosting arrangements which are service 
contracts, whereby the Company gains remote access to use enterprise software hosted by the vendor or 
another third party on an as-needed basis for a period of time in exchange for a subscription fee. 
Subscription fees are usually prepaid and recorded in operating expense over the period that the Company 
has access to use the software. Implementation costs for cloud computing arrangements are capitalized if 
certain criteria are met and consist of internal and external costs directly attributable to developing and 
conﬁguring cloud computing software for its intended use. Amortization of capitalized implementation costs 
is recorded on a straight-line basis over the term of the cloud computing arrangement, which is the non-
cancellable period of the agreement, together with periods covered by renewal options which the Company 
is reasonably certain to exercise. During ﬁscal 2023, in connection with the pursuit of an alternative solution, 
the Company abandoned the implementation of a cloud computing arrangement and recorded a $5 million 
impairment associated with previously capitalized cloud computing arrangement implementation costs. As 
of August 31, 2023 and 2022, the Company's capitalized cloud computing implementation costs were $5 
million and $10 million, respectively.
Debt issuance costs consist primarily of costs incurred by the Company to enter or modify its credit 
facilities. The Company reports deferred debt issuance costs within other assets in the Consolidated Balance 
Sheets and amortizes them to interest expense on a straight-line basis over the contractual term of the 
arrangement.
Notes and other contractual receivables consist primarily of advances to entities in the business of 
extracting scrap metal through demolition and other activities. Repayment of these advances to suppliers is 
in either cash or scrap metal. The Company performs periodic reviews of its notes and other contractual 
receivables to identify credit risks and to assess the overall collectibility of the receivables, which typically 
involves consideration of the value of collateral which in the case of advances to suppliers is generally in 
the form of scrap metal extracted from demolition and construction projects. A note or other contractual 
receivable is considered impaired when, based on current information and events, it is probable that the 
Company will be unable to collect all amounts due in accordance with the contractual terms of the 
agreement. If the carrying value of the receivable exceeds its recoverable amount, an impairment is 
recorded for the diﬀerence.
Accounting for Impacts of Involuntary Events 
Assets destroyed or damaged as a result of involuntary events are written oﬀ or reduced in carrying value to 
their salvage value. When recovery of all or a portion of the amount of property damage loss or other 
covered expenses through insurance proceeds is demonstrated to be probable, a receivable is recorded and 
oﬀsets the loss or expense up to the amount of the total loss or expense. No gain is recorded until all 
contingencies related to the insurance claim have been resolved.
On May 22, 2021, the Company experienced a ﬁre at its steel mill in McMinnville, Oregon. Direct physical 
loss or damage to property from the incident was limited to the mill’s melt shop, with no bodily injuries and 
no physical loss or damage to other buildings or equipment. The rolling mill production ceased in early June 
2021. In August 2021, the steel mill began ramping up operations following the substantial completion of 
replacement and repairs of property and equipment in the melt shop that had been lost or damaged by the 
ﬁre. The Company experienced loss of business income during the shutdown of the steel mill and the 
subsequent ramp-up phase which was substantially completed during the second quarter of ﬁscal 2022. The 
Company ﬁled insurance claims for the physical loss and damage experienced at the mill's melt shop and 
business income losses resulting from the matter. In ﬁscal 2021, the Company recognized an initial $10 
million insurance receivable and related insurance recovery gain, the latter reported within cost of goods 
sold on the Consolidated Statements of Operations, primarily oﬀsetting applicable losses incurred including 
capital purchases of $10 million that had been incurred by the Company as of the end of the ﬁscal year. In 
ﬁscal 2022, the Company increased the amount of this insurance receivable to $25 million and recognized a 
related $15 million insurance recovery gain within cost of goods sold on the Consolidated Statements of 
Operations, reﬂecting recovery of applicable losses incurred as a result of the ﬁre to date. In addition, during 
ﬁscal 2022, the Company received advance payments from insurers totaling approximately $30 million 
towards its claims, which amount reduced the $25 million insurance receivable to zero with the remaining 
amount of advance payments of $5 million reported within other accrued liabilities on the Consolidated 
Balance Sheets as of August 31, 2022. In ﬁscal 2023, the Company received additional cash payments from 
insurers towards its claims totaling approximately $22 million, and in the fourth quarter of ﬁscal 2023 the 
Company reached a full and ﬁnal settlement with its insurers for its claims and recognized an additional $27 
million insurance recovery gain within cost of goods sold on the Consolidated Statements of Operations, 
reﬂecting recovery of applicable losses including business income losses incurred as a result of the ﬁre.
On December 8, 2021, the Company experienced a ﬁre at its metals recycling facility in Everett, 
Massachusetts. Direct physical loss or damage to property from the incident was limited to the facility’s 
shredder building and equipment, with no bodily injuries and no physical loss or damage to property 
reported at other buildings or equipment. As a result of the ﬁre, shredding operations ceased, while all non-
shredding operations at the facility continued, including torching, shearing, separating, and sorting 
purchased non-shreddable recycled ferrous metals. On January 28, 2022, shredding operations at the facility 
began ramping up following the replacement and 
67 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
repairs to shredder equipment that had been damaged. In addition, shredding operations temporarily ceased 
at the facility on June 18, 2022 and, following discussions with the Massachusetts Department of 
Environmental Protection and the Massachusetts Attorney General’s oﬃce, the Company installed a 
temporary emission capture system and controls that allowed for the resumption of shredding operations on 
November 11, 2022 and for continued operation during the repair and replacement of the shredder enclosure 
building. Non-shredding operations at the facility continued during this period. The repair and replacement of 
most property that experienced physical loss or damage, primarily buildings and improvements, was 
substantially completed by the end of ﬁscal 2023. The Company ﬁled insurance claims for the property that 
experienced physical loss or damage and anticipated business income losses resulting from the matter. In 
ﬁscal 2022, after the ﬁre, the Company recognized an aggregate $17 million insurance receivable and 
related insurance recovery gain. In ﬁscal 2023, the Company recognized an additional $16 million insurance 
receivable and related insurance recovery gain. As of August 31, 2023, the Company had recognized a total 
of $34 million in insurance recovery gains, all reported within cost of goods sold on the Consolidated 
Statements of Operations, reﬂecting recovery of applicable losses to date including impairment charges of 
$7 million related to the carrying value of plant and equipment assets lost in or damaged by the ﬁre, and 
capital purchases, non-capitalizable repair and replacement costs, and other applicable losses totaling $27 
million that had been incurred as of August 31, 2023. Also, during ﬁscal 2023 and 2022, the Company 
received advance payments from insurers totaling approximately $26 million and $7 million, respectively, 
towards its claims, and not reﬂecting any ﬁnal or full settlement of claims with the insurers, which amount 
reduced the insurance receivable to $1 million and $10 million as of August 31, 2023 and 2022, respectively. 
The insurance receivable is reported within prepaid expenses and other current assets on the Consolidated 
Balance Sheets.
Long-Lived Assets
The Company tests long-lived tangible and intangible assets for impairment at the asset group level, which 
is determined based on the lowest level for which identiﬁable cash ﬂows are largely independent of the cash 
ﬂows of other groups of assets and liabilities. Operating lease right-of-use assets are considered long-lived 
assets subject to this impairment testing. For the Company’s metals recycling operations, an asset group 
generally consists of the regional shredding operation along with surrounding feeder operations, except that 
the combined Oregon metals recycling and steel manufacturing operations is a single asset group. For the 
Company’s auto parts operations, generally each auto parts store is an asset group. The Company tests its 
asset groups for impairment when certain triggering events or changes in circumstances indicate that the 
carrying value of the asset group may be impaired. If the carrying value of the asset group is not 
recoverable because it exceeds the Company’s estimate of future undiscounted cash ﬂows from the use and 
eventual disposition of the asset group, an impairment loss is recognized by the amount the carrying value 
exceeds its fair value, if any. The impairment loss is allocated to the long-lived assets of the group on a pro 
rata basis using the relative carrying amounts of those assets, except that the loss allocated to an individual 
long-lived asset of the group shall not reduce the carrying amount of that asset below its fair value. Fair 
value is determined using one or more of the income, market, or cost approaches, depending on the nature 
of the asset group.
With respect to individual long-lived assets, changes in circumstances may merit a change in the estimated 
useful lives or salvage values of the assets, which are accounted for prospectively in the period of change. 
For such assets, the useful life is shortened based on the Company’s plans to dispose of or abandon the 
asset before the end of its original useful life and depreciation is accelerated beginning when that 
determination is made.
Long-lived asset impairment charges (recoveries) and accelerated depreciation are reported in the 
Consolidated Statements of Operations within (1) asset impairment charges, net and (2) restructuring 
charges and other exit-related activities if related to a site closure. In ﬁscal 2023 and 2022, the Company 
reported less than $1 million and $2 million, respectively, of impairments of long-lived assets within asset 
impairment charges, net related primarily to abandonment of obsolete machinery and equipment assets.
Investments in Joint Ventures
As of August 31, 2022, the Company had two 50%-owned joint venture interests and on November 7, 2022, 
the Company sold its ownership interest in one of the 50%-owned joint ventures for approximately $2 
million. No gain or loss was recognized as a result of the sale. As of August 31, 2023, the Company had one 
50%-owned joint venture interest which is accounted for under the equity method of accounting. This 
remaining joint venture sells recycled metal to the Company’s operations at prices that approximate local 
market rates, which produces intercompany proﬁt. This intercompany proﬁt is eliminated while the products 
remain in inventory and is not recognized until the ﬁnished products are sold to third parties. As of August 
31, 2023, the Company’s investments in equity method joint ventures have generated $9 million in 
cumulative undistributed earnings. See Note 18 - Related Party Transactions for further detail on transactions 
with joint ventures.
68 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
A loss in value of an investment in a joint venture is recognized when the decline is other than temporary. 
Management considers all available evidence to evaluate the realizable value of its investments including 
the length of time and the extent to which the fair value has been less than cost, the ﬁnancial condition and 
near-term prospects of the joint venture business, and the Company’s intent and ability to retain the 
investment for a period of time suﬃcient to allow for any anticipated recovery in fair value. Once 
management determines that an other-than-temporary impairment exists, the investment is written down to 
its fair value, which establishes a new cost basis. The Company determines fair value using Level 3 inputs 
under the fair value hierarchy using an income approach based on a discounted cash ﬂow analysis.
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets, net
Goodwill represents the excess of the purchase price over the net amount of identiﬁable assets acquired and 
liabilities assumed in a business combination measured at fair value. The Company evaluates goodwill for 
impairment annually on July 1 and upon the occurrence of certain triggering events or substantive changes 
in circumstances that indicate that the fair value of goodwill may be impaired. Impairment of goodwill is 
tested at the reporting unit level. A reporting unit is an operating segment or one level below an operating 
segment (referred to as a “component”). A component of an operating segment is required to be identiﬁed 
as a reporting unit if the component is a business for which discrete ﬁnancial information is available and 
segment management regularly reviews its operating results.
When testing goodwill for impairment, the Company has the option to ﬁrst assess qualitative factors to 
determine whether the existence of events or circumstances leads to a determination that it is more-likely-
than-not that the estimated fair value of a reporting unit is less than its carrying amount. If the Company 
elects to perform a qualitative assessment and determines that an impairment is more-likely-than-not, the 
Company is then required to perform the quantitative impairment test, otherwise no further analysis is 
required. The Company also may elect not to perform the qualitative assessment and, instead, proceed 
directly to the quantitative impairment test. When performing the quantitative impairment test, the 
Company applies a one-step quantitative test and records the amount of goodwill impairment as the excess 
of a reporting unit’s carrying amount over its fair value, not to exceed the total amount of goodwill allocated 
to that reporting unit.
When the Company performs a quantitative goodwill impairment test, it estimates the fair value of the 
reporting unit using an income approach based on the present value of expected future cash ﬂows, including 
terminal value, utilizing a market-based weighted average cost of capital (“WACC”) determined separately 
for the reporting unit. The determination of fair value involves the use of estimates and assumptions, 
including regarding revenue growth rates driven by future ferrous and nonferrous commodity price and sales 
volume expectations, gross margins, selling, general, and administrative expense relative to total revenues, 
capital expenditures, working capital requirements, discount rate (WACC), tax rate, terminal growth rate, 
beneﬁts associated with a taxable transaction, and synergistic beneﬁts available to market participants. In 
addition, to corroborate the reporting unit’s income approach valuation, as well as to estimate the fair value 
of the Company’s other reporting units, including those with no allocated goodwill, the Company uses a 
market approach based on earnings multiple data, and it performs a reconciliation of its estimate of the 
aggregate fair value of all reporting units to the Company’s market capitalization, including consideration of 
a control premium. See Note 8 - Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets, net for further detail including the 
recognition of a goodwill impairment charge of $39 million during the ﬁscal year ended August 31, 2023, 
representing a portion of the carrying amount of goodwill allocated to one reporting unit.
The Company tests indeﬁnite-lived intangible assets for impairment by ﬁrst assessing qualitative factors to 
determine whether it is necessary to perform a quantitative impairment test. If the Company believes, as a 
result of its qualitative assessment, that it is more-likely-than-not that the fair value of the indeﬁnite-lived 
intangible asset is less than its carrying amount, the quantitative impairment test is required. Otherwise, no 
further testing is required. The Company did not record impairment charges on indeﬁnite-lived intangible 
assets in any of the periods presented. See Note 8 - Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets, net for further 
detail.
Business Acquisitions
The Company recognizes the assets acquired, the liabilities assumed, and any noncontrolling interest in the 
acquiree at the acquisition date, measured at their fair values as of that date. Contingent purchase 
consideration is recorded at fair value at the date of acquisition. Any excess purchase price over the fair 
value of the net assets acquired is recorded as goodwill. Within one year from the date of acquisition, the 
Company may update the value allocated to the assets acquired and liabilities assumed and the resulting 
goodwill balance as a result of information received regarding the valuation of such assets and liabilities 
that was not available at the time of purchase. Measuring assets and liabilities at fair value requires the 
Company to determine the price that would be paid by a third-party market participant based on the highest 
and best use of the assets or interests acquired. Acquisition costs are expensed as incurred. See Note 7 - 
Business Acquisitions for further detail.
69 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Restructuring Charges and Other Exit-Related Activities
Restructuring charges consist of severance, contract termination, and other restructuring-related costs. A 
liability for severance costs is typically recognized when the plan of termination has been communicated to 
the aﬀected employees and is measured at its fair value at the communication date. A liability for contract 
termination or other restructuring-related costs is measured at its fair value in the period in which the 
liability is incurred. Exit-related activities consist primarily of asset impairments in connection with closure 
of certain operations and sites, net of gains on exit-related disposals.
Accrued Workers’ Compensation Costs
The Company is self-insured for the signiﬁcant majority of workers’ compensation claims with exposure 
limited by various stop-loss insurance policies. The Company estimates the costs of workers’ compensation 
claims based on the nature of the injury incurred and on guidelines established by the applicable state. An 
accrual is recorded based upon the amount of unpaid claims as of the balance sheet date. Accrued amounts 
recorded for individual claims are reviewed periodically as treatment progresses and adjusted to reﬂect 
additional information that becomes available. The estimated cost of claims incurred but not reported is 
included in the accrual. The Company accrued $5 million and $6 million for the estimated cost of unpaid 
workers’ compensation claims as of August 31, 2023 and 2022, respectively, which are included in other 
accrued liabilities in the Consolidated Balance Sheets, with corresponding workers’ compensation insurance 
receivables of $2 million and $4 million as of August 31, 2023 and 2022, respectively, included in other 
current assets.
Environmental Liabilities
The Company estimates future costs for known environmental remediation requirements and accrues for 
them on an undiscounted basis when it is probable that the Company has incurred a liability and the related 
costs can be reasonably estimated but the timing of incurring the estimated costs is unknown. The Company 
considers various factors when estimating its environmental liabilities, and it evaluates the adequacy of 
these liabilities on a quarterly basis. Adjustments to the liabilities are recorded to selling, general, and 
administrative expense in the Consolidated Statements of Operations when additional information becomes 
available that aﬀects the estimated costs to study or remediate any environmental issues or expenditures 
are made for which liabilities were established. Legal investigation and defense costs incurred in connection 
with environmental contingencies are expensed as incurred.
When only a wide range of estimated amounts can be reasonably established and no other amount within 
the range is a better estimate than another, the low end of the range is recorded in the ﬁnancial statements. 
In a number of cases, it is possible that the Company may receive reimbursement through insurance or from 
other third parties for a site or matter. In these situations, recoveries of environmental remediation costs 
from other parties are recognized when realization of the claim for recovery is deemed probable. The 
amounts recorded for environmental liabilities are reviewed periodically as assessment and remediation 
progresses at individual sites or for particular matters and adjusted to reﬂect additional information that 
becomes available. Due to evolving remediation technology, changing regulations, possible third-party 
contributions, the subjective nature of the assumptions used, and other factors, amounts accrued could vary 
signiﬁcantly from amounts paid. See “Contingencies – Environmental” in Note 10 - Commitments and 
Contingencies for further detail.
Loss Contingencies
The Company is subject to certain legal proceedings and contingencies in addition to those related to 
environmental liabilities discussed above in this Note, the outcomes of which are subject to signiﬁcant 
uncertainty. The Company accrues for estimated losses if it is probable that a liability has been incurred and 
the amount of the loss can be reasonably estimated. Legal costs incurred in connection with loss 
contingencies are expensed as incurred. The Company uses judgment and evaluates whether a loss 
contingency arising from litigation or an unasserted claim should be disclosed or recorded. The outcome of 
legal proceedings and other contingencies is inherently uncertain and often diﬃcult to estimate. Accrued 
legal contingencies are reported within other accrued liabilities in the Consolidated Balance Sheets. See 
“Contingencies – Other” in Note 10 - Commitments and Contingencies for further detail.
70 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Financial Instruments
The Company’s ﬁnancial instruments include primarily cash and cash equivalents, accounts receivable, 
accounts payable, and debt and derivative contracts. The Company uses the market approach to value its 
ﬁnancial assets and liabilities, determined using available market information. The net carrying amounts of 
cash and cash equivalents, accounts receivable, and accounts payable approximate fair value due to the 
short-term nature of these instruments. For long-term debt, which is primarily at variable interest rates, fair 
value is estimated using observable inputs (Level 2) and approximates the carrying value. Derivative 
contracts are reported at fair value. See Note 15 - Derivative Financial Instruments for further detail.
Fair Value Measurements
Fair value is measured using inputs from the three levels of the fair value hierarchy. Classiﬁcation within the 
hierarchy is determined based on the lowest level input that is signiﬁcant to the fair value measurement. 
The three levels are described as follows:
•Level 1 – Unadjusted quoted prices in active markets for identical assets and liabilities.
•Level 2 – Inputs other than quoted prices included within Level 1 that are observable for the 
determination of the fair value of the asset or liability, either directly or indirectly.
•Level 3 – Unobservable inputs that are signiﬁcant to the determination of the fair value of the asset 
or liability.
When developing fair value measurements, the Company uses quoted market prices whenever available or 
seeks to maximize the use of observable inputs and minimize the use of unobservable inputs when quoted 
market prices are not available.
Derivatives
The Company records derivative instruments at fair value in the Consolidated Balance Sheets, and changes 
in their fair value are recognized in either other comprehensive (loss) income in the Consolidated 
Statements of Comprehensive (Loss) Income or net (loss) income in the Consolidated Statements of 
Operations, as applicable, depending on the nature of the underlying exposure, whether the derivative has 
been designated as a hedge and, if designated as a hedge, whether the hedge is expected to be highly 
eﬀective. For cash ﬂow hedges, such as the interest rate swap transactions entered by the Company in the 
fourth quarter of ﬁscal 2023, a formal assessment is made, both at the hedge’s inception and on an ongoing 
basis, to determine whether the derivatives that are designated as hedging instruments have been highly 
eﬀective in oﬀsetting changes in the cash ﬂows of hedged items and whether those derivatives may be 
expected to remain highly eﬀective in future periods. Changes in the fair value of a derivative that is 
qualiﬁed, designated, and highly eﬀective as a cash ﬂow hedge are recorded in other comprehensive (loss) 
income and are reclassiﬁed to earnings in the period in which earnings are impacted by the hedged item. 
When it is determined that a derivative is not highly eﬀective as a hedge or that it has ceased to be a highly 
eﬀective hedge, the Company discontinues hedge accounting prospectively. When available, quoted market 
prices or prices obtained through external sources are used to measure a derivative instrument’s fair value. 
The fair value of these instruments is a function of underlying forward interest rates, related volatility, 
counterparty creditworthiness, and the duration of the contracts. The Company has elected an accounting 
policy to classify the cash ﬂows from its interest rate swap derivatives designated in qualifying cash ﬂow 
hedges as cash ﬂows from operating activities in the Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows, consistent 
with the classiﬁcation of cash ﬂows from the hedged item. See Note 15 - Derivative Financial Instruments for 
further detail.
Derivative contracts for commodities used in normal business operations that are settled by physical 
delivery, among other criteria, are eligible for and may be designated as normal purchases and normal 
sales. Contracts that qualify as normal purchases or normal sales are not marked-to-market. The Company 
does not use derivative instruments for trading or speculative purposes.
Foreign Currency Translation and Transactions
Assets and liabilities of the Company’s operations in Canada are translated into U.S. dollars at the period-
end exchange rate, revenues and expenses of these operations are translated into U.S. dollars at the 
average exchange rate for the period, and cash ﬂows of these operations are translated into U.S. dollars 
using the exchange rates in eﬀect at the time of the cash ﬂows. Translation adjustments are not included in 
determining net income for the period, but are recorded in accumulated other comprehensive income, a 
separate component of shareholders’ equity. Foreign currency transaction gains and losses are generated 
from the eﬀects of exchange rate changes on transactions denominated in a currency other than the 
functional currency. Gains and losses on foreign currency transactions are generally included in determining 
net income for the period. The Company reports these gains and losses within other expense, net in the 
Consolidated Statements of Operations. Net realized and unrealized foreign currency transaction gains and 
losses were not material for ﬁscal 2023, 2022, or 2021.
71 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Common Stock
Each share of Class A and Class B common stock is entitled to one vote. Additionally, each share of Class B 
common stock may be converted to one share of Class A common stock. As such, the Company reserves 
one share of Class A common stock for each share of Class B common stock outstanding. There are 
currently no meaningful distinctions between the rights of holders of Class A shares and Class B shares.
Share Repurchases
The Company accounts for the repurchase of stock at par value. All shares repurchased are deemed retired. 
Upon retirement of the shares, the Company records the diﬀerence between the weighted average cost of 
such shares and the par value of the stock as an adjustment to additional paid-in capital, with the excess 
recorded to retained earnings when additional paid-in capital is not suﬃcient.
Revenue Recognition
The Company recognizes revenue upon satisfying its promises to transfer goods or services to customers 
under the terms of its contracts. Nearly all of these promises, referred to as performance obligations, consist 
of the transfer of physical goods, including recycled ferrous and nonferrous metal, auto bodies, auto parts, 
and ﬁnished steel products, to customers. These performance obligations are satisﬁed at the point in time 
the Company transfers control of the goods to the customer, which in nearly all cases is when title to and 
risk of loss of the goods transfer to the customer. The timing of transfer of title and risk of loss is dictated by 
customary or explicitly stated contract terms. For example, the Company recognizes revenue on partially 
loaded bulk shipments of recycled ferrous metal when contractual terms support revenue recognition based 
on transfer of title and risk of loss. The signiﬁcant majority of the Company’s sales involve transfer of 
control to the customer, and thus revenue recognition, before delivery to the customer’s destination; for 
example, upon release of the goods to the shipper. The Company’s bill-and-hold arrangements involve 
transfer of control to the customer when the goods have been segregated from other inventory at the 
Company’s facility and are ready for physical transfer to the customer. Shipping and handling activities that 
occur after a customer has obtained control of a good are accounted for as fulﬁllment costs rather than an 
additional promise in a contract. As such, shipping and handling consideration (freight revenue) is 
recognized when control of the goods transfers to the customer, and freight expense is accrued to cost of 
goods sold when the related revenue is recognized.
In certain regional markets, the Company enters into contracts whereby it arranges for, or brokers, the 
transfer of recyclable material between suppliers and end customers. For transactions in which the Company 
obtains substantive control of the material before the goods are transferred to the end customer, for 
example by arranging for the processing or warehousing of the material, the Company recognizes revenue 
equal to the gross amount of the consideration it expects to receive from the customer (as principal). 
Alternatively, for transactions in which the Company does not obtain substantive control of the material 
before the product is transferred to the end customer, the Company recognizes revenue equal to the net 
amount of the consideration it expects to retain after paying the supplier for the purchase of the material (as 
agent). The Company is the agent in the transaction for the substantial majority of brokerage arrangements.
Nearly all of the Company’s sales contracts reﬂect market pricing at the time the contract is executed, are 
one year or less, and generally provide for shipment within 30 to 60 days after the price has been agreed 
upon with the customer. The Company’s retail auto parts sales are at listed prices and are recognized at the 
point of sale.
The Company recognizes revenue based on contractually stated selling prices and quantities shipped, net of 
sales tax, and adjusted for estimated claims and discounts. Claims are customary in the recycled metal 
industry and arise from variances in the quantity or quality of delivered products. Revenue adjustments may 
be required if the settlement of claims exceeds original estimates. Discounts oﬀered to certain ﬁnished steel 
customers qualify as variable consideration as the discounts are contingent upon future events. Variable 
consideration arising from discounts is recognized upon the transfer of ﬁnished steel products to customers 
based upon either the expected value or the most likely amount and was not material for each of the years 
ended August 31, 2023, 2022, and 2021. The Company experiences very few sales returns and, therefore, no 
material provisions for returns have been made when sales are recognized. For each of the years ended 
August 31, 2023, 2022, and 2021, revenue adjustments related to performance obligations that were 
satisﬁed in previous periods were not material.
Advertising Costs
The Company expenses advertising costs when incurred. Advertising expense was $5 million for the year 
ended August 31 2023, and $6 million for each of the years ended August 31, 2022 and 2021.
72 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Share-Based Compensation
The Company estimates the grant-date fair value of stock-based compensation awards based on the market 
closing price of the underlying Class A common stock on the date of grant, except for performance share 
awards with a total shareholder return (“TSR”) market condition for which the Company estimates the grant-
date fair value using a Monte-Carlo simulation model. The Company recognizes compensation cost for all 
awards, net of estimated forfeitures, over the requisite service period. Share-based compensation cost is 
based on the grant-date fair value as described above, except for performance share awards with a non-
market performance condition. For these awards, compensation cost is based on the probable outcome of 
achieving the speciﬁed performance conditions. The Company reassesses whether achievement of the 
performance condition is probable at each reporting date and, if probable, the level of achievement. See 
Note 14 - Share-Based Compensation for further detail.
Income Taxes
Income taxes are accounted for using the asset and liability method. This requires the recognition of taxes 
currently payable or refundable and the recognition of deferred tax assets and liabilities for the future tax 
consequences of events that are recognized in one reporting period in the Consolidated Financial Statements 
but in a diﬀerent reporting period on the tax returns. Tax credits are recognized as a reduction of income tax 
expense in the year the credit arises. Valuation allowances are recorded to reduce deferred tax assets when 
it is more-likely-than-not that a tax beneﬁt will not be realized. The Company assesses the realizability of its 
deferred tax assets on a quarterly basis through an analysis of potential sources of future taxable income, 
including prior year taxable income available to absorb a carryback of tax losses, reversals of existing 
taxable temporary diﬀerences, tax planning strategies, and forecasts of taxable income. The Company 
considers all negative and positive evidence, including the weight of the evidence, to determine if valuation 
allowances against deferred tax assets are required. Tax beneﬁts arising from uncertain tax positions are 
recognized when it is more-likely-than-not that the position will be sustained upon examination by the 
relevant tax authorities. The amount recognized in the ﬁnancial statements is the largest amount of tax 
beneﬁt that is greater than 50 percent likely of being realized upon ultimate settlement with a taxing 
authority that has full knowledge of all relevant information. The Company recognizes interest and 
penalties, if any, related to uncertain tax positions in income tax expense. See Note 16 - Income Taxes for 
further detail.
Net (Loss) Income Per Share
Basic net (loss) income per share attributable to Radius shareholders is computed by dividing net (loss) 
income attributable to Radius shareholders by the weighted average number of outstanding common shares 
during the period presented including vested deferred stock units (“DSUs”) and restricted stock units 
(“RSUs”) meeting certain criteria. Diluted net (loss) income per share attributable to Radius shareholders is 
computed by dividing net (loss) income attributable to Radius shareholders by the weighted average number 
of common shares outstanding, assuming dilution. Potentially dilutive common shares include the assumed 
vesting of DSU, RSU, and performance share awards using the treasury stock method. Net income 
attributable to noncontrolling interests is deducted from (loss) income from continuing operations to arrive 
at (loss) income from continuing operations attributable to Radius shareholders for the purpose of 
calculating (loss) income per share from continuing operations attributable to Radius shareholders. See Note 
17 - Net (Loss) Income Per Share for further detail.
Use of Estimates
The preparation of the Company’s Consolidated Financial Statements in accordance with generally accepted 
accounting principles in the United States of America (“U.S. GAAP”) requires management to make 
estimates and assumptions that aﬀect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities and disclosure of 
contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the Consolidated Financial Statements and reported amounts 
of revenue and expenses during the reporting period. Examples include revenue recognition; the allowance 
for credit losses; estimates of contingencies, including environmental liabilities and other legal liabilities; 
goodwill, long-lived asset and indeﬁnite-lived intangible asset valuation; valuation of equity investments; 
valuation of certain share-based awards; other asset valuation; inventory measurement and valuation; 
pension plan assumptions; and the assessment of the valuation of deferred income taxes and income tax 
contingencies. Actual results may diﬀer from estimated amounts.
73 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Concentration of Credit Risk
Financial instruments that potentially subject the Company to signiﬁcant concentration of credit risk consist 
primarily of cash and cash equivalents, accounts receivable and derivative ﬁnancial instruments. The 
majority of cash and cash equivalents is maintained with major ﬁnancial institutions. Balances with these 
and certain other institutions exceeded the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation insured amount of $250 
thousand as of August 31, 2023. Concentration of credit risk with respect to accounts receivable is limited 
because a large number of geographically diverse customers make up the Company’s customer base. The 
Company controls credit risk through credit approvals, credit limits, credit insurance, letters of credit or other 
collateral, cash deposits, and monitoring procedures. The Company is exposed to a residual credit risk with 
respect to open letters of credit by virtue of the possibility of the failure of a bank providing a letter of credit. 
The counterparties to the Company's derivative ﬁnancial instruments are major ﬁnancial institutions.
Note 3 - Recent Accounting Pronouncements
In August 2023, the Financial Accounting Standards Board issued Accounting Standards Update (“ASU”) 2023-
05, Business Combinations - Joint Venture Formations (Subtopic 805-60): Recognition and Initial 
Measurement, which clariﬁes the business combination accounting for joint venture formations. The 
amendments in the ASU seek to reduce diversity in practice that has resulted from a lack of authoritative 
guidance regarding the accounting for the formation of joint ventures in separate ﬁnancial statements. The 
amendments also seek to clarify the initial measurement of joint venture net assets, including businesses 
contributed to a joint venture. The guidance is applicable to all entities involved in the formation of a joint 
venture. The amendments are eﬀective beginning in the Company’s ﬁscal 2025 and are applied 
prospectively to all joint venture formations with a formation date on or after January 1, 2025. Early adoption 
and retrospective application of the amendments are permitted. The Company does not expect adoption of 
the new guidance to have a material impact on its consolidated ﬁnancial statements and disclosures.
Note 4 - Inventories
Inventories consisted of the following as of August 31 (in thousands):
 
    2023    2022  
Processed and unprocessed scrap metal  $ 143,986  $ 166,368 
Semi-ﬁnished goods    9,959    20,009 
Finished goods    60,348    72,625 
Supplies    64,349    56,187 
Inventories  $ 278,642  $ 315,189 
 
74 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Note 5 - Leases
The Company’s operating leases for real property underlying certain auto parts stores, metals recycling 
facilities, and administrative oﬃces generally have non-cancellable lease terms of 5 to 10 years, and the 
signiﬁcant majority contain multiple renewal options for a further 5 to 20 years. Renewal options which the 
Company is reasonably certain to exercise are included in the measurement of lease term. The Company’s 
ﬁnance leases and other operating leases involve primarily transportation equipment assets, have non-
cancellable lease terms of less than 10 years and usually do not include renewal options.
The Company’s ﬁscal 2023 total lease cost was $38 million, consisting primarily of operating lease expense 
of $25 million and short-term lease expense of $10 million. The Company’s ﬁscal 2022 total lease cost was 
$36 million, consisting primarily of operating lease expense of $25 million and short-term lease expense of 
$10 million. The Company’s ﬁscal 2021 total lease cost was $30 million, consisting primarily of operating 
lease expense of $24 million and short-term lease expense of $5 million. The other components of the 
Company’s total lease cost for each of ﬁscal 2023, 2022 and 2021, including ﬁnance lease amortization and 
interest expense, variable lease expense, and sublease income, were not material both individually and in 
aggregate. The substantial majority of the Company’s total lease cost for each of ﬁscal 2023, 2022, and 
2021 is presented within cost of goods sold in the Consolidated Statements of Operations.
Finance lease assets and liabilities consisted of the following as of August 31 (in thousands):
 
   Balance Sheet Classiﬁcation   2023    2022  
Assets:            
Finance lease right-of-use 
assets  Property, plant and equipment, net $ 6,340  $ 4,861 
Liabilities:            
Finance lease liabilities - current Short-term borrowings  $ 2,227  $ 1,736 
Finance lease liabilities - 
noncurrent  Long-term debt, net of current 
maturities    4,973    4,158 
Total ﬁnance lease liabilities    $ 7,200  $ 5,894 
 
(1)Presented net of accumulated amortization of $6 million and $4 million as of August 31, 2023 and 2022, respectively.
The weighted average remaining lease terms and weighted average discount rates for the Company’s leases 
as of August 31:
 
    2023    2022  
   Weighted 
Average
Remaining 
Lease
Term (Years)  Weighted 
Average
Discount Rate  Weighted 
Average
Remaining 
Lease
Term (Years)  Weighted 
Average
Discount Rate 
Operating leases    9.2    3.73%   9.5    3.36%
Finance leases    4.3    6.10%   4.5    7.17%
Maturities of lease liabilities by ﬁscal year as of August 31, 2023 were as follows (in thousands):
 
Year Ending August 31,  Finance 
Leases   Operating 
Leases  
2024  $ 2,558  $ 23,768 
2025    1,746    19,391 
2026    1,262    15,503 
2027    1,103    13,546 
2028    939    10,901 
Thereafter    445    55,434 
Total lease payments    8,053    138,543 
Less amounts representing interest    (853)   (22,622)
Total lease liabilities    7,200    115,921 
Less current maturities    (2,227)   (19,835)
Lease liabilities, net of current maturities  $ 4,973  $ 96,086 
 
75 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023(1)
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Supplemental cash ﬂow information and non-cash activity related to leases are as follows (in thousands):
 
    Year Ended August 31,  
   2023   2022   2021  
Cash paid for amounts included in the measurement of 
lease liabilities:             
Operating cash ﬂows for operating leases  $ 25,414  $ 25,351  $ 24,154 
Operating cash ﬂows for ﬁnance leases  $ 393  $ 403  $ 498 
Financing cash ﬂows for ﬁnance leases  $ 2,049  $ 1,483  $ 1,332 
Lease liabilities arising from obtaining right-of-use assets:            
Operating leases  $ 15,279  $ 12,000  $ 8,325 
Finance leases  $ 3,596  $ 534  $ 445 
 
(1)Amounts include new leases and adjustments to lease balances as a result of remeasurement.
 
Note 6 - Property, Plant and Equipment, net
Property, plant and equipment, net consisted of the following as of August 31 (in thousands):
 
    2023    2022  
Machinery and equipment  $ 952,480  $ 875,904 
Land and improvements    345,584    324,453 
Buildings and leasehold improvements    169,940    148,634 
Enterprise resource planning (ERP) systems    18,898    18,945 
Oﬃce equipment and other software licenses    31,195    30,797 
Construction in progress    90,939    120,419 
Property, plant and equipment, gross    1,609,036    1,519,152 
Less accumulated depreciation    (902,231)   (855,032)
Property, plant and equipment, net  $ 706,805  $ 664,120 
 
(1)Property, plant and equipment, net included $21 million and $22 million as of August 31, 2023 and 2022, respectively, 
related to the Company’s Canadian operations.
Depreciation expense for property, plant and equipment, which includes amortization expense for ﬁnance 
lease right-of-use assets, was $84 million, $72 million, and $58 million for the years ended August 31, 2023, 
2022, and 2021, respectively. See Note 5 - Leases for additional disclosure on ﬁnance leases. Interest cost 
related to the construction of qualifying assets capitalized as part of the construction costs was $4 million 
for the year ended August 31, 2023, and $2 million for each of the years ended August 31, 2022 and 2021.
 
Note 7 - Business Acquisitions
Fiscal 2023 Business Acquisition
On November 18, 2022, the Company used cash on hand and borrowings under existing credit facilities to 
acquire the operating assets of ScrapSource, a recycling services company that provides solutions for 
industrial companies that generate scrap metal from their manufacturing process. The acquired business 
expands the Company's national recycling services operations, giving rise to expected beneﬁts supporting 
the amount of acquired goodwill. The transaction qualiﬁed as a business combination for accounting 
purposes, which involves application of the acquisition method described in Accounting Standards 
Codiﬁcation Topic 805, Business Combinations, and summarized in “Business Acquisitions” in Note 2 - 
Summary of Signiﬁcant Accounting Policies. The total purchase consideration was approximately $25 
million. As of the date of this report, measurement of the fair values of certain assets acquired and liabilities 
assumed is still preliminary and subject to change based on the completion of valuation procedures.
76 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023(1)
(1)
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
The following table summarizes the fair values of the assets acquired and liabilities assumed by the 
Company as of the November 18, 2022 acquisition date (in thousands):
Operating lease right-of-use assets  $ 466 
Goodwill    13,105 
Other intangible assets    11,955 
Other assets    9 
Total assets acquired    25,535 
Operating lease liability    466 
Total liabilities assumed    466 
Net assets acquired  $ 25,069 
 
(1)All of the provisional amount of acquired goodwill is tax deductible. 
The following table summarizes the provisional purchase price allocation to the identiﬁable intangible assets 
and their estimated useful lives as of the November 18, 2022 acquisition date (in thousands):
         Useful Life
Supplier relationships  $ 10,375   6
Non-compete intangible assets    1,360   5
Customer relationships    220   6
   $ 11,955    
The results of operations for the acquired ScrapSource business beginning as of the November 18, 2022 
acquisition date are included in the accompanying consolidated ﬁnancial statements. For the ﬁscal year 
ended August 31, 2023, the revenues and net income contributed by the acquired ScrapSource business and 
reported in the Consolidated Statements of Operations were not material to the ﬁnancial statements taken 
as a whole.
Fiscal 2022 Business Acquisitions
On October 1, 2021, the Company used cash on hand and borrowings under existing credit facilities to 
acquire eight metals recycling facilities across Mississippi, Tennessee, and Kentucky from Columbus 
Recycling, a provider of recycled ferrous and nonferrous metal products and recycling services. Combined 
with the Company’s regional metals recycling facilities in Georgia, Alabama, and Tennessee, the acquired 
operations oﬀer additional recycling products, services, and logistics solutions to customers and suppliers 
across the Southeast, giving rise to expected beneﬁts supporting the amount of acquired goodwill. The total 
purchase consideration of $117 million was allocated to the assets acquired and liabilities assumed based 
on their respective estimated fair values on the date of the acquisition. The results of operations for the 
acquired Columbus Recycling business beginning as of the October 1, 2021 acquisition date are included in 
the accompanying consolidated ﬁnancial statements.
On April 29, 2022, the Company used cash on hand and borrowings under existing credit facilities to acquire 
two recycling facilities in the greater Atlanta, Georgia metropolitan area, including a metal shredding 
operation and recycled auto-parts center from the previous owners of Encore Recycling. Combined with the 
Company’s existing regional metals recycling facilities and recycled auto-parts centers, the acquired 
operations oﬀer additional recycling products, services, and logistics solutions to customers and suppliers 
across portions of the Southeast, giving rise to expected beneﬁts supporting the amount of acquired 
goodwill. The total purchase consideration of $64 million was allocated to the assets acquired and liabilities 
assumed based on their respective estimated fair values on the date of the acquisition. The results of 
operations for the acquired Encore Recycling business beginning as of the April 29, 2022 acquisition date are 
included in the accompanying consolidated ﬁnancial statements. 
77 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023(1)
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
The following table summarizes the aggregate fair values of the assets acquired and liabilities assumed by 
the Company in the ﬁscal 2022 business acquisitions as of their respective acquisition dates (in thousands):
   Columbus 
Recycling   Encore Recycling 
   October 1, 2021  April 29, 2022 
Cash  $ 325  $ — 
Accounts receivable    22,763    10,356 
Inventories    10,060    4,325 
Other current assets    255    15 
Property, plant and equipment    13,491    25,027 
Operating lease right-of-use assets    254    402 
Goodwill    65,203    21,423 
Other intangible assets    19,741    4,809 
Total assets acquired    132,092    66,357 
Current liabilities    11,828    1,323 
Other liabilities    3,350    1,091 
Total liabilities assumed    15,178    2,414 
Net assets acquired  $ 116,914  $ 63,943 
(1)Approximately $62 million and $20 million of the amount of acquired goodwill for Columbus Recycling and Encore Recycling, respectively, are 
tax deductible.
The following table summarizes the purchase price allocation to the identiﬁable intangible assets of 
Columbus Recycling and Encore Recycling combined and their estimated useful lives as of their respective 
acquisition dates (in thousands):
    Columbus Recycling   Encore Recycling
        Useful Life     Useful Life
Supplier relationships  $ 17,245   7  $ 3,679  7
Customer relationships    2,496   7    1,130  7
   $ 19,741     $ 4,809   
Unaudited Pro Forma Information
The following unaudited pro forma information presents the eﬀect on the consolidated ﬁnancial results of 
the Company of the Columbus Recycling and Encore Recycling businesses acquired during ﬁscal 2022 as 
though the businesses had been acquired as of the beginning of ﬁscal 2021 (in thousands):
    Year Ended August 31,  
    2022    2021  
Revenues  $ 3,566,000  $ 2,989,000 
Net income  $ 184,500  $ 179,000 
Net income attributable to Radius shareholders  $ 181,000  $ 174,500 
 
There are no individually material, nonrecurring pro forma adjustments directly attributable to the business combinations included in these pro 
forma revenues and earnings.
The information included in the pro forma amounts is derived from historical information obtained from the 
sellers of the businesses. These pro forma results are not necessarily indicative of what actual results would 
have been had these acquisitions occurred as of the beginning of ﬁscal 2021. In addition, the pro forma 
results are not intended to be a projection of future results and do not reﬂect any synergies that may be 
achieved from combining operations.
For the ﬁscal years ended August 31, 2023 and 2022, the unaudited pro forma amounts of revenues and net 
income of the ScrapSource business acquired during ﬁscal 2023 were not material to the consolidated 
ﬁnancial statements taken as a whole and, therefore, are not included in the tabular disclosure of unaudited 
pro forma information above.
 
78 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023(1)
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Note 8 - Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets, net
Goodwill 
In the fourth quarter of ﬁscal 2023, the Company performed the annual goodwill impairment test as of July 1, 
2023. As of the testing date, the balance of the Company’s goodwill was $269 million, which was allocated 
among four reporting units. All of the approximately $13 million of goodwill carried by one of the reporting 
units, a recycling services operation, related to the business acquisition that was completed in ﬁscal 2023. 
The Company elected to perform the qualitative assessment for this reporting unit and concluded that it was 
not more likely than not that the fair value of the reporting unit was less than its carrying value. The 
remaining $256 million of goodwill as of the testing date was allocated among three reporting units, which 
consist of two regional metals recycling operations and the Company's network of auto parts stores. Based 
primarily on the respective ﬁnancial and operational performance of each of these three reporting units and 
the Company overall, as well as the year-over-year decrease in the Company’s market capitalization as of 
the testing date, the Company elected to not perform the qualitative assessment and to proceed directly to 
the quantitative impairment test for goodwill allocated to the three reporting units to identify potential 
impairment and measure an impairment loss, if necessary. The quantitative impairment test entails 
estimating the fair value of each reporting unit with allocated goodwill and comparing it to the reporting 
unit’s carrying amount. The Company records the amount of goodwill impairment as the excess of a 
reporting unit’s carrying amount over its fair value, if any, not to exceed the total amount of goodwill 
allocated to that reporting unit.
The Company estimated the fair value of the two metals recycling reporting units and the autos reporting 
unit subject to the quantitative impairment test as of July 1, 2023 using an income approach based on the 
present value of expected future cash ﬂows, including terminal value, utilizing a market-based WACC 
determined separately for each reporting unit. The determination of fair value under this income approach 
involves the use of estimates and assumptions, including revenue growth rates driven by future ferrous and 
nonferrous commodity price and sales volume expectations, gross margins, selling, general, and 
administrative expense relative to total revenues, capital expenditures, working capital requirements, 
discount rate (WACC), tax rate, terminal growth rate, beneﬁts associated with a taxable transaction, and 
synergistic beneﬁts available to market participants. In addition, to corroborate each reporting unit’s income 
approach valuation, as well as to estimate the fair value of the Company’s other reporting units, including 
those with no allocated goodwill, the Company used a market approach based on earnings multiple data, 
and it performed a reconciliation of its estimate of the aggregate fair value of all reporting units to the 
Company’s market capitalization, including consideration of a control premium.
For one of the metals recycling reporting units and the autos reporting unit subject to the quantitative 
impairment test, the estimated fair value of the reporting unit exceeded its carrying amount by 
approximately 24% and 33%, respectively, as of July 1, 2023. For the other metals recycling reporting unit, 
the estimated fair value of the reporting unit was less than its carrying amount, resulting in a partial 
impairment of goodwill of $39 million. The projections used in the income approach for the metals recycling 
and autos reporting units took into consideration, as applicable, the impact of recent and current market 
conditions for ferrous and nonferrous recycled metals and retail auto parts, the cost of obtaining adequate 
supply ﬂows of scrap metal including end-of-life vehicles, and recent trends in production and other 
operating costs. The projections assumed a recovery of operating margins from the levels experienced 
around the time of the July 1, 2023 measurement date over a multi-year period. The WACC rate used in the 
income approach valuation for the two metals recycling reporting units was 13.68%, and the WACC rate used 
for the autos reporting unit was 13.62%. The terminal growth rate used for all three reporting units was 2%. 
A reporting-unit-speciﬁc risk premium is embedded in the WACC to reﬂect the perceived level of uncertainty 
inherent in each reporting unit's expected future cash ﬂows.
The Company reconciled its market capitalization to the aggregated estimated fair value of all reporting 
units, including consideration of a control premium representing the estimated amount a market participant 
would pay to obtain a controlling interest in the Company. The implied control premium resulting from the 
diﬀerence between (i) the Company's market capitalization (based on the average trading price of the 
Company's Class A common stock for the two-week period ended July 1, 2023) increased by the estimated 
fair value of noncontrolling interests and (ii) the higher aggregated estimated fair value of all reporting units 
was within the historical range of average and mean premiums observed for historical transactions within 
the steel-making, scrap processing, and metals industries. The Company identiﬁed speciﬁc reconciling 
items, including market participant synergies, tax amortization beneﬁts, and beneﬁts from in-process 
technology investments, which supported the implied control premium as of July 1, 2023.
79 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
The gross change in the carrying amount of goodwill for the years ended August 31, 2023 and 2022 was as 
follows (in thousands):
 
    Goodwill  
Balance as of September 1, 2021  $ 170,304 
Additions    84,040 
Measurement period adjustments    1,657 
Foreign currency translation adjustment    (803)
Balance as of August 31, 2022    255,198 
Additions    14,759 
Measurement period adjustments    (725)
Impairments    (39,270)
Foreign currency translation adjustment    (543)
Balance as of August 31, 2023  $ 229,419 
 
(1)Additions to goodwill in ﬁscal 2022 relate to the Columbus Recycling and Encore Recycling businesses acquired on October 1, 2021 and April 
29, 2022, respectively. Additions to goodwill in ﬁscal 2023 relate to the ScrapSource business acquired on November 18, 2022. All additions 
are presented exclusive of measurement period adjustments. See Note 7 - Business Acquisitions.
(2)Measurement period adjustments in ﬁscal 2022 relate to the acquired Columbus Recycling and Encore Recycling businesses. Measurement 
period adjustments in ﬁscal 2023 relate to the acquired ScrapSource and Encore Recycling businesses.
 
Accumulated goodwill impairment charges were $510 million as of August 31, 2023 and $471 million as of 
August 31, 2022.
Other Intangible Assets, net
The following table presents the Company’s other intangible assets as of August 31 (in thousands):
    2023    2022  
   Gross
Carrying 
Amount  Accumul
ated
Amortiza
tion   Net  Gross
Carrying
Amount  Accumul
ated
Amortiza
tion   Net 
Covenants not to 
compete  $ 8,756  $(4,796) $ 3,960  $ 7,780  $(4,442) $ 3,338 
Supplier relationships   31,299   (6,720)  24,579   20,924   (2,433)  18,491 
Customer relationships   3,846    (926)   2,920    3,626    (381)   3,245 
Indeﬁnite-lived 
intangibles    1,081    —    1,081    1,081    —    1,081 
Total $44,982  $(12,442) $32,540  $33,411  $(7,256) $26,155 
 
(1)Indeﬁnite-lived intangibles include previously acquired trade names and certain permits and licenses.
 
See Note 7 - Business Acquisitions for information regarding intangible assets acquired in business 
combinations during the years ended August 31, 2023 and 2022. Total intangible asset amortization expense 
was $6 million, $3 million, and $1 million for the years ended August 31, 2023, 2022, and 2021, respectively. 
There were no impairments of amortized intangible assets recognized in the periods presented.
The estimated amortization expense, based on current intangible asset balances, during the next ﬁve ﬁscal 
years and thereafter is as follows (in thousands):
 
Years Ending August 31,  Estimated
Amortization
Expense  
2024  $ 6,189 
2025    6,116 
2026    6,116 
2027    6,113 
2028    5,667 
Thereafter    1,258 
Total  $ 31,459 
 
80 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023(1)
(2)
(1)
(2)
(1)
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Note 9 - Debt
Debt consisted of the following as of August 31 (in thousands):
 
    2023    2022  
Bank revolving credit facilities, interest primarily at SOFR or LIBOR 
plus a spread  $ 230,000  $ 230,000 
Finance lease liabilities    7,200    5,894 
Other debt obligations    12,192    12,668 
Total debt    249,392    248,562 
Less current maturities    (5,813)   (6,041)
Debt, net of current maturities  $ 243,579  $ 242,521 
On August 22, 2022, the Company and certain of its subsidiaries entered into the Third Amendment to the 
Third Amended and Restated Credit Agreement (the “Amended Credit Agreement”), by and among Schnitzer 
Steel Industries, Inc., as the U.S. borrower, Schnitzer Steel Canada Ltd., as the Canadian borrower, Bank of 
America, N.A., as administrative agent, and other lenders party thereto, which amended and restated our 
previously existing credit agreement (the “Prior Credit Agreement”). The Amended Credit Agreement 
provides for $800 million and C$15 million in senior secured revolving credit facilities maturing in August 
2027. The $800 million credit facility includes a $50 million sublimit for letters of credit, a $25 million 
sublimit for swing line loans, and a $50 million sublimit for multicurrency borrowings. The Prior Credit 
Agreement provided for $700 million and C$15 million in senior secured credit facilities maturing in August 
2023. The Company incurred $2 million in debt issuance costs in connection with the Amended Credit 
Agreement, which are amortized to interest expense over the ﬁve-year term of the arrangement. 
Interest rates on outstanding indebtedness under the Amended Credit Agreement are based, at our option, 
on either the Secured Overnight Financing Rate (“SOFR”) (or the Canadian Dollar Oﬀered Rate, “CDOR” for C$ 
loans), plus a spread of between 1.25% and 2.00%, with the amount of the spread based on a pricing grid 
tied to our ratio of consolidated net funded debt to EBITDA (as deﬁned by the Amended Credit Agreement), 
or the greater of (a) the prime rate, (b) the federal funds rate plus 0.50% or (c) the daily rate equal to Term 
SOFR plus 1.00%, in each case, plus a spread of between 0.25% and 1.00% based on a pricing grid tied to our 
consolidated net funded debt to EBITDA ratio. In addition, commitment fees are payable on the unused 
portion of the credit facilities at rates between 0.175% and 0.30% based on a pricing grid tied to our ratio of 
consolidated net funded debt to EBITDA.
Interest rates on outstanding indebtedness under the Prior Credit Agreement were based, at our option, on 
either the London Interbank Oﬀered Rate (“LIBOR”) (or the Canadian equivalent for C$ loans), plus a spread 
of between 1.25% and 3.50%, with the amount of the spread based on a pricing grid tied to our ratio of 
consolidated funded debt to EBITDA (as deﬁned by the credit agreement), or the greater of (a) the prime 
rate, (b) the federal funds rate plus 0.50% or (c) the daily rate equal to one-month LIBOR plus 1.75%, in each 
case, plus a spread of between 0.00% and 2.50% based on a pricing grid tied to our consolidated funded debt 
to EBITDA ratio. In addition, commitment fees were payable on the unused portion of the credit facilities at 
rates between 0.20% and 0.50% based on a pricing grid tied to our ratio of consolidated funded debt to 
EBITDA.
As of both August 31, 2023 and 2022, borrowings outstanding under the credit facilities were $230 million. 
The weighted average interest rate on amounts outstanding under the credit facilities was 7.17% and 3.65% 
as of August 31, 2023 and 2022, respectively.
The credit agreement contains various representations and warranties, events of default, and ﬁnancial and 
other customary covenants which limit (subject to certain exceptions) the Company’s ability to, among other 
things, incur or suﬀer to exist certain liens, make investments, incur or guaranty additional indebtedness, 
enter into consolidations, mergers, acquisitions, and sales of assets, make distributions and other restricted 
payments, change the nature of the business, engage in transactions with aﬃliates, and enter into 
restrictive agreements, including agreements that restrict the ability of the subsidiaries to make 
distributions. As of August 31, 2023, the ﬁnancial covenants under the credit agreement included (a) a 
consolidated ﬁxed charge coverage ratio, deﬁned as the four-quarter rolling sum of consolidated EBITDA less 
deﬁned maintenance capital expenditures and certain environmental expenditures divided by consolidated 
ﬁxed charges and (b) a consolidated leverage ratio, deﬁned as consolidated funded indebtedness divided by 
the sum of consolidated net worth and consolidated funded indebtedness. The Company’s obligations under 
the credit agreement are guaranteed by substantially all of its subsidiaries. The credit facilities and the 
related guarantees are secured by senior ﬁrst priority liens on certain of the Company’s and its subsidiaries’ 
assets, including equipment, inventory, and accounts receivable.
81 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Other debt obligations, which totaled $12 million and $13 million as of August 31, 2023 and 2022, 
respectively, primarily relate to equipment purchases, the contract consideration for which includes an 
obligation to make future monthly payments to the vendor in the form of licensing fees. For accounting 
purposes, such obligations are treated as a partial ﬁnancing of the purchase price by the equipment vendor. 
Monthly payments commence when the equipment is placed in service and achieves speciﬁed minimum 
operating metrics, with payments continuing for a period of four years thereafter.
Principal payments on the Company’s bank revolving credit facilities and other debt obligations during the 
next ﬁve ﬁscal years and thereafter are as follows (in thousands):
 
Year Ending August 31,  Credit 
Facilities  Other Debt 
Obligations 
2024  $ —  $ 3,586 
2025    —    2,449 
2026    —    2,564 
2027    230,000    2,687 
2028    —    693 
Thereafter    —    213 
Total  $ 230,000  $ 12,192 
See Note 5 - Leases for additional disclosure on ﬁnance lease obligations, including payments during the 
next ﬁve ﬁscal years and thereafter. The Company maintains stand-by letters of credit to provide for certain 
obligations including workers’ compensation and performance bonds. The Company had $8 million 
outstanding under these arrangements as of both August 31, 2023 and 2022.
 
Note 10 - Commitments and Contingencies
Contingencies - Environmental
Changes in the Company’s environmental liabilities for the years ended August 31, 2023 and 2022 were as 
follows (in thousands):
 
Balance 
as of 
Septembe
r 1, 2021  Liabilities
Establish
ed
(Released
), Net  Payments 
and
Other  Ending 
Balance 
August 
31, 2022  Liabilities
Establish
ed
(Released
), Net  Payments 
and
Other  Ending 
Balance
August 
31, 2023  Current
Liability  Noncurre
nt 
Liability 
$77,128  $12,839  $(21,467) $68,500  $10,697  $(12,420) $66,777  $13,743  $53,034 
As of August 31, 2023 and 2022, the Company had environmental liabilities of $67 million and $69 million, 
respectively, for the potential remediation of locations where it has conducted business or has 
environmental liabilities from historical or recent activities. These liabilities relate to the investigation and 
potential remediation of waterways and soil and groundwater contamination and may also involve natural 
resource damages, governmental ﬁnes and penalties, and claims by third parties for personal injury and 
property damage. Except for Portland Harbor and certain liabilities discussed under “Other Legacy 
Environmental Loss Contingencies” below, such liabilities were not individually material at any site.
Portland Harbor
In December 2000, the Company was notiﬁed by the United States Environmental Protection Agency (“EPA”) 
under the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act (“CERCLA”) that it is one 
of the potentially responsible parties (“PRPs”) that own or operate or formerly owned or operated sites 
which are part of or adjacent to the Portland Harbor Superfund site (“Portland Harbor”).
The precise nature and extent of cleanup of any speciﬁc areas within Portland Harbor, the parties to be 
involved, the timing of any speciﬁc remedial action and the allocation of the costs for any cleanup among 
responsible parties have not yet been determined. The process of site investigation, remedy selection, 
identiﬁcation of additional PRPs, and allocation of costs has been underway for a number of years, but 
signiﬁcant uncertainties remain. It is unclear to what extent the Company will be liable for environmental 
costs or third-party contribution or damage claims with respect to Portland Harbor.
From 2000 to 2017, the EPA oversaw a remedial investigation/feasibility study (“RI/FS”) at Portland Harbor. 
The Company was not among the parties that performed the RI/FS, but it contributed to the costs through an 
interim settlement with the performing parties. The performing parties have indicated that they incurred 
more than $155 million in that eﬀort.
82 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
In January 2017, the EPA issued a Record of Decision (“ROD”) that identiﬁed the selected remedy for Portland 
Harbor. The EPA has estimated the total cost of the selected remedy at $1.7 billion with a net present value 
cost of $1.05 billion (at a 7% discount rate) and an estimated construction period of 13 years following 
completion of the remedial designs. In the ROD, the EPA stated that the cost estimate is an order-of-
magnitude engineering estimate that is expected to be within +50% to -30% of the actual project cost and 
that changes in the cost elements are likely to occur as a result of new information and data collected during 
the engineering design. Accordingly, the ﬁnal cost may diﬀer materially from that set forth in the ROD. The 
Company has identiﬁed a number of concerns regarding the remedy described in the ROD, which is based on 
data that is more than 15 years old, and the EPA’s estimates for the costs and time required to implement 
the selected remedy. Moreover, the ROD provided only Portland Harbor site-wide cost estimates and did not 
provide suﬃcient detail to estimate costs for speciﬁc sediment management areas within Portland Harbor. In 
addition, the ROD did not determine or allocate the responsibility for remediation costs among the PRPs.
In the ROD, the EPA acknowledged that much of the data was more than a decade old at that time and would 
need to be updated with a new round of “baseline” sampling to be conducted prior to the remedial design 
phase. The remedial design phase is an engineering phase during which additional technical information and 
data are collected, identiﬁed, and incorporated into technical drawings and speciﬁcations developed for the 
subsequent remedial action. Following issuance of the ROD, the EPA proposed that the PRPs, or a subgroup 
of PRPs, perform the additional investigative work in advance of remedial design.
In December 2017, the Company and three other PRPs entered into an Administrative Settlement Agreement 
and Order on Consent with the EPA to perform such pre-remedial design investigation and baseline sampling 
over a two-year period. The report analyzing the results concluded that Portland Harbor conditions have 
improved substantially since the data forming the basis of the ROD was collected. The EPA found with a few 
limited corrections that the new baseline data is of suitable quality and stated that such data will be used, in 
addition to existing and forthcoming design-level data, to inform implementation of the ROD. However, the 
EPA did not agree that the data or the analysis warranted a change to the remedy at this time and reaﬃrmed 
its commitment to proceed with remedial design. The Company and other PRPs disagree with the EPA’s 
position on use of the more recent data and will continue to pursue limited, but critical, changes to the 
selected remedy for Portland Harbor during the remedial design phase.
The EPA encouraged PRPs to step forward (individually or in groups) to enter into consent agreements to 
perform remedial design in various project areas covering Portland Harbor. While certain PRPs executed 
consent agreements for remedial design work, because of the EPA’s refusal to date to modify the remedy to 
reﬂect the most current data on Portland Harbor conditions and because of concerns with the terms of the 
consent agreement, the Company elected not to enter into a consent agreement. In April 2020, the EPA 
issued a unilateral administrative order (“UAO”) to the Company and MMGL, LLC (“MMGL”), an unaﬃliated 
company, for the remedial design work in a portion of Portland Harbor designated as the River Mile 3.5 East 
Project Area. As required by the UAO, the Company notiﬁed the EPA of its intent to comply while reserving 
all of its suﬃcient cause defenses. Failure to comply with a UAO, without suﬃcient cause, could subject the 
Company to signiﬁcant penalties or treble damages. Pursuant to the optimized remedial design timeline set 
forth in the UAO, the EPA’s expected schedule for completion of the remedial design work was four years. At 
the time it issued the UAO in April 2020, the EPA estimated the cost of the work at approximately $4 million. 
The Company has agreed with the other respondent to the UAO, MMGL, that the Company will lead the 
performance and be responsible for a portion of the costs of the work for remedial design under the UAO and 
also entered into an agreement with another PRP pursuant to which such other PRP has agreed to fund a 
portion of the costs of such work. These agreements are not an allocation of liability or claims associated 
with Portland Harbor as between the respondents or with respect to any third party. As of August 31, 2023 
and 2022, the Company had $1 million and $3 million, respectively, in environmental reserves related to this 
matter. The Company has insurance policies and Qualiﬁed Settlement Funds (“QSFs”) pursuant to which the 
Company is being reimbursed for the costs it has incurred for remedial design. See further discussion of the 
QSFs below in this Note. As of both August 31, 2023 and 2022, the Company had insurance and other 
receivables in the same amount as the environmental reserves for such remedial design work under the 
UAO. See “Other Assets” in Note 2 – Summary of Signiﬁcant Accounting Policies for further discussion of 
insurance and other related receivables. The Company also expects to pursue in the future allocation or 
contribution from other PRPs for a portion of such remedial design costs. In February 2021, the EPA 
announced that 100 percent of Portland Harbor’s areas requiring active cleanup are in the remedial design 
phase of the process.
Except for certain early action projects in which the Company is not involved, remediation activities at 
Portland Harbor are not expected to commence for a number of years. Moreover, those activities are 
expected to be sequenced, and the order and timing of such sequencing has not been determined. In 
addition, as noted above, the ROD does not determine the allocation of costs among PRPs.
The Company has joined with approximately 100 other PRPs, including the RI/FS performing parties, in a 
voluntary process to establish an allocation of costs at Portland Harbor, including the costs incurred in the 
RI/FS, ongoing remedial design costs, and future remedial action costs. The Company expects the next major 
stage of the allocation process to proceed in parallel with the remedial design process.
83 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
In addition to the remedial action process overseen by the EPA, the Portland Harbor Natural Resource Trustee 
Council (“Trustee Council”) is assessing natural resource damages at Portland Harbor. In 2008, the Trustee 
Council invited the Company and other PRPs to participate in funding and implementing the Natural 
Resource Injury Assessment for Portland Harbor. The Company and other participating PRPs ultimately 
agreed to fund the ﬁrst two phases of the three-phase assessment, which included the development of the 
Natural Resource Damage Assessment Plan (“AP”) and implementation of the AP to develop information 
suﬃcient to facilitate early settlements between the Trustee Council and Phase 2 participants and the 
identiﬁcation of restoration projects to be funded by the settlements. In late May 2018, the Trustee Council 
published notice of its intent to proceed with Phase 3, which will involve the full implementation of the AP 
and the ﬁnal injury and damage determination. The Company is proceeding with the process established by 
the Trustee Council regarding early settlements under Phase 2. The Company has established an 
environmental reserve of approximately $2.3 million for this alleged natural resource damages liability as it 
continues to work with the Trustee Council to ﬁnalize an early settlement. As of August 31, 2023 and 2022, 
the Company had a receivable in the same amount as the environmental reserve. See “Other Assets” in 
Note 2 – Summary of Signiﬁcant Accounting Policies for further discussion of insurance and other related 
receivables.
On January 30, 2017, one of the Trustees, the Confederated Tribes and Bands of the Yakama Nation, which 
withdrew from the council in 2009, ﬁled a suit against approximately 30 parties, including the Company, 
seeking reimbursement of certain past and future response costs in connection with remedial action at 
Portland Harbor and recovery of assessment costs related to natural resources damages from releases at 
and from Portland Harbor to the Multnomah Channel and the Lower Columbia River. The parties ﬁled various 
motions to dismiss or stay this suit, and in August 2019, the court issued an order denying the motions to 
dismiss and staying the action. The Company intends to defend against the claims in this suit and does not 
have suﬃcient information to determine the likelihood of a loss in this matter or to estimate the amount of 
damages being sought or the amount of such damages that could be allocated to the Company.
The Company’s environmental liabilities as of August 31, 2023 and 2022 included $5 million and $6 million, 
respectively, relating to the Portland Harbor matters described above.
Because the ﬁnal remedial actions have not yet been designed and there has not been a determination of 
the allocation among the PRPs of costs of the investigations or remedial action costs, the Company believes 
it is not possible to reasonably estimate the amount or range of costs which it is likely to or which it is 
reasonably possible that it will incur in connection with Portland Harbor, although such costs could be 
material to the Company’s ﬁnancial position, results of operations, cash ﬂows, and liquidity. Among the facts 
being evaluated are detailed information on the history of ownership of and the nature of the uses of and 
activities and operations performed on each property within Portland Harbor, which are factors that will play 
a substantial role in determining the allocation of investigation and remedy costs among the PRPs.
The Company has insurance policies that it believes will provide reimbursement for costs it incurs for 
defense, remediation, and mitigation for or settlement of natural resource damages claims in connection 
with Portland Harbor although there are no assurances that those policies will cover all the costs which the 
Company may incur. Most of these policies jointly insure the Company and MMGL, as the successor to a 
former subsidiary of the Company. The Company and MMGL have negotiated the settlement with certain 
insurers of claims against them related to Portland Harbor, continue to seek settlements with other insurers, 
and formed two QSFs which became operative in ﬁscal 2020 and the second quarter of ﬁscal 2023, 
respectively, to hold such settlement amounts until funds are needed to pay or reimburse costs incurred by 
the Company and MMGL in connection with Portland Harbor. These insurance policies and the funds in the 
QSFs may not cover all of the costs which the Company may incur. Each QSF is an unconsolidated variable 
interest entity (“VIE”) with no primary beneﬁciary. Two managers unrelated to each other, one appointed by 
the Company and one appointed by MMGL, share equally the power to direct the activities of each VIE that 
most signiﬁcantly impact its economic performance. The Company’s appointee to co-manage each VIE is an 
executive oﬃcer of the Company. Neither MMGL nor its appointee to co-manage each VIE is a related party 
of the Company for the purpose of the primary beneﬁciary assessment or otherwise.
The Oregon Department of Environmental Quality is separately providing oversight of investigations and 
source control activities by the Company at various sites adjacent to Portland Harbor that are focused on 
controlling any current “uplands” releases of contaminants into the Willamette River. The Company has 
accrued liabilities for source control and related work at two sites, reﬂecting estimated costs of primarily 
investigation and design, which costs have not been material in the aggregate to date. No liabilities have 
been established in connection with investigations for any other sites because the extent of contamination, 
required source control work, and the Company’s responsibility for the contamination and source control 
work, in each case if any, have not yet been determined. The Company believes that, pursuant to its 
insurance policies, it will be reimbursed for the costs it incurs for required source control evaluation and 
remediation work; however, the Company's insurance policies may not cover all the costs which the 
Company incurs. As of both August 31, 2023 and 2022, the Company had an insurance receivable in the 
same amount as the environmental reserve for such source control work.
84 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Other Legacy Environmental Loss Contingencies
The Company’s environmental loss contingencies as of August 31, 2023 and 2022, other than Portland 
Harbor, include actual or possible investigation and remediation costs from historical contamination at sites 
currently or formerly owned or formerly operated by the Company or at other sites where the Company may 
have responsibility for such costs due to past disposal or other activities (“legacy environmental loss 
contingencies”). These legacy environmental loss contingencies relate to the potential remediation of 
waterways and soil and groundwater contamination and may also involve natural resource damages, 
governmental ﬁnes and penalties, and claims by third parties for personal injury and property damage. The 
Company has been notiﬁed that it is or may be a potentially responsible party at certain of these sites, and 
investigation and remediation activities are ongoing or may be required in the future. The Company 
recognizes a liability for such matters when the loss is probable and can be reasonably estimated. When 
investigation, allocation, and remediation activities are ongoing or where the Company has not yet been 
identiﬁed as having responsibility or the contamination has not yet been identiﬁed, it is reasonably possible 
that the Company may need to recognize additional liabilities in connection with such sites but the Company 
cannot currently reasonably estimate the possible loss or range of loss absent additional information or 
developments. Such additional liabilities, individually or in the aggregate, may have a material adverse 
eﬀect on the Company’s results of operations, ﬁnancial condition, or cash ﬂows.
In ﬁscal 2018, the Company accrued $4 million for the estimated costs related to remediation of shredder 
residue disposed of in or around the 1970s at third-party sites located near each other. Investigation 
activities have been conducted under oversight of the applicable state regulatory agency. As of August 31, 
2023 and 2022, the Company had $4 million accrued for this matter. It is reasonably possible that the 
Company may recognize additional liabilities in connection with this matter at the time such losses are 
probable and can be reasonably estimated. The Company previously estimated a range of reasonably 
possible losses related to this matter in excess of current accruals at between zero and $28 million based on 
a range of remedial alternatives and subject to development and approval by regulators of speciﬁc remedy 
implementation plans. However, subsequent to the development of those remedial alternatives, the 
Company performed additional investigative activities under new state requirements that are likely to 
impact the required remedial actions and associated cost estimates, but the scope of such impacts and the 
amount or the range of the additional associated costs are not reasonably estimable at this time and are 
subject to further investigation, analysis, and discussion by the Company and regulators. The Company is 
investigating whether a portion or all of the current and future losses related to this matter, if incurred, are 
covered by existing insurance coverage or may be oﬀset by contributions from other responsible parties.
In addition, the Company’s loss contingencies as of August 31, 2023 and 2022 included $5 million and $8 
million, respectively, for the estimated costs related to environmental matters in connection with a closed 
facility owned and previously operated by an indirect, wholly-owned subsidiary, including monitoring and 
remediation of soil and groundwater conditions and funding for wellhead treatment facilities. In ﬁscal 2023, 
the Company accrued an incremental $7 million for certain soil remediation activities based on additional 
information related to estimated costs to complete. Investigation and remediation activities have been 
conducted under the oversight of the applicable state regulatory agency and are on-going, and the 
Company's subsidiary has also been working with state and local oﬃcials with respect to the protection of 
public and private water supplies. As part of its activities relating to the protection of public water supplies, 
the Company’s subsidiary agreed to reimburse the municipality for certain studies and plans and to provide 
funding for the construction and operation by the municipality of wellhead treatment facilities. It is 
reasonably possible that the Company may recognize additional liabilities in connection with this matter at 
the time such additional losses are probable and can be reasonably estimated. However, the Company 
cannot reasonably estimate at this time the possible additional loss or range of possible additional losses 
associated with this matter pending the on-going implementation of the approved remediation plans for soil 
and groundwater conditions and completion and operation of the wellhead treatment facilities.
In addition, the Company’s loss contingencies as of August 31, 2023 and 2022 included $10 million and $7 
million, respectively, for the estimated costs related to remediation of a site a portion of which was 
previously leased to and operated by an indirect, wholly-owned subsidiary. In connection with settlement of 
a lawsuit relating to allocation of the remediation costs, the Company’s subsidiary agreed to perform the 
remedial action related to metals contamination on the site initially estimated to cost approximately $7.9 
million, and another potentially liable party agreed to perform the remedial action related to creosote 
contamination at the site. As part of the settlement, other potentially liable parties agreed to make 
payments totaling approximately $7.6 million to fund the remediation of the metals contamination at the 
site in exchange for a release and indemnity. This amount was fully funded into a client trust account for the 
Company’s subsidiary in December 2020. See “Other Assets” in Note 2 - Summary of Signiﬁcant Accounting 
Policies for further discussion of this client trust account. In the fourth quarter of ﬁscal 2023, the Company 
increased its estimate of the cost to perform the remedial action by approximately $3 million. It is 
reasonably possible that the Company may recognize additional liabilities in connection with this matter at 
the time such additional losses are probable and can be reasonably estimated. The Company estimates the 
reasonably possible additional losses associated with this matter to range from zero to $10 million as of 
August 31, 2023, pending completion, approval, and implementation of the remediation action plan.
85 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Summary - Environmental Contingencies
With respect to environmental contingencies other than the Portland Harbor Superfund site and the Other 
Legacy Environmental Loss Contingencies, which are discussed separately above, management currently 
believes that adequate provision has been made for the potential impact of its environmental contingencies. 
Historically, the amounts the Company has ultimately paid for such remediation activities have not been 
material in any given period, but there can be no assurance that such amounts paid will not be material in 
the future.
Contingencies - Other
In addition to legal proceedings relating to the contingencies described above, the Company is a party to 
various legal proceedings arising in the normal course of business. The Company recognizes a liability for 
such matters when the loss is probable and can be reasonably estimated. The Company does not anticipate 
that the liabilities arising from such legal proceedings in the normal course of business, after taking into 
consideration expected insurance recoveries, will have a material adverse eﬀect on its results of operations, 
ﬁnancial condition, or cash ﬂows. 
86 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Note 11 - Accumulated Other Comprehensive Loss
The components of accumulated other comprehensive loss, net of tax, are as follows as of August 31, 2023, 
2022, and 2021 (in thousands):
 
   Foreign 
Currency
Translation
Adjustments  Cash Flow 
Hedges, net  Pension 
Obligations,
net    Total  
Balance as of September 1, 2020  $ (34,184) $ —  $ (2,687) $ (36,871)
Other comprehensive income (loss) before 
reclassiﬁcations    2,575    —    (530)   2,045 
Income tax beneﬁt    —    —    120    120 
Other comprehensive income (loss) before 
reclassiﬁcations,
   net of tax    2,575    —    (410)   2,165 
Amounts reclassiﬁed from accumulated 
other comprehensive loss    —    —    196    196 
Income tax beneﬁt    —    —    (44)   (44)
Amounts reclassiﬁed from accumulated 
other comprehensive loss,
   net of tax    —    —    152    152 
Net periodic other comprehensive income 
(loss)    2,575    —    (258)   2,317 
Balance as of August 31, 2021    (31,609)   —    (2,945)   (34,554)
Other comprehensive (loss) income before 
reclassiﬁcations    (3,070)   —    355    (2,715)
Income tax expense    —    —    (80)   (80)
Other comprehensive (loss) income before 
reclassiﬁcations,
   net of tax    (3,070)   —    275    (2,795)
Amounts reclassiﬁed from accumulated 
other comprehensive loss    —    —    336    336 
Income tax beneﬁt    —    —    (76)   (76)
Amounts reclassiﬁed from accumulated 
other comprehensive loss,
   net of tax    —    —    260    260 
Net periodic other comprehensive (loss) 
income    (3,070)   —    535    (2,535)
Balance as of August 31, 2022    (34,679)   —    (2,410)   (37,089)
Other comprehensive loss before 
reclassiﬁcations    (2,661)   (277)   (2)   (2,940)
Income tax beneﬁt    —    62    —    62 
Other comprehensive loss before 
reclassiﬁcations,
   net of tax    (2,661)   (215)   (2)   (2,878)
Amounts reclassiﬁed from accumulated 
other comprehensive loss    —    (115)   481    366 
Income tax expense (beneﬁt)    —    26    (108)   (82)
Amounts reclassiﬁed from accumulated 
other comprehensive loss,
   net of tax    —    (89)   373    284 
Net periodic other comprehensive (loss) 
income    (2,661)   (304)   371    (2,594)
Balance as of August 31, 2023  $ (37,340) $ (304) $ (2,039) $ (39,683)
Reclassiﬁcations from accumulated other comprehensive loss to earnings, both individually and in the 
aggregate, were not material to the impacted captions in the Consolidated Statements of Operations in all 
periods presented.
87 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Note 12 - Revenue
Disaggregation of Revenues
The table below illustrates the Company’s revenues disaggregated by major product and sales destination 
(in thousands):
    Year Ended August 31,  
    2023    2022    2021  
Major product information:             
Ferrous revenues  $ 1,439,983  $ 1,914,255  $ 1,557,891 
Nonferrous revenues    781,102    892,444    684,862 
Steel revenues    507,550    531,731    379,203 
Retail and other revenues    153,589    147,385    136,595 
Total revenues  $ 2,882,224  $ 3,485,815  $ 2,758,551 
Revenues based on sales destination:             
Foreign  $ 1,508,019  $ 1,925,235  $ 1,612,744 
Domestic    1,374,205    1,560,580    1,145,807 
Total revenues  $ 2,882,224  $ 3,485,815  $ 2,758,551 
 
 
(1)Steel revenues include predominantly sales of ﬁnished steel products, in addition to sales of semi-ﬁnished goods (billets) 
and steel manufacturing scrap.
In ﬁscal 2023, 2022, and 2021, the Company had no external customer that accounted for more than 10% of 
the Company’s consolidated revenues. Sales to customers located in foreign countries are a signiﬁcant part 
of the Company’s business. The schedule below identiﬁes those foreign countries to which the Company’s 
sales exceeded 10% of consolidated revenues in any of the last three years ended August 31 (in thousands):
 
   2023  % of
Revenue 2022   % of
Revenue  2021   % of
Revenue 
Bangladesh   N/A  N/A $446,385    13% $375,668    14%
 
N/A = Sales were less than the 10% threshold.
Receivables from Contracts with Customers
The revenue accounting standard deﬁnes a receivable as an entity’s right to consideration that is 
unconditional, meaning that only the passage of time is required before payment is due. As of August 31, 
2023 and 2022, receivables from contracts with customers, net of an allowance for credit losses, totaled 
$208 million and $230 million, respectively, representing 99% and 97%, respectively, of total accounts 
receivable reported in the Consolidated Balance Sheets as of each reporting date.
Contract Liabilities
Contract consideration received from a customer prior to revenue recognition is recorded as a contract 
liability and is recognized as revenue when the Company satisﬁes the related performance obligation under 
the terms of the contract. The Company’s contract liabilities, which consist almost entirely of customer 
deposits for recycled metal and ﬁnished steel sales contracts reported within accounts payable in the 
Consolidated Balance Sheets, totaled $7 million and $8 million as of August 31, 2023 and 2022, respectively. 
Unsatisﬁed performance obligations reﬂected in these contract liabilities relate to contracts with original 
expected durations of one year or less and, therefore, are not disclosed. The substantial majority of 
outstanding contract liabilities are reclassiﬁed to revenues within three months of the reporting date as a 
result of satisfying performance obligations. 
Note 13 - Employee Beneﬁts 
The Company and certain of its subsidiaries have or contribute to qualiﬁed and nonqualiﬁed retirement 
plans. These plans include a deﬁned beneﬁt pension plan, a supplemental executive retirement beneﬁt plan 
(“SERBP”), multiemployer pension plans, deﬁned contribution plans, and a deferred compensation plan.
88 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023(1)
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Deﬁned Beneﬁt Pension Plan and Supplemental Executive Retirement Beneﬁt Plan
The Company maintains a qualiﬁed deﬁned beneﬁt pension plan for certain nonunion employees. Eﬀective 
June 30, 2006, the Company froze this plan and ceased accruing further beneﬁts for employee service. The 
Company reﬂects the funded status of the deﬁned beneﬁt pension plan as a net asset or liability in its 
Consolidated Balance Sheets. Changes in its funded status are recognized in comprehensive income. The 
Company amortizes as a component of net periodic pension beneﬁt cost a portion of the net gain or loss 
reported within accumulated other comprehensive loss if the beginning-of-year net gain or loss exceeds 5% 
of the greater of the beneﬁt obligation or the market value of plan assets. Net periodic pension beneﬁt cost 
was not material for each of the ﬁscal years presented in this report. The fair value of plan assets was $15 
million and $16 million as of August 31, 2023 and 2022, respectively, and the projected beneﬁt obligation 
was $11 million and $12 million as of August 31, 2023 and 2022, respectively. The plan was fully funded with 
the plan assets exceeding the projected beneﬁt obligation by $4 million as of both August 31, 2023 and 
2022. Under the fair value hierarchy, plan assets comprised Level 1 and Level 2 investments as of August 
31, 2023 and 2022. Level 1 investments are valued based on quoted market prices of identical securities in 
the principal market. Level 2 investments are corporate bonds valued at the yields currently available on 
comparable securities of issuers with similar credit ratings. No signiﬁcant contributions are expected to be 
made to the deﬁned beneﬁt pension plan in the future; however, changes in the discount rate or actual 
investment returns that are lower than the long-term expected return on plan assets could result in the need 
for the Company to make additional contributions. The assumed discount rate used to calculate the 
projected beneﬁt obligation was 5.13% and 4.40% as of August 31, 2023 and 2022, respectively. The 
Company estimates future annual beneﬁt payments to be between $1 million and $4 million per year.
The Company also has a nonqualiﬁed SERBP for certain executives. A restricted trust fund has been 
established with assets invested in life insurance policies that can be used for plan beneﬁts, although the 
fund is subject to claims of the Company’s general creditors. The trust fund is included in other assets, the 
current portion of the pension liability is included in other accrued liabilities, and the noncurrent portion of 
the pension liability is included in other long-term liabilities in the Company’s Consolidated Balance Sheets. 
The trust fund was valued at $4 million as of each August 31, 2023 and 2022. The trust fund assets’ gains 
and losses are included in other loss, net in the Company’s Consolidated Statements of Operations. The 
beneﬁt obligation was $4 million as of each of August 31, 2023 and 2022. Net periodic pension beneﬁt cost 
under the SERBP was not material for each of the ﬁscal years presented in this report.
Because the deﬁned beneﬁt pension plan and the SERBP are not material to the Consolidated Financial 
Statements, other disclosures required by U.S. GAAP have been omitted.
Multiemployer Pension Plans
The Company contributes to 14 multiemployer pension plans in accordance with its collective bargaining 
agreements. Multiemployer pension plans are deﬁned beneﬁt plans sponsored by multiple employers in 
accordance with one or more collective bargaining agreements. The plans are jointly managed by trustees 
that include representatives from both management and labor unions. Contributions to the plans are made 
based upon a ﬁxed rate per hour worked and are agreed to by contributing employers and the unions in 
collective bargaining. Beneﬁt levels are set by a joint board of trustees based on the advice of an 
independent actuary regarding the level of beneﬁts that agreed-upon contributions can be expected to 
support. To the extent that the pension obligation of other participating employers is unfunded, the Company 
may be required to make additional contributions in the future to fund these obligations.
One of the multiemployer plans that the Company contributes to is the Steelworkers Western Independent 
Shops Pension Plan (“WISPP,” EIN 90-0169564, Plan No. 001) beneﬁting the union employees of the 
Company’s steel manufacturing operations, which are covered by a collective bargaining agreement that 
will expire on March 31, 2026. As of October 1, 2022, the WISPP was certiﬁed by the plan’s actuaries as being 
in the Green Zone, as deﬁned by the Pension Protection Act of 2006. The Company contributed $4 million to 
the WISPP for each of the years ended August 31, 2023, 2022, and 2021. These contributions represented 
more than 5% of total contributions to the WISPP for each year.
Company contributions to all of the multiemployer plans totaled $7 million, $7 million, and $6 million for the 
years ended August 31, 2023, 2022, and 2021, respectively.
Deﬁned Contribution Plans
The Company has several deﬁned contribution plans covering certain employees. Company contributions to 
the deﬁned contribution plans totaled $6 million, $5 million, and $4 million for the years ended August 31, 
2023, 2022, and 2021, respectively. 
89 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Deferred Compensation Plan
In ﬁscal 2021, the Company established a non-qualiﬁed deferred compensation plan (the “DCP”) which 
permits eligible employees to elect to defer receipt of compensation including salary, bonuses, and certain 
equity awards made under the Company’s long-term incentive plan. The DCP also allows the Company to 
make discretionary contributions to participant accounts that may be subject to one or more vesting 
schedules. Participant contributions, excluding equity awards subject to vesting conditions, are fully vested 
at all times. The deferred compensation liability as of August 31, 2023 and 2022 was $4 million and $1 
million, respectively, consisted entirely of deferred salary and bonuses, and was substantially all noncurrent 
and classiﬁed within other long-term liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. The Company maintains 
a rabbi trust to fund obligations under the DCP. The carrying value of assets held in the rabbi trust, which 
comprise company-owned life insurance policies, substantially equaled the deferred compensation liability 
as of both August 31, 2023 and 2022. The rabbi trust asset is classiﬁed within other assets on the 
Consolidated Balance Sheets.
 
Note 14 - Share-Based Compensation
The Company’s 1993 Stock Incentive Plan, as amended (the “SIP”), was established to provide for the grant 
of stock-based compensation awards to its employees, consultants, and directors. The SIP authorizes the 
grant of restricted shares, restricted stock units, performance-based awards including performance share 
awards, stock options, and stock appreciation rights, and other stock-based awards. The SIP is administered 
by the Compensation Committee of the Company’s Board of Directors (“Compensation Committee”). There 
are 12.2 million shares of Class A common stock reserved for issuance under the SIP, of which 2.0 million 
were available for future grants as of August 31, 2023. Share-based compensation expense recognized in 
cost of goods sold or selling, general, and administrative expense, as applicable, was $11 million, $19 
million, and $18 million for the years ended August 31, 2023, 2022, and 2021, respectively.
Restricted Stock Units (“RSUs”)
During the years ended August 31, 2023, 2022, and 2021, the Compensation Committee granted 213,080, 
160,312, and 317,760 RSUs, respectively, to the Company’s key employees under the SIP. RSUs generally 
vest 20% per year over ﬁve years commencing October 31 of the year after grant. Each RSU entitles the 
recipient to receive one share of Class A common stock upon vesting.
The estimated fair value of an RSU is based on the market closing price of the underlying Class A common 
stock on the date of grant. The weighted average grant date fair value of RSUs granted was $31.80, $52.32, 
and $22.26 per unit for the years ended August 31, 2023, 2022, and 2021, respectively. The total estimated 
fair value of RSUs granted was $7 million, $8 million, and $7 million for the years ended August 31, 2023, 
2022, and 2021, respectively. For RSUs granted in each of these ﬁscal years, the compensation cost is 
recognized over the requisite service period of the awards, net of forfeitures, which for participants who 
were retirement eligible as of the grant date or who will become retirement eligible during the ﬁve-year 
term of the award is the longer of two years or the period ending on the date retirement eligibility is 
achieved. 
A summary of the Company’s RSU activity for the year ended August 31, 2023 is as follows:
 
   Number of 
Units
 (in thousands)  Weighted 
Average
Grant Date
Fair Value  
Outstanding as of August 31, 2022    813  $ 26.59 
Granted    213  $ 31.80 
Vested    (270) $ 25.17 
Forfeited    (42) $ 28.61 
Outstanding as of August 31, 2023    714  $ 28.57 
The total fair value of RSUs that vested, based on the market closing price of the underlying Class A 
common stock on the vesting date, was $7 million, $15 million, and $10 million for the years ended August 
31, 2023, 2022, and 2021, respectively. As of August 31, 2023, total unrecognized compensation costs 
related to unvested RSUs amounted to $8 million, which is expected to be recognized over a weighted 
average period of two years.
90 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Performance Share Awards
The SIP authorizes performance-based awards to certain employees subject to certain conditions and 
restrictions. Vesting is subject to both the continued employment of the participant with the Company and 
the achievement of certain performance goals established by the Compensation Committee. A participant 
generally must be employed by the Company on October 31 following the end of the performance period to 
receive an award payout. However, adjusted awards are paid if employment terminates earlier on account 
of a qualifying employment termination event such as death, disability, retirement, termination without 
cause after the ﬁrst year of the performance period, or a sale of the Company.
In recent years, the performance share awards have comprised two separate and distinct awards with 
diﬀerent vesting conditions. Awards vest if the threshold level under the speciﬁed metric is met at the end of 
the approximately three-year performance period. For awards granted in ﬁscal 2023 and 2022, the 
performance metrics are the Company’s recycled metal volume growth and its return on capital employed 
(“ROCE”). Award share payouts depend on the extent to which the performance goals have been achieved, 
which performance-based payout factors are adjusted by a total shareholder return (“TSR”) modiﬁer based 
on the Company’s average TSR percentile rank relative to a designated peer group. The number of shares 
that a participant receives is equal to the number of performance shares granted multiplied by an initial 
payout factor based on recycled metal volume growth and ROCE, which ranges from a threshold of 50% to a 
maximum of 200%. The ﬁnal payout factor is then determined by applying the TSR modiﬁer to the initial 
payout factor within a certain range, with a maximum increase or decrease of 20%.
For awards granted in ﬁscal 2021, the performance metrics are the Company’s TSR relative to a designated 
peer group and the Company’s ROCE. Award share payouts depend on the extent to which the performance 
goals have been achieved. The number of shares that a participant receives is equal to the award granted 
multiplied by a payout factor, which ranges from a threshold of 50% to a maximum of 200%. The TSR 
awards granted in ﬁscal 2021 stipulate certain limitations to the payout in the event the payout reaches a 
deﬁned ceiling level or the Company’s TSR is negative.
The Company estimates the fair value of performance share awards with a TSR market condition using a 
Monte-Carlo simulation model utilizing several key assumptions, including the following for such awards 
granted during the years ended August 31:
 
    2023    2022    2021  
Expected share price volatility (Radius)    56.1%   51.6%   48.5%
Expected share price volatility (Peer group)    60.5%   58.5%   54.9%
Expected correlation to peer group companies    48.1%   46.0%   44.5%
Risk-free rate of return    4.16%   0.61%   0.23%
The fair value of the ROCE awards granted in ﬁscal 2021, which awards do not have a TSR market condition, 
is based on the market closing price of the underlying Class A common stock on the grant date.
All the performance share awards granted in ﬁscal 2023 and 2022 have a non-market performance condition 
(either recycled metal volume growth or ROCE) in addition to a market condition (TSR modiﬁer), and the 
ROCE awards granted in ﬁscal 2021 have only a non-market performance condition. The Company accrues 
compensation cost for these performance share awards based on the probable outcome of achieving the 
speciﬁed performance conditions, net of estimated forfeitures, over the requisite service period (or to the 
date a qualifying employment termination event entitles the recipient to a prorated award, if before the end 
of the service period). The Company reassesses whether achievement of the performance conditions is 
probable at each reporting date. If it is probable that the actual performance results will exceed the stated 
target performance conditions, the Company accrues additional compensation cost for the additional 
performance shares to be awarded. If, upon reassessment, it is no longer probable that the actual 
performance results will exceed the stated target performance conditions, or that it is no longer probable 
that the target performance conditions will be achieved, the Company reverses any recognized 
compensation cost for shares no longer probable of being issued. If the performance conditions are not 
achieved at the end of the performance period, all related compensation cost previously recognized is 
reversed.
The compensation cost for the TSR awards granted in ﬁscal 2021 based on the grant-date fair value, net of 
estimated forfeitures, is recognized over the requisite service period (or to the date a qualifying 
employment termination event entitles the recipient to a prorated award, if before the end of the service 
period), regardless of whether the market condition has been or will be satisﬁed.
During the years ended August 31, 2023, 2022, and 2021, the Compensation Committee granted a total of 
211,046 (105,523 recycled metal volume growth with TSR modiﬁer and 105,523 ROCE with TSR modiﬁer), 
153,080 (76,540 recycled metal volume growth with TSR modiﬁer and 76,540 ROCE with TSR modiﬁer), and 
316,649 (157,791 TSR and 158,858 ROCE) performance share awards, 
91 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
respectively. The weighted average grant date fair value per share of performance share awards granted 
was $32.10, $54.29, and $22.33 for the years ended August 31, 2023, 2022, and 2021, respectively.
A summary of the Company’s performance-based awards activity for the year ended August 31, 2023 is as 
follows:
 
   Number of 
Awards
(in thousands)  Weighted 
Average
Grant Date
Fair Value  
Outstanding as of August 31, 2022    782  $ 28.16 
Granted    211  $ 32.10 
Performance achievement    171  $ 20.98 
Vested    (487) $ 21.20 
Forfeited    (50) $ 34.20 
Outstanding as of August 31, 2023    627  $ 32.44 
 
(1)Reﬂects the net number of awards achieved above target levels based on actual performance measured at the end of 
the performance period.
The total fair value of performance share awards which vested, based on the market closing price of the 
Company’s Class A common stock on the vesting date, was $13 million, $14 million, and $7 million for the 
years ended August 31, 2023, 2022, and 2021, respectively. As of August 31, 2023, total unrecognized 
compensation costs related to unvested performance share awards amounted to $4 million, which is 
expected to be recognized over a weighted average period of two years.
Deferred Stock Units (“DSUs”)
The Deferred Compensation Plan for Non-Employee Directors (“DSU Plan”) provides for the issuance of DSUs 
to non-employee directors to be granted under the DSU Plan. Each DSU gives the director the right to receive 
one share of Class A common stock at a future date. Immediately following the annual meeting of 
shareholders, each non-employee director receives DSUs which become fully vested on the day before the 
next annual meeting, subject to continued service on the Board. The compensation cost associated with the 
DSUs granted is recognized over the requisite service period of the awards.
The Company issues Class A common stock to a director pursuant to vested DSUs in a lump sum in January 
of the ﬁrst year after the director ceases to be a director of the Company, subject to the right of the director 
to elect an installment payment program under the DSU Plan.
DSUs with vesting conditions granted during the years ended August 31, 2023, 2022, and 2021 totaled 
21,438 units, 20,876 units, and 28,042 units, respectively. The compensation cost associated with DSUs and 
the total value of shares vested during each of these ﬁscal years, as well as the unrecognized compensation 
cost as of August 31, 2023, were not material.
 
Note 15 - Derivative Financial Instruments
Interest Rate Swaps
The Company is exposed to interest rate risk on its debt and may enter interest rate swap contracts to 
eﬀectively manage the impact of interest rate changes on its outstanding debt, which has predominantly 
ﬂoating interest rates. The Company does not enter interest rate swap transactions for trading or speculative 
purposes. 
During the ﬁscal year ended August 31, 2023, the Company entered three pay-ﬁxed interest rate swap 
transactions, each with a diﬀerent major ﬁnancial institution counterparty and designated as a cash ﬂow 
hedge, to hedge the variability in interest cash ﬂows associated with the Company’s variable-rate loans 
under its bank revolving credit facilities. The interest rate swaps involve the receipt of variable-rate 
amounts from the counterparty in exchange for the Company making ﬁxed-rate payments over the life of 
the agreement without exchange of the underlying notional amount. These contracts mature in August 2026. 
As of August 31, 2023, the total notional amount of these interest rate swaps was $150 million. The fair 
values of the interest rate swaps are based upon inputs corroborated by observable market data which is 
considered Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy.
The fair value of derivative instruments in the Consolidated Balance Sheet as of August 31, 2023 is as 
follows (in thousands):
 (1)
92 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
  Asset (Liability) Derivatives  
  Balance Sheet Location  August 31, 2023 
Interest rate swap contracts Prepaid expenses and other current assets  $ 1,163 
Interest rate swap contracts Other long-term liabilities    (1,555)
See Note 11 - Accumulated Other Comprehensive Loss for tabular presentation of the eﬀects of interest rate 
swap derivative cash ﬂow hedges on other comprehensive income. All related cash ﬂow hedge amounts 
reclassiﬁed from accumulated other comprehensive income (“AOCI”) were recorded in interest expense on 
the Consolidated Statement of Operations for the year ended August 31, 2023, which reclassiﬁed amounts 
totaled less than $1 million. Total interest expense was $19 million for the year ended August 31, 2023. 
There was no hedge ineﬀectiveness with respect to the Company’s interest rate swap cash ﬂow hedges for 
the year ended August 31, 2023.
 
Note 16 - Income Taxes
(Loss) income from continuing operations before income taxes was as follows for the years ended August 31 
(in thousands):
 
   2023   2022   2021  
United States  $ (32,541) $204,150  $195,037 
Foreign    4,465    12,526    12,952 
Total  $ (28,076) $216,676  $207,989 
 
Income tax (beneﬁt) expense from continuing operations consisted of the following for the years ended 
August 31 (in thousands):
   2023   2022   2021  
Current:                
Federal  $ (377) $ 18,114  $ 27,244 
State    974    1,392    3,811 
Foreign    590    39    (4)
Total current tax expense    1,187    19,545    31,051 
Deferred:             
Federal    (4,198)   21,771    6,939 
State    (686)   780    (547)
Foreign    950    2,501    492 
Total deferred tax (beneﬁt) expense    (3,934)   25,052    6,884 
Total income tax (beneﬁt) expense  $ (2,747) $ 44,597  $ 37,935 
 
93 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
A reconciliation of the diﬀerence between the federal statutory rate and the Company’s eﬀective tax rate for 
the years ended August 31 is as follows:
 
   2023   2022   2021  
Federal statutory rate    21.0%   21.0%   21.0%
State taxes, net of credits    5.0    1.6    1.4 
Foreign income taxed at diﬀerent rates    (1.2)   —    (0.5)
Valuation allowance on deferred tax assets    (6.1)   0.4    (1.0)
Federal rate change    —    —    0.4 
Non-deductible oﬃcers’ compensation    (7.8)   2.5    1.2 
Other non-deductible expenses    (1.6)   0.3    0.4 
Noncontrolling interests    0.3    (0.3)   (0.5)
Research and development credits    6.4    (0.9)   (1.5)
Tax return to provision adjustment    (1.2)   (2.4)   — 
Unrecognized tax beneﬁts    (8.5)   1.2    0.9 
Interest income    1.4    (0.1)   (0.1)
Excess tax beneﬁt from stock-based compensation    3.2    (1.6)   (0.2)
Foreign derived intangible income    —    (1.0)   (2.5)
Other    (1.1)   (0.1)   (0.8)
Eﬀective tax rate    9.8%   20.6%   18.2%
 
Eﬀective Tax Rate
The Company’s eﬀective tax rate from continuing operations for ﬁscal 2023 was a beneﬁt on pre-tax loss of 
9.8%, compared to an expense on pre-tax income of 20.6% and 18.2% for ﬁscal 2022 and 2021, respectively. 
The Company’s eﬀective tax rate from continuing operations for ﬁscal 2023 was lower than the U.S. federal 
statutory rate of 21% primarily due to the aggregate eﬀect of the relatively low absolute level of pre-tax 
earnings, permanent diﬀerences from non-deductible expenses, and unrecognized tax beneﬁts. The 
Company's eﬀective tax rate from continuing operations for ﬁscal 2022 approximated the U.S. federal 
statutory rate of 21%, reﬂecting tax beneﬁts from vesting of share-based awards, the foreign derived 
intangible income (“FDII”) deduction, and research and development credits, oﬀset by the aggregate impact 
of state taxes and permanent diﬀerences from non-deductible expenses. The Company's eﬀective tax rate 
from continuing operations for ﬁscal 2021 was lower than the U.S. federal statutory rate of 21% primarily 
due to the beneﬁt from the FDII deduction, the impact of research and development credits, and the release 
of the valuation allowance against Puerto Rico deferred tax assets.
Inﬂation Reduction Act
On August 16, 2022, the Inﬂation Reduction Act of 2022 (“IRA”) was signed into law, which included the 
introduction of a new 15% Corporate Alternative Minimum Tax (“CAMT”), as well as a 1% excise tax on 
corporate share repurchases. The Company does not meet the threshold to be subject to the CAMT, and 
there were no other impacts of the IRA to the Company in ﬁscal 2023 or 2022.
94 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Deferred Tax Assets and Liabilities
Deferred tax assets and liabilities comprised the following as of August 31 (in thousands):
    2023    2022  
Deferred tax assets:         
Operating lease liabilities  $ 17,605  $ 17,901 
Amortizable goodwill and other intangibles    13,488    9,914 
Employee beneﬁt accruals    8,772    12,241 
Net operating loss carryforwards    20,280    7,499 
Environmental liabilities    10,109    9,742 
Other contingencies    5,579    5,199 
State credit carryforwards    7,711    7,212 
Inventory valuation methods    2,508    2,749 
Other    7,193    3,687 
Valuation allowances    (17,042)   (15,342)
Total deferred tax assets    76,203    60,802 
Deferred tax liabilities:         
Accelerated depreciation and other basis diﬀerences    61,938    60,539 
Operating lease right-of-use assets    17,573    17,353 
Investment in operating partnerships    25,769    15,553 
Prepaid expense acceleration and other    6,827    6,087 
Total deferred tax liabilities    112,107    99,532 
Net deferred tax liabilities  $ (35,904) $ (38,730)
As of August 31, 2023, deferred tax assets related to U.S. federal operating loss carryforwards were $11 
million with no expiration period, and deferred tax assets related to state operating loss carryforwards were 
$9 million, the majority of which had a valuation allowance. State operating loss carryforwards will expire if 
not used in various years beginning in 2023. State credit carryforwards will expire if not used between 2023 
and 2037.
Valuation Allowances
The Company assesses the realizability of its deferred tax assets on a quarterly basis through an analysis of 
potential sources of future taxable income, including prior year taxable income available to absorb a 
carryback of tax losses, reversals of existing taxable temporary diﬀerences, tax planning strategies, and 
forecasts of taxable income. The Company considers all negative and positive evidence, including the 
weight of the evidence, to determine if valuation allowances against deferred tax assets are required. In 
ﬁscal 2021, the Company released the valuation allowance against its Puerto Rican deferred tax assets 
resulting in a discrete tax beneﬁt of $2 million. The release of this valuation allowance was the result of 
suﬃcient positive evidence at the time, including cumulative income in the Company’s Puerto Rico tax 
jurisdiction in recent years and projections of future taxable income based primarily on the Company's 
improved ﬁnancial performance, that it is more-likely-than-not that the deferred tax assets will be realized. 
The Company continues to maintain valuation allowances against certain state and Canadian deferred tax 
assets. Canadian deferred tax assets against which the Company continues to maintain a valuation 
allowance relate to indeﬁnite-lived assets.
Accounting for Uncertainty in Income Taxes
The following table summarizes the activity related to the Company’s reserve for unrecognized tax beneﬁts, 
excluding interest and penalties, for the years ended August 31 (in thousands):
 
   2023   2022   2021  
Unrecognized tax beneﬁts, as of the beginning of the year $ 10,326  $ 8,320  $ 7,456 
Additions (reductions) for tax positions of prior years    281    1,055    (574)
Additions for tax positions of the current year    1,223    974    1,486 
Reductions for lapse of statutes    —    (23)   (48)
Unrecognized tax beneﬁts, as of the end of the year  $ 11,830  $ 10,326  $ 8,320 
 
95 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
The Company anticipates an immaterial impact on earnings from releases from the reserve in the next 12 
months. The recognized amount of tax-related penalties and interest was not material for each of the ﬁscal 
years presented in this report.
The Company ﬁles federal and state income tax returns in the U.S. and foreign tax returns in Puerto Rico and 
Canada. For U.S. federal income tax returns, ﬁscal years 2014 to 2022 remain subject to examination under 
the statute of limitations.
Note 17 - Net (Loss) Income Per Share
The following table sets forth the information used to compute basic and diluted net (loss) income per share 
attributable to Radius shareholders for the years ended August 31 (in thousands):
   2023   2022   2021  
(Loss) income from continuing operations  $ (25,329) $172,079  $170,054 
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests    (353)   (3,196)   (4,863)
(Loss) income from continuing operations attributable to 
Radius shareholders    (25,682)  168,883   165,191 
Loss from discontinued operations, net of tax    (109)   (83)   (79)
Net (loss) income attributable to Radius shareholders  $ (25,791) $168,800  $165,112 
Computation of shares:             
Weighted average common shares outstanding, basic    28,008    28,084    27,982 
Incremental common shares attributable to dilutive 
performance share, RSU and DSU awards    —    1,445    1,211 
Weighted average common shares outstanding, diluted   28,008    29,529    29,193 
Common stock equivalent shares of 698,847 and 113,005 were considered antidilutive and were excluded 
from the calculation of diluted net (loss) income per share attributable to Radius shareholders for the years 
ended August 31, 2023 and  2022, respectively. No common stock equivalent shares were considered 
antidilutive for the year ended August 31, 2021.
Note 18 - Related Party Transactions
The Company purchases recycled metal from its joint venture operation at prices that approximate fair 
market value. These purchases totaled $18 million, $26 million, and $20 million for the years ended August 
31, 2023, 2022, and 2021, respectively.
96 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of 
ContentsSCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS RECYCLING  
 
Schedule II – Valuation and Qualifying Accounts
For the Years Ended August 31, 2023, 2022, and 2021
(In thousands)
 
Column A  Column B  Column C  Column 
D   Column E 
Description  Balance 
at
Beginnin
g
of Period  Charges
to Cost 
and 
Expenses  Deductio
ns   Balance 
at
End of
Period 
Fiscal 2023                 
Allowance for credit losses  $ 1,550  $ 311  $ (271) $ 1,590 
Deferred tax valuation allowance  $15,342  $ 1,873  $ (173) $17,042 
Fiscal 2022                 
Allowance for credit losses  $ 1,566  $ 40  $ (56) $ 1,550 
Deferred tax valuation allowance  $14,522  $ 2,326  $(1,506) $15,342 
Fiscal 2021                 
Allowance for doubtful accounts  $ 1,593  $ —  $ (27) $ 1,566 
Deferred tax valuation allowance  $16,933  $ 482  $(2,893) $14,522 
 
 
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
ITEM 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND 
FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE
None.
ITEM 9A. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES
Disclosure Controls and Procedures
The Company maintains disclosure controls and procedures (as deﬁned in Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e) of 
the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the “Exchange Act”)) that are designed to ensure that 
information required to be disclosed by the Company in the reports that it ﬁles or submits under the 
Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized, and reported within the time periods speciﬁed by the 
Securities and Exchange Commission’s rules and forms and that such information is accumulated and 
communicated to management, including the Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer, as 
appropriate, to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosures. Any controls and procedures, no 
matter how well designed and operated, can only provide reasonable assurance of achieving the desired 
control objectives. The Company’s management, with the participation of the Chief Executive Oﬃcer and 
Chief Financial Oﬃcer, has completed an evaluation of the eﬀectiveness of the design and operation of the 
Company's disclosure controls and procedures. Consistent with guidance issued by the Securities and 
Exchange Commission that an assessment of internal controls over ﬁnancial reporting of a recently acquired 
business may be omitted from management's evaluation of disclosure controls and procedures, 
management is excluding an assessment of the internal controls of the ScrapSource business, which the 
Company acquired on November 18, 2022, from its evaluation of the eﬀectiveness of the Company’s 
disclosure controls and procedures. The ScrapSource business represented less than 2% of consolidated total 
assets and less than 1% of consolidated total revenues as of and for the year ended August 31, 2023. Based 
on this evaluation, the Company’s Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer have concluded that, as 
of August 31, 2023, the Company’s disclosure controls and procedures were eﬀective at the reasonable 
assurance level.
Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting is presented within Part II, Item 8 
of this report and is incorporated herein by reference.
Changes in Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
There was no change in the Company’s internal control over ﬁnancial reporting (as that term is deﬁned in 
Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f) under the Exchange Act) during its most recent ﬁscal quarter that has 
materially aﬀected, or is reasonably likely to materially aﬀect, the Company’s internal control over ﬁnancial 
reporting.
ITEM 9B. OTHER INFORMATION
During the three months ended August 31, 2023, none of the Company's directors or oﬃcers (as deﬁned in 
Rule 16a-1(f) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended), adopted, terminated, or modiﬁed a Rule 
10b5-1 trading arrangement or non-Rule 10b5-1 trading arrangement (as such terms are deﬁned in Item 408 
of Regulation S-K of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended).
ITEM 9C. DISCLOSURE REGARDING FOREIGN JURISDICTIONS THAT PREVENT INSPECTIONS
Not applicable.
98 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
PART III
ITEM 10. DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS, AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE
Information required by Item 401 of Regulation S-K regarding directors, and information required by Items 
407(c)(3), 407(d)(4), and 407(d)(5) of Regulation S-K, will be included under “Election of Directors” and 
“Corporate Governance” in the Company’s Proxy Statement for its 2024 Annual Meeting of Shareholders and 
is incorporated herein by reference.
Information regarding executive oﬃcers is included in “Executive Oﬃcers of the Company” in Part I, Item 1. 
Business of this Form 10-K as permitted by General Instruction G(3).
Code of Ethics
On January 25, 2023, the Board of Directors approved a revised Company’s Code of Conduct that is 
applicable to all of its directors and employees. This document is posted under the caption “About Us – 
Culture – Ethics & Code of Conduct” on the Company’s internet website (www.radiusrecycling.com) and is 
available free of charge by calling the Company or submitting a request to ir@rdus.com. The Company 
intends to satisfy its disclosure obligations with respect to any amendments to or waivers of the Code of 
Conduct for directors, executive oﬃcers, or Senior Financial Oﬃcers by posting such information on its 
internet website set forth above rather than by ﬁling a Form 8-K.
ITEM 11. EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION
Information required by this Item 11 is incorporated herein by reference to our deﬁnitive proxy statement for 
our 2024 Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be ﬁled pursuant to Regulation 14A under the Exchange Act.
ITEM 12. SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND 
RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS
Information required by this Item 12 is incorporated herein by reference to our deﬁnitive proxy statement for 
our 2024 Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be ﬁled pursuant to Regulation 14A under the Exchange Act.
ITEM 13. CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS, AND DIRECTOR 
INDEPENDENCE
Information required by this Item 13 is incorporated herein by reference to our deﬁnitive proxy statement for 
our 2024 Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be ﬁled pursuant to Regulation 14A under the Exchange Act.
ITEM 14. PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTANT FEES AND SERVICES
Information required by this Item 14 is incorporated herein by reference to our deﬁnitive proxy statement for 
our 2024 Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be ﬁled pursuant to Regulation 14A under the Exchange Act.
99 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
PART IV
ITEM 15. EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES
 
      (a)  The following documents are ﬁled as part of this report:  
 
   FORM 10-
K 
     PAGE
       1.  Financial Statements:  
      
   Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm (PCAOB ID 238) 54
      
   Consolidated Balance Sheets as of August 31, 2023 and 2022 57
      
 
 Consolidated Statements of Operations for each of the three years ended August 31, 
2023, 2022, and 202158
      
 
 Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive (Loss) Income for each of the three 
years ended August 31, 2023, 2022, and 202159
      
 
 Consolidated Statements of Equity for each of the three years ended August 31, 
2023, 2022, and 202160
      
 
 Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for each of the three years ended August 31, 
2023, 2022, and 202161
      
   Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements 63
      
       2.  Financial Statement Schedules:  
      
 
 Schedule II - Valuation and Qualifying Accounts for each of the three years ended 
August 31, 2023, 2022, and 202197
    
  All other schedules are omitted as the information is either not applicable or is not required.
   
       3.  Exhibits: 
   
       3.1
 2006 Restated Articles of Incorporation (as corrected December 2, 2011) of the Registrant. Filed 
as Exhibit 3.1 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended 
November 30, 2011, and incorporated herein by reference.
   
       3.2
 Restated Bylaws of the Registrant. Filed as Exhibit 3.1 to the Registrant’s Current Report on 
Form 8-K ﬁled on December 16, 2013, and incorporated herein by reference.
   
       4.1  Description of Registrant’s Securities.
    
     10.1
 Lease Agreement, dated September 1, 1988, between Schnitzer Investment Corp. and the 
Registrant, as amended, relating to the Portland Metals Recycling operation and which has 
terminated except for surviving indemnity obligations. Filed as Exhibit 10.3 to the Registrant’s 
Registration Statement on Form S-1 ﬁled on September 24, 1993 (Commission File No. 33-
69352), and incorporated herein by reference (P).
   
     10.2
 Purchase and Sale Agreement, dated May 4, 2005, between Schnitzer Investment Corp. and the 
Registrant, relating to purchase by the Registrant of the Portland Metals Recycling operations 
real estate. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on May 10, 
2005, and incorporated herein by reference.
   
     10.3
 Third Amended Shared Services Agreement, dated July 26, 2006, between the Registrant, 
Schnitzer Investment Corp. and Island Equipment Company, Inc. Filed as Exhibit 10.5 to the 
Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on July 28, 2006, and incorporated herein by 
reference.
   
     10.4
 Third Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of April 6, 2016 among Schnitzer Steel 
Industries, Inc., as the US Borrower, and Schnitzer Steel Canada Ltd., as a Canadian Borrower, 
Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent, and the other Lenders party thereto. Filed as 
Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended February 
29, 2016, and incorporated herein by reference.
   
     10.5  Security Agreement dated as of April 6, 2016 among Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc., the other 
Grantor’s party thereto and Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent. Filed as Exhibit 
10.2 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended February 29, 2016, 
and incorporated herein by reference.
100 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
   
     10.6
 General Security Agreement dated as of April 6, 2016 between Schnitzer Steel Canada Ltd. and 
Bank of America, N.A., as Collateral Agent. Filed as Exhibit 10.3 to the Registrant’s Quarterly 
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended February 29, 2016, and incorporated herein by 
reference.
   
     10.7
 First Amendment, dated as of August 24, 2018, to Third Amended and Restated Credit 
Agreement dated as of April 6, 2016 among Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc., as the US Borrower, 
and Schnitzer Steel Canada Ltd., as a Canadian Borrower, Bank of America, N.A., as 
Administrative Agent, and the other Lenders party thereto. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the 
Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on August 28, 2018, and incorporated herein by 
reference.
   
     10.8
 Second Amendment, dated as of June 30, 2020, to Third Amended and Restated Credit 
Agreement dated as of April 6, 2016 among Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. as the US Borrower, 
and Schnitzer Steel Canada Ltd., as a Canadian Borrower, Bank of America, N.A., as 
Administrative Agent, and the other Lenders party thereto. Filed as Exhibit 10.3 to the 
Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended May 31, 2020, and 
incorporated herein by reference.
    
     10.9
 Third Amendment, dated as of August 22, 2022, to Third Amended and Restated Credit 
Agreement dated as of April 6, 2016 among Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. as the US Borrower, 
Schnitzer Steel Canada Ltd., as the Canadian Borrower, Bank of America, N.A., as 
Administrative Agent, and the other Lenders party thereto. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the 
Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on August 23, 2022, and incorporated herein by 
reference.
    
   *10.10
 Amended Executive Annual Bonus Plan. Filed as Appendix A to the Registrant’s Annual Proxy 
Report on Form DEF 14A ﬁled on December 17, 2014, and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.11
 Annual Incentive Compensation Plan, eﬀective September 1, 2006. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the 
Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended February 28, 2007, and 
incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.12
 1993 Stock Incentive Plan of the Registrant as Amended and Restated on November 7, 2013. 
Filed as Appendix A to the Registrant’s Deﬁnitive Proxy Statement ﬁled on December 18, 2013, 
and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.13
 Form of Deferred Stock Unit Award Agreement under the 1993 Stock Incentive Plan used for 
non-employee directors for awards granted prior to 2023. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the 
Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on July 28, 2006, and incorporated herein by 
reference.
    
   *10.14
 Form of Deferred Stock Unit Award Agreement under the 1993 Stock Incentive Plan used for 
non-employee directors for awards granted in 2023. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s 
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q ﬁled for the quarter ended February 28, 2023, and incorporated 
herein by reference.
   
   *10.15
 Deferred Compensation Plan for Non-Employee Directors. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the 
Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q ﬁled for the quarter ended February 28,2022, and 
incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.16
 Summary Sheet for 2023 Non-Employee Director Compensation. Filed as Exhibit 10.2 to the 
Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended February 28, 2023, and 
incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.17
 Amended and Restated Supplemental Executive Retirement Bonus Plan of the Registrant 
eﬀective January 1, 2009. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q 
for the quarter ended May 31, 2009, and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.18
 Form of Change in Control Severance Agreement between the Registrant and executive oﬃcers 
other than Tamara L. Lundgren and used for agreements entered into prior to 2011. Filed as 
Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on May 5, 2008, and 
incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.19
 Form of Change in Control Severance Agreement between the Registrant and executive oﬃcers 
and used for agreements entered into between 2011 and 2014. Filed as Exhibit 10.19 to the 
Registrant’s Annual Report on Form 10-K ﬁled October 29, 2013 and incorporated herein by 
reference.
   
   *10.20
 Form of Change in Control Severance Agreement between the Registrant and executive oﬃcers 
and used for agreements entered into after 2014. Filed as Exhibit 10.16 to the Registrant’s 
Annual Report on Form 10-K ﬁled October 27, 2015, and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.21
 Amended and Restated Employment Agreement by and between the Registrant and Tamara L. 
Lundgren dated October 29, 2008. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Current Report on 
Form 8-K ﬁled on November 4, 2008, and incorporated herein by reference.
   
101 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
   *10.22
 Amendment No. 1 dated June 29, 2011 to Amended and Restated Employment Agreement by 
and between the Registrant and Tamara L. Lundgren dated October 29, 2008. Filed as Exhibit 
10.1 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended May 31, 2011 and 
incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.23
 Amendment No. 2 dated July 25, 2017 to Amended and Restated Employment Agreement by 
and between the Registrant and Tamara L. Lundgren dated October 29, 2008. Filed as Exhibit 
10.19 to the Registrant's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended August 31, 2017, and 
incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.24
 Amended and Restated Change in Control Severance Agreement by and between the Registrant 
and Tamara L. Lundgren dated October 29, 2008. Filed as Exhibit 10.2 to the Registrant’s Current 
Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on November 4, 2008, and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.25
 Form of Indemniﬁcation Agreement for Directors and certain oﬃcers used for agreements 
entered into prior to 2016. Filed as Exhibit 10.3 to the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K 
ﬁled on July 28, 2006, and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.26
 Form of Indemniﬁcation Agreement for Directors and certain oﬃcers used for agreements 
entered into after 2015. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled 
on May 3, 2016, and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.27
 Form of Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement under the 1993 Stock Incentive Plan used for 
awards granted in ﬁscal 2019. Filed as Exhibit 10.2 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 
10-Q for the quarter ended November 30, 2018 and incorporated herein by reference.
    
   *10.28
 Form of Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement under the 1993 Stock Incentive Plan used for 
awards granted in ﬁscal 2020. Filed as Exhibit 10.2 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 
10-Q for the quarter ended May 31, 2020 and incorporated herein by reference.
    
   *10.29
 Form of Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement under the 1993 Stock Incentive Plan used for 
awards granted after ﬁscal 2020. Filed as Exhibit 10.2 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on 
Form 10-Q for the quarter ended November 30, 2020 and incorporated herein by reference.
    
   *10.30
 Form of Long-Term Incentive Award Agreement under the 1993 Stock Incentive Plan used for 
awards granted in ﬁscal 2021. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 
10-Q for the quarterly period ended November 30, 2020 and incorporated herein by reference.
    
   *10.31
 Form of Long-Term Incentive Award Agreement under the 1993 Stock Incentive Plan used for 
awards granted in ﬁscal 2022. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 
10-Q for the quarterly period ended November 30, 2021 and incorporated herein by reference.
    
   *10.32
 Form of Long-Term Incentive Award Agreement under the 1993 Stock Incentive Plan used for 
awards granted in ﬁscal 2023. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 
10-Q for the quarterly period ended November 30, 2022 and incorporated herein by reference.
    
   *10.33
 Fiscal 2022 Annual Performance Bonus Program for Tamara L. Lundgren. Filed as Exhibit 10.2 to 
the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended November 30, 
2021 and incorporated herein by reference.
    
   *10.34
 Fiscal 2023 Annual Performance Bonus Program for Tamara L. Lundgren. Filed as Exhibit 10.2 to 
the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended November 30, 
2022 and incorporated herein by reference.
    
   *10.35
 Schnitzer Steel Deferred Compensation Plan. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Current 
Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on May 4, 2021 and incorporated herein by reference.
    
   *10.36 Separation and Release Agreement by and between the Registrant and Michael R. Henderson.
    
     21.1  Subsidiaries of Registrant.
   
     23.1  Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm.
   
     24.1  Powers of Attorney.
   
     31.1
 Certiﬁcation of Chief Executive Oﬃcer pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 
2002.
   
102 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
     31.2
 Certiﬁcation of Chief Financial Oﬃcer pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 
2002.
   
     32.1
 Certiﬁcation of Chief Executive Oﬃcer pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant 
to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
   
     32.2
 Certiﬁcation of Chief Financial Oﬃcer pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant 
to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
   
101.INS
 Inline XBRL Instance Document – the instance document does not appear in the Interactive 
Data File because its XBRL tags are embedded within the Inline XBRL document.
101.SCH Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document
101.CAL Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase Document
101.DEF Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Deﬁnition Linkbase Document
101.LAB Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Label Linkbase Document
101.PRE Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Presentation Linkbase Document
104  Cover Page Interactive Data File (formatted as inline XBRL and contained in Exhibit 101)
 
* Management contract or compensatory plan or arrangement.
The agreements and other documents ﬁled as exhibits to this report are not intended to provide factual 
information or other disclosure other than with respect to the terms of the agreements or other documents 
themselves, and you should not rely on them for that purpose. In particular, any representations and 
warranties made by us in these agreements or other documents were made solely within the speciﬁc 
context of the relevant agreement or document as of the date they were made and may not describe the 
actual state of aﬀairs for any other purpose or at any other time.
 
ITEM 16. FORM 10-K SUMMARY
None.
103 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC. dba RADIUS 
RECYCLING 
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant 
has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
  SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
Dated: October 25, 2023 By:  /s/ STEFANO R. GAGGINI
    Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Oﬃcer
      
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by 
the following persons on behalf of the registrant on October 25, 2023 in the capacities indicated.
 
Signature  Title
    
Principal Executive Oﬃcer:   
   
/s/ TAMARA L. LUNDGREN  Chairman, President and Chief Executive Oﬃcer
Tamara L. Lundgren   
   
Principal Financial Oﬃcer:   
   
/s/ STEFANO R. GAGGINI  Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Oﬃcer
Stefano R. Gaggini   
   
Principal Accounting Oﬃcer:   
   
/s/ MARK SCHUESSLER  Vice President and Chief Accounting Oﬃcer
Mark Schuessler   
   
Directors:   
   
*GREGORY FRIEDMAN  Director
Gregory Friedman   
   
*RHONDA D. HUNTER  Director
Rhonda D. Hunter   
    
*DAVID L. JAHNKE  Director
David L. Jahnke   
    
*GLENDA MINOR  Director
Glenda Minor   
   
*LESLIE L. SHOEMAKER  Director
Leslie L. Shoemaker   
    
*MICHAEL W. SUTHERLIN  Director
Michael W. Sutherlin   
 
*By: /s/ STEFANO R. GAGGINI   
   Attorney-in-fact, Stefano R. 
Gaggini   
 
104 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. dba Radius Recycling Form 10-K Fiscal 2023
